The class had ended early, but Leyla was still quite busy.

It was the day of the school’s council meeting. The members were going to discuss the issue of the school’s old, small building, which needed to be expanded.

As the person in charge of arranging the conference room, Leyla set up the chairs and desks in accordance to the number of people attending, preparing simple writing instruments and notepads for everyone to use before the meeting began.

“Miss Lewellin, are you done?”


Mrs. Grever asked in a hasty fashion. Smiling, Leyla looked around the conference room for one last time and nodded decisively.

“Yes, I’m done.”

“Then, let’s get going. The sponsors are here.”

“Already?”

Leyla scrambled to get ready, following Mrs Grever as soon as she was done. The sponsors’ extravagant carriages and limousines formed a long line as they entered the school’s front gate.

An ominous premonition flashed through her. She shook her head, as if to deny the feeling. In the numerous times she had read the list of sponsors attending the meeting, Herhardt’s name had never appeared in the lineup. She had nothing to be apprehensive about.

Nothing to worry about save for the gift she had returned to the Duke, that was, and the most likely cause for Leyla’s erratically pounding heart.

Several days had passed since she had returned the gift. The Duke had made no mention of her—no visits, no interrogations, no harassments, unlike his actions from before. Leyla, who had been terrified of encountering such a mishap, could already feel her guard going down. She might have hurt the Duke’s pride, but it was something that had to be done once anyway.

No matter how irrelevant their relationship was, Leyla had a dim hunch about him. She was aware of the Duke’s desire for her and knew she could get harmed.

Leyla despised him for every single thing.

She hated Matthias von Herhardt.

She hated his selfish desires. She hated the repercussions she would face because of his freakish obsession. Leyla had long since lost the desire to be embroiled in irrelevant affairs, and more importantly, she didn’t want to get hurt, especially by the Duke, who had gotten wind of her heart after she had returned the gift. As the aristocratic man remained silent, Leyla took it to mean that he had accepted her rejection.

Slowly sweeping down her chest, Leyla stood still at the end of the line to greet the sponsors. The autumnal rain had chilled the air. She had been concerned about the poor attendance rate caused by the bad weather, but all the sponsors who had promised to attend were fortunately present.

Leyla performed her job well, smiling and bowing politely to everyone she met. She prepared the tea and waited quietly as the meeting started. Leyla’s first council meeting would be considered successful only when she escorted the sponsors off the premises.


The headmaster turned around as the last sponsor, a lady, drove through the school’s entrance. A black car that had clearly been in a battle with the heavy downpours squeaked to a stop just as the other teachers were about to do the same.

“My god! Duke!”

The headmaster’s countenance changed from a confused expression to a beaming grin very quickly.

Face prepared to smile and greet the guest, Leyla’s lips quivered.

‘No way.’

Leyla blinked. She blinked rapidly, nervously, as if to deny what she was seeing. Standing there in a distinctive, straight posture under a parapluie held by an assistant was Duke von Herhardt.

His eyes wandered through the line of teachers, stopping at Leyla’s withered face.

When their eyes met, the Duke smiled.

For those who did nothing more than glance, it was a smile that could only be called gentle.


Chapter 54.


Taking Responsibility.




Although Leyla didn’t show it, she was thoroughly distracted throughout the entire council meeting. She laughed, she talked, and she moved around, yet her focus was entirely on one person—the one and only Duke Herhardt.

‘What is he doing here?’

Anyone who caught sight of Leyla’s eyes would have to be blind not to notice the mix of curiosity and fear in them, as she studied Matthias’s face intently.

Matthias attended the meeting as if his sole purpose was to mock her. The Principal, however, was excited with the surprise visit from the Duke, and even more delighted when Matthias agreed to develop the school further.

Unknown to the Principal, Matthias wasn’t interested in anything related to the school. The same went for the meeting. What he was interested in was the woman seated in the far corner, trembling as she glanced periodically at him when she thought he wasn’t looking.

“Miss Lewellin.”

Matthias’s smile softened at the sound of a teacher calling her name.

“Miss Lewellin?”

The teacher hesitantly called out her name again.

As one, everyone in the conference room turned to look at the owner of the name. Matthias followed suit. Leyla was standing still as stone in the corner of the classroom, much like a child being reprimanded. As Matthias continued to stare, Leyla fidgeted nervously, not quite managing to look away from his gaze.



“Ah…..”

Leyla hesitated under the weight of their stares. Full of reluctance, she raised her head, mumbling,

“P-Pardon me…”

The woman trembling and bowing her head repeatedly in apology was the opposite of the woman he remembered; an outspoken, fearless woman who always acted courageously in front of him. It was pathetic. The more Matthias saw her low-spirited attitude, the more Matthias could feel his temper fraying, thread by thread.

“Now, Miss Lewellin..…..”

“Please continue.”

Matthias interrupted the frowning Principal as she opened her mouth to complain, voice blunt and gruff.

“With the expansion proposal.”

The Principal shot him a look, eyes wide. He smiled graciously at her, baring his teeth.

“I’d like to hear more about it in detail.”

“Ah, yes.”

It took only a mention of the new building for the Principal to regain her excitement. Leyla’s clumsiness was already fading from the Principal’s mind, replaced instead with new architecture and expenses.

As the discussion between Matthias and the Principal continued, Leyla helped Mrs. Grever prepare the tea.

‘Get your head straight, Leyla.’

She told herself, doing her best to put herself into a calm, trancelike state in an effort to control her nerves



‘Stop acting like a fool and behave naturally.’

Alas, her desperate wish was not to come true. It vanished into thin air without fail the moment she approached Duke Herhardt.

Leyla’s hands shook with nerves as she held the teacup. Matthias looked at her as the teacup as it clattered on the saucer, following her every move. The more he stared at her, the more emotions hopeless she felt, eyes glazing over with a mix of fear and confusion that increased with every step she took towards him.

Matthias had initially attended the school meeting with the expectation of seeing an incredibly flustered Leyla. However, at the sight of her misery, the emotion in his heart was not happiness as he originally thought, but a distorted sort of pleasure.

͢

Matthias looked away. Leyla appeared to be less intimidated by him if he didn’t look at her directly. Although Matthias still had hopes of seeing her spill the tea in her fluster, it wouldn’t do for her to be embarrassed in public, fun as it would have been to see her face grow red in fluster.

While Mathias had casted his gaze elsewhere, he caught a glimpse of Leyla’s hands out of the corner of his eye, white and smooth like the skin of a wax doll as she placed the teacup onto the table in front of him without spilling a drop.

Leyla walked back to the corner of the classroom as the meeting continued.

Her hands had a sensitive touch, with slender fingers and petal-like fingernails that sparkled at the tip. Matthias’s mind strayed constantly to the image of Leyla’s hands during the long speech and the Principal’s appeal, at how frantic and harmless those hands had seemed even as Leyla used them to pummel and scratch him on that memorable summer afternoon. How small and delicate her hands had been as he’d grabbed them and intertwined them with his own.

Lost in the lust-tinged memory of touching Leyla’s lips while clasping her dirt-covered hands to the ground, Matthias barely noticed the ending of the meeting.

The school expansion would proceed as agreed by all sponsors. Satisfied with the arrangement, the sponsors thus headed back to their residences.

“May I take a look around the classroom for a while?”

Matthias politely asked for permission from the Principal. The Principal, who was already in high spirits after the successful meeting, would have seen no reason to refuse, especially when it was a request made from the sponsor who had made the most generous donations to the school.

“Of course, Duke.” The Principal said immediately. But the other sponsors are returning, so I’m afraid I have no choice but to bid them farewell.….”

Troubled, the Principal glanced around the classroom. Her eyes rested on Leyla, who was standing awkwardly in the corner of the classroom.

“Would you mind if I assign Miss Lewellin to guide you around?”

It was the answer he had been hoping for. Matthias rose steadily from his seat.

“Not at all. Let’s do that.”

***

Leyla was in charge of the lower classroom on the first level, positioned at the very end of the school corridor. As the students had returned home earlier in the day, the heater had been switched off, leaving the classroom cold and humid.


Leyla switched on the light. She walked stiffly around the classroom, expecting her role as a guide to end once she showed him around. Matthias conducted himself perfectly as a keen sponsor, checking over the school’s amenities, and thanks to that, Leyla was able to guide him around without too much fear and stress.

‘Just a little more.’

“This is where the young students stu….”

Slam!

The door slammed shut with a thunderous sound, cutting Leyla’s explanation short. She flinched at the sound, back ramrod straight with shock as she whipped her head to the door. Standing there was Matthias, leisurely standing against the closed door.

“This must be Miss Lewellin’s classroom.”

Matthias broke the silence as he carefully observed the teacher’s desk. Her belongings were placed neatly on its surface, with her coat hanging over the chair’s backrest.

“Yes, that’s right, Duke.”

Leyla retreated a reasonable distance away to the window with small steps. Her heart was pounding in her ears, like the insistent heavy drumming of rain beating upon a window pain.

She stuck close to the desk near the window, unable to do anything but fidget helplessly as Matthias narrowed the gap between them.

“Pfft..why are you scared? Have I ever said I would hurt you?”

Matthias laughed, but his quips failed to provide her with any comfort. Gaze calm, smile sweet as honey, the Duke was mean as he watched her.

“We’re in school, Duke. This isn’t Arvis.”

“Yes, we are in school.” Matthias walked up to her without stopping. “And I’m a patron of this school. Is there a reason why I can’t come?”

“You didn’t even tell me that you were going to attend, so why would….”

“Do you take me for a fool, Leyla?”

Matthias stopped at a distance of about two steps away from her. He slowly clasped his hands behind his back.

“If you had known earlier that I were to be attending the meeting, you wouldn’t have been here. You would have avoided me at all costs.”


Unable to refute his words, Leyla moistened her lips. “If you have anything else to say, please say it at Arvis.”

“Well, Leyla. I think it will be much better here.”

Matthias smirked. He stepped forward to the teacher’s desk as Leyla desperately stared out of the window at the hallway, hoping against hope of finding someone for help.

“We’re able to have a conversation now because of this classroom.”

Matthias’s words were light. Leyla gasped for air, audible against the pleasant sound of rain against glass. Looking away from her, he moved towards the desk, running his eyes over the neatly organised items on the desk.

A quill pen and blotting paper.

An exquisite porcelain doll.

A pile of unused pen nibs in an empty chocolate box.

His eyes paused on the three ink bottles placed at the end of the desk.

Black. Blue. Red.

With each color he saw, Matthias’ lips widened into a grin. He reached out to the bottle nearest to him, the one filled with red ink.

After much contemplation, Leyla bowed her head. Matthias was simply examining the table, Leyla thought. She didn’t want him to see her reactions.

Please. Leyla held her hands in prayer, hoping for the return of the other teachers, who had left to send the sponsors off. Meanwhile, Matthias had opened the lid of the ink bottle. Leyla heard the sound of the lid falling , and the movement of the Duke finally caught her attention.

Hysteria hit her instantly.

“D…duke!”

Matthias had sidled up to her chair. As if he were serving wine from a decanter, he gracefully tilted the bottle, pouring a stream of red ink onto her coat as Leyla screamed in shock and alarm.

Matthias backed away elegantly as Leyla rushed towards her ink stained coat, grasping the half-empty in bottle lightly in his hand.

Whipping out a handkerchief, Leyla hurriedly tried to blot off the ink staining her light grey coat.

“What the hell are you doing!”

Leyla wailed, but Matthias appeared calm.

“Taking responsibility.”

Matthias’s nonsensical reply rendered Leyla silent, mouth agape, lips flushing scarlet.

Eyes locked onto her lips, Matthias sauntered over to Leyla with the bottle of red ink in his hands—she barely had time to react before he upended the bottle over her shoulders. Ink splashed onto her blouse, her skirt, her pumps, staining them a bright red.

The argument ended with Matthias pouring every last drop of the ink onto her clothes. The glass bottle fell to the floor with a loud thump, rolling to a stop at his shoes. Their polish had been smeared by the bright red ink as well, but Matthias gave no reaction.

Leyla was so angry that she wanted to scream. Her mouth opened, but nothing came out. Frozen still, she gasped as if she were full of fear, the ink smeared over her upper body glistening red like blood as she held back the urge to strangle something.

“What to do, Leyla?”

Glancing at the mess Matthias himself had caused, he narrowed his eyes.

“I’ll have to take responsibility.”

Despite the tragedy, his lips curled up with pleasure.

***

“Thank you very much for your kind understanding of Miss Lewellin’s mistakes.”

Walking by Matthias’s side, the Principal apologised once again.

After escorting the sponsors out of the school, the Principal and other teachers had rushed to see Duke Herhardt, only to be left dumbfounded by the scene they witnessed inside the classroom—their youngest teacher bathed pitifully in red ink with a very concerned-looking Duke.

“It was my mistake,” Matthias repeated. “I dropped the ink bottle on her by accident; I really should apologise to Miss Lewellin.”

“Even so, your grace, it is your first time in this place. I apologise for failing to show you the better side of our school.”

“I had quite a pleasurable visit here.”

Once they reached the school entrance, Matthias bade farewell to the panicked Principal.

“Miss Lewellin, please come along with me.”


His gaze shifted from the Principal to Leyla, who was scrubbing at the stain on her blouse. The more she tried to scrub it off, the more the ink smeared, until her clothes looked like they belonged to a person who had suffered grievous injury.

“No, I’m fine.”

Leyla’s voice trembled with anger. Despite the fear coursing through her, she gave Matthias a stern glare. Matthias favored her current attitude much better than the low-spirited behavior from earlier, even if her eyes were still filled with fear.

“Miss Lewellin. Please, just go along with the Duke. He’s trying to apologise.”

The Principal chuckled as if it was a trivial matter, but her eyes, full of nerves, told a different story.

“You didn’t bring your bicycle today, and it’s going to rain! Do as the Duke says.”

“Even if the rain falls, I have an umbrella, so I can walk back home.”

At Leyla’s stubborn refusal, the Principal’s complexion grew even more wane.

“I do understand you, Ms Lewellin.” Matthias said, smiling. “However, will you not scare the passers-by that see you walking in the rain dressed as you are right now? The police officers would appear, thinking there might’ve been a murder case.”

Leyla pursed her lips and looked down at her clothes as everyone in the crowd laughed uproariously at Matthias’s joke. Like it or not, what he said had been nothing but the truth. The red ink stains on her white blouse did indeed make her look like she had just committed a gruesome murder.

At a sharp glare from the Principal, Mrs Grever approached Leyla, who was stiff as a board. Getting into the car, Matthias , calmly watched the scene.

Full of resignation, Leyla allowed herself to be dragged and loaded into the car like luggage. Matthias moved to the side, giving her a comfortable amount of space to sit in.

The car’s engine roared to life the moment the door clicked shut.


Chapter 55.




What Must I Destroy?







“I don’t think this is the right way to go to Arvis.”

Leyla was the first to break the silence upon noticing the car speeding through Carlsbar’s main street instead of returning to Arvis. She clutched at her bag and coat, grip tightening until her knuckles turned white.

“Mr. Evers,” She began, addressing the aide seated in the front. “This road-“,

“Leyla, I believe I’ve told you.” Matthias abruptly cut her off. “I will take responsibility.”

Leyla raised her face, shooting Matthias an angry glare. ‘Take responsibility?’ His words replayed in her mind, and her hands clenched into fists with anger. She hadn’t heard anything more nonsensical.

“I ruined your clothes on purpose. It is only natural that I should be held accountable for it.

“No. You don’t have to. I…”

“Why? Are you insisting that I am not in the wrong?” Matthias repeated tenaciously, despite the presence of his aide and the driver, who were seated stiffly in the front of the car.

Leyla grabbed her skirt. She took a deep breath. No matter how hard she scrubbed, the red stains on her hands and clothes stayed stubbornly on, as if they were mocking her fury.

‘That gift… I should immediately throw it away.’

Leyla bit her lip. Even if it was utterly foolish to believe that refusing the Duke’s gift would sever the relationship between them, she couldn’t help but think it.



Unable to deny how lost she currently felt, Leyla wanted to cry from shame.

‘How-‘

Hoping against hope for an answer, she glanced at the Duke. The look he gave her reflected the bleak cityscape, cold and filled with a tinge of frustration. Hopes dashed, she looked away, breaking her gaze.


As the sun hesitantly peeked through a thick layer of clouds, the car came to a stop at a street filled with high end stores and upscale boutiques.

The driver and the aide both exited the car without a word, leaving only the mismatched pair behind. The instant they had left the car, the air in the car became heavier, temperature dropping by a few degrees. Leyla immediately tensed her shoulders.

“I-I’m going to leave now.”

Grabbing at her umbrella, Leyla hurriedly spun to the side. Before her hand could reach the car door, Matthias forcefully grabbed her wrist.

“Where are you going?”

“Home. I don’t need any clothes. I’m going home!”

Matthias kept his grip on her wrist without much effort as Leyla instinctively struggled to pull her hand away.

“Don’t be selfish, Leyla.” He said gruffly. “Why aren’t you taking Bill Remmer into consideration?” Matthias scoffed, loosening his grip on her wrist.

“W-what? What do you mean?”

The mention of her uncle was enough to make her struggles stop.

“How heartbroken would Mr Remmer be if he sees you like this?”

“I am surprised that the noble Duke Herhardt is concerned about my uncle after he did this to me.”



“Well, Mr Remmer has worked as a gardener for our household for decades. It is only right that I worry for him.”

Grip tightening on her wrist once more, Matthias pulled her close to him, so close that he could feel her breath against his face.

“Are you confident that you can come up with a good excuse when Mr Remmer asks about what happened to you, upon seeing this pitiful appearance?”

“O- of course.” Leyla stammered. Matthias’s hand swiftly grasped her cheek as she tried to free herself from him, leaning in close to her small ears.

“Unfortunately, Leyla, I am fully responsible for you.” He whispered. “After all, all your misfortune is caused by me.”


Matthias’s gaze was intense, filled with the obsession she knew he had towards her. Leyla desperately tried to break her gaze, but to no avail.

“It is my responsibility to hand you back to Mr. Remmer in perfect condition. Even a single blemish on your clothes will not be tolerated.”

“N- No need! You don’t have to! Let me go! I…”

“Think about it, Leyla. There’s nothing wrong with accepting my apologies and receiving your rightful compensation. Don’t you think your act of disobedience and stubbornness would appear quite weird?”

Matthias’s solemn gaze shifted towards the window. The driver and the aide were standing outside, ignorant of the quarrel taking place inside the car. “They might think you’re a petulant mistress.”

Extremely offended by his vulgar joke, Leyla frowned fiercely.

Releasing her hand, Matthias smirked, reaching out to knock on the window. Mark Evers nimbly turned around, opening the back door. Leyla quickly leapt out of the door like a bird that was freed from its cage, unwilling to waste her newfound chance for freedom.

Matthias glanced at her ruined bag and coat. Gesturing to Mark Evers, Matthias gave brief instructions to the aide, closing the door once he was done.

He resumed his staring out of the window. His blue eyes narrowed as Evers attempted to drape his coat over the freezing Leyla. Before Evers could make a move, a faint knock on the window interrupted him. Pulling his coat back on, he swiftly re-opened the back door.

Matthias took off his coat and handed it to Evers, who obediently took the coat without question.

The door slammed shut once again and the only sound inside the car was the raindrops hitting the windows.

Matthias’s steady gaze never left Leyla, watching as his aide wrapped her, who was too dazed to realise whom the coat belonged to, in his coat.

Soon, the driver returned and started the car’s engine. Leyla followed Mark Evers into the boutique’s fitting room, her hands tightly gripping Matthias’s coat.

Matthias’s gaze lingered on her for a long time.



“Why are we going in there?”

Leyla came to a stop as she glimpsed the luxurious hotel she had been given the privilege to attend last summer, when she had tea with Claudine and Matthias.


“It was the Duke’s command, Miss Lewellin.”, Mark Evers explained, smiling. “The Duke informed me that he will only return to Arvis after treating Miss Lewellin to a cup of tea as an apology.”

“N- no, it’s fine. These clothes are more than enough for an apology.”

“Miss Lewellin, it is not for me to decide.”

“But-”

“Miss Lewellin, I’m simply following the Duke’s orders.” Mark Evers said, a little baffled by Leyla’s attitude. “Please don’t make it difficult for me to accomplish those orders.”

Running out of reason to give for her stubbornness, Leyla followed him with heavy steps.

“Did you know that the Duke is currently raising a bird just like you, Miss. Lewellin?” Mark Evers blurted out as they entered the hotel lobby. “A tiny, pretty yellow bird.”

“A bird? The Duke?” Leyla frowned in disbelief.

‘That psychotic bird slayer raises a bird?’

It was the weirdest thing she’d ever heard, and even more difficult to believe in.

“Is he raising it to hunt it?”

The question filled with paranoia left Mark Evers dumbfounded. Before he had a chance to clarify the misunderstanding in his master’s stead, they had already arrived to the entrance of the tearoom.

Mark Evers escorted Leyla to Matthias, who was seated near the window overlooking the rainy terrace, promptly leaving the room the moment his job was done.

Seeing Leyla standing blankly without moving an inch in front of him, his stern voice rang.

“Sit down.”

Reluctantly, Leyla sat down in the chair opposite of him. She removed her coat, revealing a newly bought turquoise velvet dress with shiny pearl buttons adorning its front, and a wide lace collar that was white as snow. It was clear that everything she was wearing was brand new, from her shoes to the stockings that ended mid calf. Her hair had also been done up into an elegant yet natural looking style. Compared to her usual nun-like outfits, Matthias was pleased to see her in a more elegantly styled dress.

They were served tea and an assortment of exquisite desserts not long after.

“Eat.” Matthias ordered while holding his tea cup.

Leyla didn’t move, flashing him a look of stern disgust instead.


Matthias met her glare headon, as if it held no threat to him. “Shall I feed you?” He asked arrogantly. “I am more than willing to take responsibility for that as well.”

At Matthias’s declaration, Leyla hastily grabbed her fork. She hesitated only a moment before choosing a light pink cream cake.

Satisfied by her obedience, Matthias straightened his posture and continued to observe her.

“What kind of delicacies do you prefer?”

Matthias asked curiously, watching her silently savor the cake. She appeared to be a fan of desserts, a fact that was seemingly trivial that nevertheless piqued his interest in her.

“Save for the foods I have to eat in front of you, everything is to my liking.” Leyla retorted coldly, fiddling with the fork handle. Despite her attempt to sound confident, her voice trembled.

Matthias’s chuckled, little pearl-like bubbles of sound that were soon muffled by the sound of raindrops splattering against the windowpane. “Did you know that it’s your proud attitude which I am attracted to?” He leaned towards the table, while saying, “My intrigue of you grows when you’re cocky like this, believe it or not.”

“….”

“If you decide to continue to behave like you do now, then I reckon it won’t take long before I am addicted to you,” Matthias scoffed, his voice soft like a bird whistle.

Petrified by his words, Leyla found herself leaning back instinctively as he bent closer towards her.

“Wouldn’t it be better if you acted innocent and docile?” Matthias said, grinning, “That way, I might grow tired of you.”

Matthias leant back in his chair, as if he believed Leyla would fall out of her chair with fear if he moved in closer.

After much thought, Leyla placed the fork down. Cheeks flushed, she quickly wiped at her lips with a napkin.

“So, what do you like?”, Matthias asked once again.

“…I am not a picky eater.” Leyla replied calmly.

It was quite a sight for Matthias to behold, seeing Leyla striving so very hard to keep her “true” self under wraps.

“Really? Good girl.”

At his remark, Leyla immediately tamped down her ire, although her eyes sparkled with fury, revealing her true emotions.

‘Let’s see just how long you can act like this.’

Matthias devoured the words he wanted to say with a sip of coffee. Just the slightest glance of Leyla glaring with impudence despite shuddering with despair sent him spiralling into madness. Matthias couldn’t stand the thought of anyone else seeing that expression of hers—it gave him a strange sense of superiority, thinking that he was the only person who knew of Leyla Lewellin’s other persona.

Leyla was demure and stoic, obediently answering any questions he asked while finishing her food without causing a fuss—completely unlike the usual self that Matthias knew. The only times her facade broke was the occasional glances of discontent she sent his way, and the blush that appeared once or twice as she bit her cream smudged lips.

The time they spent together was sweet, if limited, but only obtainable by nefarious means, such as pouring ink onto Leyla’s coat in a mischievous prank. At the realisation, Matthias laughed heartily, only for his pleasure to fade as it dawned on him—he could only give Leyla something by breaking her first.

‘So, only by hurting you badly will you be mine…..How ridiculous.’

He stared possessively at Leyla, eyes gleaming with an odd light as a smile returned to his face. He found it interesting how her docility, instead of dousing his interest in her, only served to drive him crazier instead.

‘Leyla…. What must I destroy to possess you?’

Matthias tilted his head, sinking further into rumination.

The sky outside the window was getting dark. Leyla finally turned her head, meeting his gaze. Her eyes looked as if they were softly woven with fine green threads, large and beautiful like emeralds.

Entranced in their beauty, he could do nothing but admire her gorgeous eyes.


Chapter 56.


Phoebe.


“You have my gratitude, Dr. Etman.”

The eyes of Norma Catharina von Herhardt were full of appreciation as she watched him pack his medical bag.

“Oh, don’t mention it! I’m glad that you are back to your peak health.” Dr. Etman replied warmly, smiling like his usual kind self.

“Given my old age…it wouldn’t be surprising if my health starts deteriorating.”

“Please, don’t say that.”

Dr. Etman left his work earlier to re-check Norma’s health. The Duchess had caught a cold and had the potential to become serious considering her youth had passed.

“It’s all thanks to you that this old woman is enjoying these years in good shape. Isn’t that right, Elysee?” She asked her daughter-in-law who had been silently standing next to the doctor the entire time.

“Of course!” Elysee von Herhardt agreed, gladly grabbing the chance to praise their family doctor. “You’ve done well, Dr. Etman.”

“Thank you, Madam. I must get going now.” Dr. Etman replied as he picked up his already packed medical bag, intending to leave the room.

“Oh yes, how’s Kyle doing?”

The instant he heard Elysee inquire about his son, Dr. Etman’s eyes twitched, but he quickly regained his calm and replied with a bright smile. “Kyle is doing well. He’s currently absorbed in his studies.”



“I see. He will be a great doctor in the future since he resembles you a lot.”

“I’m honored that Madam thinks that way.”

“Will he return to Carlsbar during the winter break?” Elysee tried probing.

“I don’t believe he has decided yet.”

“True, he might prefer to stay and mingle with his new friends since it’s his first break and there’s also the option of exploring the south.”

“Yes, either way, I’d like to respect Kyle’s wishes.”

“Do tell me his decision; if he decides to spend his winter vacation in the capital then I’ll introduce him to an excellent social club or if he chooses to go on a trip, I’ll help him in any way I can.”

Elysee proposed without hesitation, leaving the other two surprised at her unexpected consideration and kindness, especially Dr. Etman.

“Please send my regards to Mrs. Etman as well.” Elysee added as she accompanied him towards the bedroom door.

Hearing Elysee’s considerate words even though her relationship with his wife had soured, a content smile spread across Dr. Etman’s face.

Following his departure, the maids also stepped out of the room, and the Herhardt’s duo were left unattended.

“You’re quite attentive to Kyle, Elysee.” Norma faintly praised her daughter-in-law as she leaned back onto the soft cushion with a tender smile on her face.

“After contemplating for a while, I have realized that your words were indeed right. ” Elysee expressed further, “If Kyle becomes an excellent doctor, he could be useful to our Matthias. Mrs. Etman and I have grown apart, but I’m trying to respect the Etmans as our family doctor.”

“I’m glad you agreed.”

Norma replied with an eager nod. Kyle Etman was to replace his father’s role as the Herhardt family’s doctor after he graduated, if everything went as predicted.




The gradual conversation between the pair that had begun with Kyle Etman eventually deviated back to Matthias, the living honor of the Herhardt family.

“Matthias attended a council meeting at the town school recently.” Elysee informed with delight. “His attentiveness towards such matters amazes me.”

“He is on the right path to becoming the head of the household. I am impressed at how fast he has improved.” Norma said, praising her grandson wholeheartedly , which pleased Elysee von Herhardt to no end. After all, Matthias was her son.

“Of course! He will become the best Duke Herhardt has ever had!”



So to speak, it was a coincidence.

Riette proposed attending a social gathering since there was no schedule prepared for the day, and Matthias agreed.

The social gathering was pleasant, yet tedious. They finally excused themselves and came across Leyla on their way back.

Matthias recognized Leyla from a distance instantly when the car entered the mansion. She cycled her bicycle along the Platanus road in the October cold, wrapped in the white coat he had gifted her.

“Isn’t that Leyla Lewellin?” Riette noticed her as the distance from the woman on the bike gradually shortened. “The bird lover that lives in the Arvis’ hunting grounds?” His eyes switched from Leyla to his cousin who was staring unblinkingly at her with his piercing blue eyes.

Matthias nodded without removing his gaze from her. He could see how fatigued she was yet she endured and pedalled her bike as usual.

Realizing that a car had been following her, Leyla parked the bike to the side of the road to make way for the bigger vehicle. Matthias was able to get a good glimpse at her as soon as his car passed by; she was also sporting a pair of brand-new shoes that he had bought for her.

“If I’m not mistaken, earlier, you told me that she’s a village school teacher. She should be on her way back home from school .” Riette grinned as he kept staring at his cousin, whose eyes never left the girl.

“Maybe.”

Matthias drew his glance away from Leyla at the end of his vague reply, his lips still had a faint smile on its corner. Riette couldn’t take his eyes off his cousin’s face, who seemed like a little boy experiencing love for the first time.

“…Got something to say?” Matthias mischievously asked as he turned to face Riette who had been burning holes on him with his gaze.

“We will hunt today. I hope you can join us.” Riette replied with an excuse. “I’ve invited some guests and it wouldn’t be right if the Arvis’ owner is absent.”

After Riette announced his weekend plan to hunt in the Arvis’ forest, requests for invitations flooded in.

Matthias had shown green light to his cousin’s request to invite guests to his mansion.

“I can’t act like the owner of your estate, Matthias.” Riette added just as the car stopped at the front door of the mansion.

‘Leyla would definitely roam the forest during the weekends, wouldn’t she?’

After contemplating for a moment, Matthias gladly agreed.

“Fine…”

“As expected.”

Riette got out of the car, looking delighted at Matthias he was familiar with.

“Now you’re acting more like Duke Herhardt, my cousin!”

Laughing, Riette wrapped her arms over Matthias’ shoulders, which Matthias let him do, though he disliked such acts of intimacy.

The two men walked alongside each other, entering the mansion’s foyer, which was lit up at evening hours.



Phoebe was a smart pigeon.

Intelligent enough to know how to scheme to get her freedom back after she got dissatisfied with being confined in a cage in the backyard.

It all started with Bill Remmer. He forgot to lock her cage properly after volunteering to feed the bird on behalf of Leyla one weekend morning as she was busy preparing breakfast for them.

The gluttonous pigeon hadn’t noticed the unlocked door right away as she was more interested in filling her stomach. It was only while Bill and Leyla were busy raking up the leaves that blanketed the entire backyard, that the bird noticed something unusual about her cage.

“Don’t go out into the woods today Leyla. The Duke is out hunting with his friends.”

Leyla sighed deeply as she cleaned the ground. “He has been quiet for a while but it seems his hobby hasn’t changed.” Her disappointment was audible as she vented her frustration by sweeping.

“What kind of marksman would waste his skill?” Bill pointed out as a matter of fact.

“I feel like you’re siding with the Duke.”

“I… I’m not taking any sides! It’s just…I’m just telling the truth.”

Leyla smirked as Bill hurriedly turned his words around. “It seems that everyone in Arvis likes the Duke.” She stated her observation and her uncle shrugged. “There’s no reason to dislike him. On the contrary, he’s the noblest gentleman Arvis ever had. That saucy aristocratic lady is lucky to be engaged to a man like Duke Herhardt.”

“…Yes.”


Leyla raked the backyard with a brighter smile as she relished the back and forth conversation with her uncle. She occasionally glanced at the bird cage and would feel at ease seeing Phoebe safe and sound; everything was fine.

The naughty bird, however, finally made its bold escape when Bill left for work and Leyla began to clean the house.

The wooden door of the cage creaked by the wind. Following the sound Phoebe tried her luck by pecking at the swinging door. She quickened her pace and the rickety door of the cage was fully open not long after.

Phoebe was puzzled for a second as she stared at the opened cage door, thinking it was a perfect chance to escape the unfair punishment Leyla had given her for delivering the Duke’s letter.

The fatty pigeon flapped her white wings vigorously and flew towards the forest, the same place where the Duke’s hunting party would head for their session.

Leyla took a break from mopping as she heard noises outside and peered out the window. A familiar sight unfolded before her: hounds leading the way and aristocrats following on horseback. She jerked into a tense pose in fear. Repetitive flashbacks of gunshots firing with an eerie light resurfaced in her head.

Leyla was startled when Matthias turned his head towards the cabin and caught her gaze. Facing an overwhelming sense of dread, she withdrew from the window, her heart pounding hard.

Fidgeting frantically, Leyla fastened the window and drew the curtain hurriedly.

‘It’s not my first time seeing them, why am I behaving more cowardly than before?’

Her heartbeat had barely returned to normal even after the hunting party had left. The first gunshot was heard as Leyla massaged her cold and stiff shoulders followed by the resounding barks of the hounds.

‘It’s him! The insane Duke who casually kills birds.’

The small, motionless bird drenched in its blood, wounded by the bullet.

The scent of blood…

All those memories began to re-live itself in her mind.

Leyla hurriedly took her bag and left the house to bury those dead birds in the forest once the hunting session was over. She went to the backyard to check on Phoebe first , as if it was routine, to make sure the pigeon was still there before leaving.

“Phoebe…”

Leyla’s face turned pale with fear as she stood in front of an empty and open cage. Trembling, she held the bag strap and ran as she heard another gunshot ringing in the forest



Matthias was the first to shoot. His bullet immediately put an end to the roe deer’s life as it galloped through the undergrowth.

“Are you considering hunting on the ground as well?” Riette asked with amusement while he applauded Matthias’ success. “That would be a little disappointing, I really wanted to spectate Duke Herhardt’s bird shooting ability.” He continued, commenting on Matthias’ sudden change.

Riette stopped his nonsense and picked up his gun as the hounds drove him to a new prey; a grey fur rabbit.

The deeper they moved into the forest, the more intense the hunt grew. However, Matthias did not make a move against any of the birds even though others added them to the catch.

‘As long as it’s not a bird, it’s fine, right?’

Matthias didn’t understand the reason for such a random thought but he soon came to a realization :

He didn’t want to see her cry.

He’d rather that it became a dull hunt than to upset her by aiming for a bird.

The sound of the horse hooves running over the thick layer of fallen leaves shook the serenity of the forest. The hunting party set out for the rookeries at the Schulter River – Matthias’ favourite hunting location.

On the way to the river, Matthias inadvertently saw a familiar bird with white feathers seated on a long branch. It’s leg tied with a familiar red thread.

“Phoebe.”

His unwitting murmur drew the attention of the others. As one, they turned their heads towards the twig to see the white pigeon perching leisurely without a care.


Chapter 57.




Returning The Favour.







Leyla ran through the thick vegetation of the forest, eyes frantically darting from one branch to the other. The thick leaves allowed only small rays of the sun through, letting her see clearly whether or not her precious bird was safe and sound.

She could feel the thundering beat of her heart against her chest, her heavy breathing as she grew more frantic at finding her missing bird. Her baggage clattered along with every stride she took. She was the only one disturbing the natural stillness of the forest.

She was practically heaving by now. The wind was chilly, but the temperature was quite humid, an indicator that the autumn season had finally reached its peak and winter would soon begin to set in. Leyla was beginning to feel the chill in her bones, making her body stiff, draining her strength quicker than usual.

But she couldn’t stop, not when the continuous gunshots echoing in the forest only served to remind her that she was still yet to find Phoebe, her beloved pigeon.

With every gunshot she could hear, another blood-soaked image of Phoebe would run through her mind. Each one worse than the last, breaking her sanity bit by bit.

‘What if she’d already been shot? What if I’m already too late?’

She couldn’t help but think, her chest aching at the thought.

You would think that with every step she took she’d be more confident to find her bird alive, but it only made it worse. Her steps began to falter as exhaustion was making its way into her joints, and the air running out of her lungs. The faint scent of gunpowder wafting in her nostrils as the smoky scent surrounded her as she inhaled huge bouts of air.

Matthias had promised her he wouldn’t touch Phoebe, that he would not shoot the bird. And she had foolishly accepted his word as it is. Looking back now, she should have thought of the possibility that perhaps he was only promising it to appease her. Now she can’t help but imagine him breaking that promise as he aimed his gun and shot at innocent birds, Phoebe included, just to get her to pay more attention to him.

‘How could I have blindly believed him?!’

She thought incredulously to herself as she kept running,



‘That promise probably meant nothing to him, brushed it off as something so trivial for him to really keep!’

Leyla scolded herself for placing her trust in him blindly like a fool, despite already knowing he was a vicious person.

She could feel the tears threatening to fall by the time she had reached the end of the forest’s tree line, ending up by the road near the Schulter River. Should she fail to find her precious bird, she would go find the Duke himself and seek answers to Phoebe’s fate.

It didn’t matter to her whether or not he would grant her an audience, she was prepared to do whatever it took to make sure, even if she had to go down on her knees and beg him for mercy.

It was shortly after she stopped to take a breath, did the autumn breeze sweep past her softly. The skies were painted radiantly by a pale blue hue, her eyes closed shut as she soaked in the breeze and wished for a miracle. Leyla snapped them open once more, sweeping one last look around her surroundings before she finally found him.

He was standing there….

Just there, on the other side of the forest trail. He sat atop his steed, all confident and unbothered as he was surrounded by his peers and fellow comrades.

The moment Leyla tried to call out to him, she found herself devoid of a voice. She tried to; she really wanted to call out to him but all the breath had left her lungs, and her voice stuck in her throat due to the lack of air. It had been too long since she had started running, and now exhaustion was taking over her, replacing her previous adrenaline rush.

She took one last deep breath, before pushing her legs past their limit as she resumed her sprint towards the nobles on horseback. It was only when she neared them enough did she spot one of them had poised their gun at an aim towards one of the branches.

A split-second later, she recognized it was him,

Duke Herhardt…

Her eyes trailed from the end of the gun to see what he had been aiming at, and felt her breath hitch as her heart stuttered in fright.

Phoebe!


Her pace picked up as she tried to stop him from pulling the trigger, her legs screaming in protest at the overexertion. She tried to regain her voice to let out a scream, but only managed a strangled gasp out as a resounding gunshot echoed throughout the sleepy forest.

BANG!



The end of Matthias’ gun was smoking, as soon as he let go of the trigger, and Phoebe was no longer perched on top of the branch.



Time seemed to stop after that one moment, until Matthias moved and broke the silence.

He slowly lowered his long silver rifle, the sunlight glinting as it slid off, it’s shimmer bouncing off the air, twinkling through the forest. Meanwhile, Riette and the other nobles looked at him in a mix of bewilderment as well as amusement on their faces.

“Well, colour me surprised Matthias.” Riette exclaimed, “What the hell was up with that shot?” he teased, it wasn’t long before the other nobles followed suit in teasing the Duke.

“I can’t believe the Duke Herhardt actually missed!”

“Well I certainly saw something interesting today.”

“There’s always a first for everything I guess.”

They all started to remark, the easy laughter and banter flowing between them naturally.

Though Matthias did take the shot, it had only grazed the end of the branch on which the pigeon had perched upon. After that missed shot, the bird fluttered away from the hunting nobles as a piece of the wood broke off and landed on the forest floor.

Matthias took all the teasing in pride, smirking knowingly to himself as his sharp eyes trailed intensely after the bird. It seemed to him it was flying towards the east wing of the estate.

“Huh, why is she here?” Riette wondered out loud, having managed to catch sight of a woman who was standing stock still not too far away from the group.

Matthias slowly turned, following the trail of his cousin’s gaze, before finally spotting her. He grinned minutely to himself when he noticed he held all of her attention now.

“Le-Leyla!” exclaimed a couple of the servants when they finally took notice of the unexpected guest.

Despite the commotion she caused, Leyla stood frozen as she regarded Matthias in a dumbfounded manner, as if he was the only one she could see.


“Leyla!” a servant grabbed her arm, which shook her out of her frozen state, “It’s dangerous to go out today! Didn’t you hear from Mr. Remmer? I specifically informed him of the Duke’s plans for hunting today.”

“I,”

Leyla gulped, eyes wandering back to the Duke’s, before going back to look at the person talking to her, “I’m sorry, he did inform me, but I must have gotten the dates mixed up.” She apologised, “Truly, I am sorry.”

Leyla slowly bowed her head, her hand coming up to rest against her chest, still able to feel the thundering beat of her heart as she lowered her gaze to her feet.

Shortly after scolding her a little more of her recklessness did the servants return to their posts, leaving her alone. Meanwhile Matthias acted like he was above the small commotion that had just happened. He pulled on his horse’s reins, nudging it to move along as he directed it towards the west wing of the estate. Which had been opposite of the direction she knew Phoebe had flown off to.

Her tears threatened to fall once more, but only made her eyes shine as the water built up within them.

The overwhelming astonishment she felt was too much for her to bear.

She was no stranger to the Duke’s aim.

Throughout her years here, she had witnessed with her very own eyes shot after shot he made. His aim, his posture, his concentration, and his skills with shooting; she was so familiar with, she was certain of this one fact.

It was not a missed shot.

Today, he purposely aimed the branches and scared the bird off, to fly away from their hunting party so that others could not take a turn at her. And now Phoebe was safe, far away from their bullets and silver guns.

As Matthias was leaving, he expertly tilted his head back, eyes meeting with her before treading the curved evergreen trail. Though they were quite some distance apart by now, Leyla instinctively knew that the Duke knew she could see him back.

As soon as the hunting party disappeared from her line of sight, she hiked up her skirts before turning around to go back the long way she came from.

Only then did her final strength leave her, the exhaustion fully settling in as she felt herself relax. She felt so weightless, like a ghost floating adrift aimlessly, even though she knew exactly where she was headed. She couldn’t help but recall a similar instance where she also felt this weightlessness.

Images flashed through her mind as she recalled fragments of events long past, but she thought nothing more of it. Leyla can’t believe she remembered as much as she did from back then.


Gripping her bag tightly on her shoulder, she began to slowly trek through the forest this time. There was no need to rush anymore. Her worries were appeased now. By the time she finally reached her cabin, she felt herself get lightheaded, her vision turning blurry. Leyla no longer had the strength to reach her bed for much rest, so with her last strength, she plopped down on the nearby chair by the porch.

Matthias kept his promise.

A promise he made to her in particular.

And that, that was another fact she was certain of.



Tap. Tap. Tap.

The sound echoed inside the quiet room. Sitting in front of her desk by a lantern, Leyla instinctively rose from her seat at the familiar sound and ran immediately towards the front windows. Excitedly she opened it up with a bright smile!

“Phoebe!” she exclaimed before her smile froze.

Leyla immediately muffled down her scream at the sudden sight of the Duke outside with a hand to her mouth, wary of Uncle Bill, who was just outside, chopping up the firewood by their front yard. Had he heard her shriek in alarm, he would have abandoned his task to immediately check up on her. And she didn’t want that.

In a hurry, Leyla moved to lock her bedroom door before turning back towards her open window.

Matthias was still decked in his hunting gear. The dust and grime of his day’s activities adorning the expensive clothing, while the faint smell of blood lingered on him. She could see some specks of blood by his sleeves, and the front of his red hunting jacket.

“Your pigeon is over there.”

Matthias raised his head lightly to point towards the other end of the window frame where Phoebe, her precious bird, was calmly resting.

She held in her cry of relief at seeing the bird, focusing back on the Duke who was standing outside her window.

His noble steed, who stood patiently behind him made him look all the more intimidating for her. However, the backdrop of the soft glow of orange sunset and slowly darkening skies also served to make him look more alluring, bringing out the colour of his eyes. She can’t help but feel slightly mesmerised by his figure.


“Have you thought about it?” Matthias interrupted her thoughts unknowingly, “On how you plan to return the favour?”

He inquired, gesturing once more towards Phoebe, while his gaze held onto Leyla’s, with one pristine brow rising up at her.

Leyla gulped nervously, eyes fleeting towards her bird momentarily before looking back at Matthias.

“I, I don’t think this counts as a favour,” she softly began, before slightly gaining more confidence, “After all, you were only keeping your word.”

Leyla pointed out anxiously, but Matthias only smirked at her in a rather smug manner, making her retrace a few steps back.

“Though I am very grateful.” She added, lowering her gaze.

“Grateful, you say?” he smirked, “And what could I do with gratitude?” Matthias prodded further.

“W-well,” Leyla stuttered slightly, “I think it means you are an honourable gentleman, who keeps his word.”

“Oho,” he lightly scoffed, taunting her in a subtle manner, “Are you then retracting your words from before?” Matthias asked, tilting her head, smirk still firmly in place.

Leyla frowned in confusion. What words?

“You described me as the furthest thing from a gentleman, if I recall correctly.” said Matthias as he leaned on the window frame, after seeing her confusion.

Leyla flushed in embarrassment as the memory resurfaced.

“I, forgive me,” she immediately spewed out, “I had been too imprudent at that time!”

Leyla bowed her head further, she felt as though she was digging herself further and further deeper into a grave. But no matter what was done, all she needed to do now was damage control.

“First you say I’m a gentleman, then the next I’m not, and now I’m once again one.” Matthias hummed, cocking a brow at her once more, “So which is it?”

“Y-you’re a gentleman.” She stuttered. He then pursed his lips in thought, as he regarded her slowly, raking his eyes up and down her person.

“Then does that make you the queen?” Matthias scoffingly asked.

Leyla blinked in confusion, brows furrowing as she racked her brain for a reason how the conversation had turned out this way when a memory resurfaced from when she yelled out at him by the stream in frustration…

“If you’re a gentleman, then I’m the Queen!”

She had meant it sarcastically of course, but now she found her words being used against her. Leyla wanted to deny it vehemently, but she could tell by the knowing smirk on his lips that her face was already too flushed in embarrassment at the memory.

Of course all this could have been prevented had she managed to let a few offhanded comments of his slide, but for some reason, Leyla at that time had failed to control her temper in front of him. Sure when it came to others she could play the perfect, polite girl act, but whenever it came to the Duke, something in her just seemed to do the opposite. It was a struggle to even keep her calm around him.

“I apologise for that day. And I sincerely thank you for keeping your promise. I mean it.”

Leyla apologised to him, though the hesitancy in her posture spoke in volumes. Silence reigned between them once more, the sound of Bill Remmer’s chopping axe the only one filling the void between them.

Matthias continued to regard her calmly, before sighing in feigned resignation.

“Ah, what should I do with you, Leyla?” His hand suddenly reaching out and gripping her chin to force her to look up at him. Matthias clicked his tongue as he pulled her closer to him, “I don’t need your gratitude after saving your bird.”

Feeling as though she was doused with a cold bucket of water, Leyla tried to shake his grip away from her, but he was much too strong. Matthias was stronger and faster, and not a second later did her vision blur as he too yanked her glasses off…

He had kissed her.

She tried to shake away from him, but too late did she realise that his other hand had come up behind her head and grabbed a handful of her hair when she felt a sharp pain as he lightly yanked her head back.

Leyla gasped out in pain, and that was the opportunity Matthias took to slide his hot tongue inside her mouth.

His tongue darted inside, exploring her mouth ravenously, before sensually entwining around hers. Leyla couldn’t help but moan at the sensation. In the background, she could still faintly hear Bill Remmer’s grunts loudly as he split some more firewood.

Leyla’ hands shifted, moving from the window sill and up to Matthias’ shoulder, trying to shove him away. But it only served to deepen their kiss instead.

This kiss now was quite different from the kiss she remembered having from last summer’s final day. The kiss that scarred her deep in her heart. Instead of the fierce devouring kiss he let her taste before, it was now firm, but gentler; demanding but more delicate against her lips.


It wasn’t long before his grip on her hair loosened up, allowing her to break free of his grasp. As she gasped for air, Leyla’s nose picked up his body scent; a blend of the blood of prey along with his minty fragrance.

She bit her lips defiantly as Matthias still held onto her chin resolutely, not letting her go just yet.

“Just a kiss?” he whispered in a sultry voice, “Is your precious bird’s life just this much?”

Such a seductively coercive tone fell on her ears. Unfortunately, she neither had time or the strength to think past her current panic. All she could feel was the way her body locked up in place as she stared at him in a flushed manner, her mouth agape as she continued to breath in air. Suddenly, she was yanked forward, her face now a hair’s breadth away from his.

“Ackh!” Leyla exclaimed.

Matthias regarded her face a little bit, eyes flitting around her features. The grip on her chin was tightening up, she feared he would crush it sooner. Leyla let out a quiet gasp as the grip pained her, before his tongue dove back in her mouth…

All she could think about then was how she’d much rather be in pain instead. However, Matthias was persistent in his efforts, his tongue resuming their previous ministrations, dancing expertly around her own tongue as he tasted every nook and cranny in her mouth.

Their bellicose kiss continued, coupled by the loud grunts of Bill, alongside the splitting firewood. Each time Matthias intertwined his tongue with hers and sucked on it, she gasped for breath, squeezing his shirt, letting out involuntary moans that seemed to have been scraped up from the depth of her throat with every brush of his tongue against hers.

With every noise she made, Leyla felt so ashamed of herself. She could feel herself grow dizzier with each passing moment, her body moving in response to whatever he was doing.

Even her hands, who were tirelessly pushing him away, can now only hang limply on his shoulders. She could feel the prickling of tears begin to form, willing them not to fall…

Finally, Matthias let her go, letting her gasp for air when he felt her cheeks grow wet, and a sob mixed with her moans.

Their lips were now moist with each other’s saliva, making it glisten in the dark. Leyla felt her knees go weak, but she caught herself before she fell to the floor completely at the thought of how the two of them looked like right now.

“Leyla!”

Uncle Bill’s voice shook Leyla from her unforgiving thoughts.

“Leyla! Could you bring me a glass of refreshing water?” he requested.

‘Answer Leyla,’

She thought to herself,

‘I must answer quickly!’

She urged, but her movements were sluggish as she dazedly stared at the way Matthias took out his handkerchief. Leyla watched him slowly bring it up to his lips and wipe off the evidence of what they had done.

It was only when he slightly tugged her face forward did she remember he was still gripping her chin.

Next he brought the same handkerchief he used, to wipe off the evidence from her lips as well.

Calmly Matthias picked up her glasses he had discarded earlier and replaced them back to where they should be until finally releasing his grip on her.

“Leyla?”

The sound of Bill chopping firewood suddenly stopped when he began to wonder why there was no reply.

“Wash it and bring it back.”

Matthias ordered, taking hold of her hand, making her fingers grasp the used cloth firmly. He rubbed a few small circles on her wrist before swiftly letting her go, and turned around to ride atop his steed.

“Leyla, child! Is there something wrong?”

Uncle Bill’s footsteps shook Leyla out of her daze as she noticed them grow closer. Hurriedly, she shut the windows, and drew the curtains closed. Immediately, she rushed back towards her door and swung it open, just before Uncle Bill’s hand, which was raised to knock, was about to hit it.

“Sorry, uncle. I… I was sleeping for a moment.” she lamely excused, making a show of fixing her hair, which Matthias had been gripping not too long ago.

“Hmm, I did wonder why you were taking so long.” Uncle Bill told her.

“I, I’ll get started on dinner right away!”

“No need to rush lass,” he placated her, “Make sure you’re properly awake first. You can slow down.” He reminded her, smiling at her fondly.

Bill gently patted her on the head before turning around back into the front yard, picking up a glass of water on his way out, before leaving her alone.

As soon as she heard the front door shut, only then did Leyla allow herself to feel faint, and unceremoniously dropped to the floor…


Matthias’s handkerchief, which was in her weakened grip, fluttered around her as it too fell, and innocently sank in front of her crestfallen form.


Chapter 58.


Play With Me.




The Principal’s lips pursed into a thin line, her face set with a slight frown as she regarded the woman across from her. Leyla, on the other hand, sat calmly, yet resolutely as she waited for her decision. From her eyes alone, the Principal could see that Leyla was determined about this.

“Are you sure of this, Miss Lewellin?” She asked Leyla anyway, her eyes peeking above her spectacles to look at her. Leyla only nodded in response.

“Yes. I’d like to do that.” She responded immediately, as though the thought hadn’t just hit her out of nowhere. She wasn’t kidding about her desire to move away. To teach in a different school, a much farther school.

“Forgive me for prying, but,” The Principal hummed as she rested her chin above her clasped hands, scrutinizing Leyla some more, “Isn’t this school the closest one to home? Why would you wish to be transferred away?”


As far as she knew, Leyla only had to pedal her bike to commute to school everyday. She was asking, not because Leyla was a seasoned teacher, but because she was a hard worker. Sure, she was a novice, often lacking experience in handling matters which would cause a few headaches along her way, but she could see the potential the girl had.

In short, she had grown quite fond of Leyla. As a matter of fact, this school was also the best choice she could have of growing experience and a career.

“Should I also point out that the other Carlsbar schools lack an opening to hire you?” The Principal inquired, sighing briefly, “In addition to that, you would have to move away, find a place to stay in, as well as travel quite a few times just to switch schools?”

“Yes, I understand, and I’m prepared to do it.”

Leyla did think about those things. It was impossible not to. But she knew she needed to do this. The Principal hummed in thought before leaning back on her chair.

“If there is a problem within the school, then I assure you, we can handle this Leyla.” She said softly, “Has there been some troubles between your students? Colleagues?”

“No! There has been no trouble.” Leyla vehemently denied, “The teachers have been good to me, you most especially. And the children are absolute angels, it’s just…” the words caught in her throat. How was she to explain her reasons for leaving were not even work-related?



“Just…?” The Principal prodded, a pristine brow raised at her for further inquiry. Leyla schooled her features, smiling politely.

“I’ve thought about this not because of my troubles in school, but rather because I feel as though I need more experience outside my comfort zone.” Leyla explained, “I want to broaden my horizon, move past my home so that I could better my skills, for me and the children I will teach.” she finished. The Principal whizzed at her answer, minutely impressed.

“How eloquently put.” She sighed in resignation, “If that is what you truly want, then who am I to deny that?” She looked down on her work table and began rearranging papers, “Fortunately, there are many who also wish to gain experience here in Carlsbar, so finding a replacement for you shouldn’t be too difficult.”

“Thank you so much for your consideration!” She thanked profusely. Leyla knew that her experience in Carlsbar was good for experience. The school was fairly prestigious, located in a flourishing city not too far away from the capital of the Berg Empire. A prime job opportunity, in fact, that she landed a job in such a place despite her lack of experience.

But it was the only excuse she could think of that would suffice the Principal of her requesting a transfer of schools, far away from home.


“Though you will still need to serve the full semester before your transfer can be processed.” The Principal continued, “However, should you change your mind, feel free to come back and retract your transfer.”

Leyla doubted she would ever retract her request, even if she was given a whole semester to think about it. She was resolute in moving far away from this place. Thanking her once more, Leyla got up and left the headmistress’ office, softly shutting the door behind her, and walked back to her classroom before letting out a long sigh of relief.

Checking she was alone, Leyla moved towards the window, watching the leaves of the oak tree outside gently sway with the wind before its stem snapped and fluttered towards the ground. Autumn was nearing its end as winter crept in ever slowly.

The sun’s rays flowed between its almost barren tree branches, filtering in the light seeping through her windows, casting elongated shadows across her face.

‘I have to leave Arvis.’ she thought to herself, taking in the sight of what would serve to be her last autumn in the school.

Leyla did, in fact, think this through carefully. It took her quite a few sleepless nights and busy days before she reached such a decision. As much as it pained her to be leaving and thus wouldn’t be able to spend more precious time with her Uncle Bill, she didn’t want to repeat the events that happened with Kyle.

She had learned her lesson. She could no longer hold onto impractical wants and desires. It would only complicate things more, make it harder for her in the long run, and ruin everything she had been working hard for.

So Leyla decided to focus on her original plans.

Besides, just because she’d become a teacher in the neighbouring city or somewhere further did not mean she couldn’t come to visit Uncle Bill from time to time. She reckoned she could even turn it into weekly visits if she would do it during her weekends.

And maybe lodging and board would turn out to be expensive in a foreign place and delay further preparations she had when continuing college education. Still, it was a far better alternative to staying any longer here in Carlsbar.



She would do anything just to get away from that man and Arvis.

“It’ll be alright,” Leyla softly muttered to herself, “Everything will be alright soon. You’ll see.” she repeated.


Perhaps after repeating those phrases over and over, she would start believing in them. And so, schooling a smile over her lips, she went back to her desk.

She was no stranger to moving, after all. Her entire childhood consisted of her moving around from one place to the next, staying with relatives, one after another. It made her feel miserable as a child, but it certainly imparted quite a few valuable life lessons, which she found handy right now.

Yes, she was an adult now, with a loving uncle to support her every endeavour. Everything would definitely turn out fine in the end.

Unconsciously, her fingers went up to gently rub her lips in a back and forth motion. She took in a deep breath before standing up to put on her coat. She fixed her belongings and packed what she needed into her bag for the next few days before her breathing stuttered at the sight of a simple white cloth.

There, stuffed innocently inside one of her bag’s inner pockets, was the Duke’s handkerchief. Memories of their latest kiss assaulted her mind before she shook them away and breathed in deeply.

She couldn’t allow him to affect her any further. And so, without further ado, she locked her classroom as she left and went out of the building. She beelined to her bike, hoisting herself over the seat as she did a thousand times before, and began to pedal through Arvis.

She knew where she was going next.



Riette von Lindman dutifully drove his car, eyes kept resolutely on the road. His grip on the steering wheel lightened as he made a soft turn, entering the path leading up to Arvis Estate. As soon as he passed the boundary, he caught in his peripheral a woman, taking shade under the tree.

He slowed down to a stop, eyes glancing in her direction. He took note of the bicycle propped against the tree as she stood idly waiting for someone.

‘Who is she waiting for?’ Riette hummed in wonder at sight. This was certainly quite the surprise, and he wanted to know what she was there for. He unbuckled and got out of the car, locking the door behind him. As he neared the woman, he blinked as he recognized her.

“Good day Miss Lewellin.” he greeted as soon as he was near enough to be heard.

Leyla, who had been busy spacing out, snapped her head up at the unexpected presence of the Marquis.

In her anxiousness, she staggered back when he stopped before her.

“Marquis Lindman, a good day to you as well.” she politely greeted back after a whole minute, though the nervousness in her persisted. Nervously she looked around, noticing they were alone, and unconsciously stepped back away from him, putting more distance between them.


She was already nervous being in the estate; she didn’t need any noble poking around to see why she was here as well. But of course, she was never that lucky.

“What are you doing here?” Riette asked her.

Leyla struggled to answer him. What could she say? The more she thought about why she was even here in the first place, the more she felt stiff and frozen on the spot. She couldn’t answer him.

Riette, on the other hand, watched as she slowly paled, silence reigning between them after his inquiry.

It didn’t take him long to piece out the puzzle, and he let out an amused chuckle at her terror.

“Hmm, well let’s see, the it couldn’t be the doctor’s son,” Riette chuckled, eyes watching her in scrutiny, “He’s not in the estate at the moment.” He pretended to think about it for a few more moments before gasping in mock dramatics, “Could it be? You’re here for Duke Herhardt himself?”

Leyla’s eyes snapped back to him at his mocking tone. She could feel her cheeks flush, eyebrows furrowing in response, the shame she felt hidden in her eyes by the glasses she wore.

Riette drew closer, hands clasped behind his back, lowering his mouth next to her ear…“The man whom Miss Lewellin is waiting for must be Matthias, right?” He whispered before straightening up, putting some distance between them once more.

Upon hearing his suspicions once more, Leyla felt her palms turn clammy, cold sweat slid down her temples, her knuckles turning white as the grip on her bag tightened in frustration.

She was only here to return the Duke’s handkerchief, but how was it that she felt as though she’d been strapped with a time bomb instead? She didn’t want to be trapped alone with him at the annex, so instead, she waited here, by the road…

Oh, what a mistake that was.

“Cat got your tongue, hmm?” Riette mused, “Why? Did I hit too close to home?”

“Forgive my rudeness, but I must leave now, Marquis.” Leyla forced herself to say, discreetly manoeuvring her bag behind her as she turned to indeed leave the place. She’d catch the Duke at a different time instead.

However, Riette was taller and nimbler than her. He managed to catch up to her quickly, herding her to a stop as he blocked her exit.

“Ah, won’t you wait a little while for my dear cousin?” he asked, “You haven’t seen him yet, and you’ve surely waited for sometime now. It would be quite a waste of time to leave now.”

“I’m sure it wasn’t a waste, excuse me.” Leyla dodged once more to pass through him, but instead, Riette grabbed her by the shoulder and held her back.


“Oh but I insist!” He exclaimed, “By the way, did you know that the Duke is actually not at home right now?” He told her informatively, “In fact, he left to escort his fiance!” He emphasised, “Does that upset you, oh poor Miss Lewellin?”

Leyla frantically tried to get away from his grip, which in turn was also beginning to get on his nerves the more she struggled. Couldn’t she see beyond her fear he was trying to help!?

When Riette had initially stopped and approached her, he had only meant to tease her a little. However, when he learned or rather guessed correctly that she had indeed been waiting for Matthias, the teasing turned into pity. The poor thing didn’t even realise her precious Duke had gone and left the estate.

He sympathised greatly; after all, he too was in his very own tragic love affair. Riette firmly believed she was also suffering the effects of heartbreak at the news, the same way he suffered when he’d witnessed Matthias heading out the mansion to escort his fiance, Claudine, this morning.

The painful sting of longing was still heavy in his heart, so of course, he understood her. But that didn’t mean he wasn’t against playing with her a little longer for his amusement.

“Though come to think of it, Matthias is quite the simple man isn’t he?” Riette continued to hold her back, his grip on her shoulder tightening before he grabbed hold of her bike instead, effectively stopping her from leaving. “Also, your relationship with him, isn’t it akin to that of a mistress?”

“Wha-what?!” Leyla hissed, her breath hitching at the accusation.

“Yes, yes, that’s the exact word.” Riette insisted, straightening up as he held her bike far from her, “You’re almost like the Duke’s mistress, are you not?” He blinked innocently before smirking at the growing rage on her face, “What? Too vulgar for your tastes, Miss Lewellin?”

Leyla was fuming at the blatant insult to her face. She wanted to tear that smug look off his face in response to baseless accusations. Though that didn’t help in easing the shame as she remembered the latest kiss the Duke and her shared, never mind the fact she had been reluctant to do so.

“It is, isn’t it?” Riette found it amusing to keep pushing more and more of her buttons. “If so, then I deeply apologise for using such a word.” He continued to mock, tilting his head for added effect, but the smugness was still there.

“Give me back my bike!” Leyla demanded in anger, arms reaching out to yank her possession away from him, but he dodged her quickly, effectively keeping her bike out of reach.

“Now, I feel a little disappointed that you, the esteemed Miss Lewellin, who like both the doctor’s son and Duke Herhardt, couldn’t even stand to be around me! Oh, how you wound me!” Riette feigned dramatics as he swooned in mock pain. “Very well, here’s your bike.” and he let it go.

Leyla immediately moved to gather her bike, but in her haste to get it, she had let go of her bag, allowing the Marquis to snatch it up quickly. She gasped in panic, abandoning her bike instead as she began to run after the Marquis, who was now busying himself with her bag’s contents.


“Perhaps I could find something here for me instead.” he teased her once more. Twisting and dodging around her to keep it out of reach from Leyla. “I don’t know about the doctor’s son, but I’m sure I can be more interesting than Matthias.”

“Give back my bag!”

“Come to think of it, even Matthias and I look quite alike.” He pointed out, pausing as he touched his chin and looked down on her, raising her bag high above him, “Don’t you think so, Miss Lewellin? Although I can’t give you as much affection as Duke Herhardt, I’m sure I can still make you happy.”

Uncaring of how she would look, Leyla grabbed on his arm as she jumped to retrieve her stolen bag. She could feel the growing frustration threatening to burst inside her as her eyes blurred and lips began to tremble.

“Let the dull Duke get along with his boring fiancée, and in the meantime, play with me, Miss Lewellin.” Riette said in a sing-song voice as he kept the bag out of reach from her.

It was undoubtedly quite amusing for him to watch her hop on her tippy-toes to reach for her bag, as though it held all the treasures in the world. Ah well, his hand was beginning to feel numb, and so he immediately dropped it back down and let her have it back as well.

“Give it back!”

Leyla wasted no time in snatching it away from his fingers, wrapping it close to her bosom protectively.

She sniffed and grabbed her abandoned bike, righted it up and hoisted herself over, and pedalled away.

In her haste, she failed to notice her striped shoes slip off.

“Oh, come on now, I was only teasing!” Riette called out after her, “Oh Miss Lewellin, I promise to be a good boy!”

But Leyla was no longer listening and was gaining steady distance between them. Riette only sighed in pity before noticing the shoes left behind.

He picked it up, turning it over in his hands before groaning in resignation, and began sprinting towards the direction she left before disappearing by the corner.

SCREEEEECH!

He didn’t get too far before he heard the alarming sound of a collision between something metallic and another object. Riette slowly began to pick up pace as alarm bells rang in his head!

As soon as he turned the corner, he stopped in bewilderment when he saw the sight of a downed woman in the middle of the road in front of a familiar black car, who seemed to have skidded to a stop.


Riette stood frozen in place, unsure of what to do when someone hurriedly exited the car. The driver, it seemed, was the first to check up on the woman who stayed still on the ground, and soon a couple had emerged from the back…

Matthias and Claudine.

“Oh my god! Leyla!” Claudine exclaimed in panic as she saw the woman. Riette could only stand dumbly as he stared at the scene before him, taking in Leyla’s crumpled form and her dented bike by the front of the car.

Riette’s eyes then were drawn towards Matthias, who regarded Leyla’s prone form with indifference. In Leyla’s arms, she still clutched her bag like a precious artefact. Matthias raked his eyes over her before his gaze turned to the side to meet Riette’s gaze, who stood uselessly in front of an overhead lamplight.



It was fortunate that the accident looked worse than it actually was. Despite having been hit by the car, Leyla had only sustained minor injuries, and thus, still managed to stand and walk fairly well. Matthias had suggested taking her to the hospital to be sure, but Leyla had stubbornly refused.

After confirming she was fine, Matthias deemed it fit to put the incident behind them.

“Let’s get back to the mansion now.” He announced, glancing around at the servants with them, who had been attending to Leyla. Though the servants were particularly concerned about Leyla, they did nothing as they watched her until she disappeared from their sight.

“Yes, that would be a good idea.”

Claudine readily agreed after bidding Riette goodbye. So that was the end of that. Matthias dutifully escorted her back into the car. Riette, who looked flushed, following shortly behind them as he headed back into his, by the entrance of platanus road.

Claudine watched outside the car window, eyes staring worriedly as they both passed by Leyla. She couldn’t help but recall the way Leyla had absolutely rushed in front of the car. Normally, Claudine was a calm woman, but when Leyla appeared out of nowhere and got hit by the car, she assumed the worst!

“I thought she got hit pretty hard. I’m glad that she is fine.” Claudine sighed in relief. Speaking of Leyla, she recalled the way Riette had been holding onto Leyla’s shoes just moments after he rounded the corner where Leyla got hit.

She must admit, she almost let her composure slip at that very moment. She had not expected Riette to be that rash and impatient. Claudine’s eyes shifted to her peripheral, discreetly scrutinising her fiance. She expected something after that near-death scare for Leyla, but she could not read him at all.

Even after this, he was still so indifferent.


If she didn’t know any better, she would have thought he did not care for Leyla at all. Matthias didn’t even look livid about the driving hitting her accidentally, nor questioned Riette about why he had been holding onto her shoes.

How very typical of Duke Herhardt.

By the time they reached the front door of the mansion, and the car came to a stop, Claudine couldn’t help but feel sorry for Leyla.



Chapter 59.

Decent Adult.



It did not take long before they reached the mansion. Once the car came to a stop, Matthias got out first, before holding his arm out for Claudine, who took it as she exited as well. They were then led towards the reception room, where two ladies-in-waiting stood to receive them, alongside his cousin, Riette.

’What if Claudine was mistaken?’

Riette thought as he observed his cousin. One would think he would at least show some bit of concern towards the incident on Leyla, but Matthias remained calm and composed throughout the whole thing.

If Claudine was in fact correct in her assumption about the Duke being enamoured with the orphan, surely there would be some sort of reaction from him seeing Leyla get hurt. He knew he would if it was Claudine.


His cousin wasn’t an idiot as well, and was wise enough to cover up the earlier incident and brush it off as something trivial. Still, it was baffling for Riette to see Matthias so indifferent. What were his true feelings towards the girl?

He’d get to the bottom of things, one way or the other. And so they had dinner served early in consideration for Claudine. As quick as it started, so did it end, and she retired early, leaving the two men alone, to head towards Matthias’ study.

“To be honest, she looked quite lonely, waiting for your arrival on her own.” Riette started, “So I decided to go and give her some bit of cheer when I arrived. I might have teased her some, but I had not expected her to be so afraid and run away.”

He eyed Matthias carefully, watching for any subtle hints of emotion as he sat across from the Duke in the study. When there was no change with Matthias, Riette cleared his throat, before languidly leaning back on the chair.

“I’m talking about her, by the way,” He clarified, “Miss Leyla Lewellin.”

The name spilling out of Riette’s mouth as though he was spitting out sand, albeit in mild distaste. Much of what he said was indeed true. He might have gotten a little physical, but he’d only meant to tease her.



“Ah.” Matthias hummed, indifferent as ever, but sharp eyes regarding the Marquis in scrutiny. He then let out a low, yet amused chuckle, before sighing at him, looking quite amused by his cousin’s antics.

It wasn’t the reaction of someone affected by a loved one’s near-death experience. It seemed too real to be fake, Riette thought to himself.

“I guess even a womaniser by the likes of Riette von Lindman have their limitations!” teased Matthias, “Imagine that, you, getting rejected by a woman. Such a woman does exist.” He declared jovially. Riette couldn’t help but chuckle back.

“What? Such slander!” They both laughed at each other before it died down eventually. Matthias’ eyes softened a little bit before turning serious.

“Well, it does serve you right.” Matthias told him, smoothly opening the silver box on his desk and took out a cigarette. He flipped his lighter to light the end before offering one to Riette, who in turn took one for himself as well.

Both men settled back in their respective chairs, languidly puffing out smoke. Riette continued to regard Matthias carefully, wondering what would happen now. He was mostly convinced by now, after the laugh they shared moments ago, that Matthias could care less about Leyla.


‘I can’t help but feel sorry for Leyla after all,’ Riette thought as they continued to puff smoke, ‘To think he’d treat her this pathetically.’

“Not one of my best moments, I’d admit to that.” Riette said, sinking further into the comfy chair. He felt as though he and Claudine had made complete fools out of themselves.

(‘That girl over there, doesn’t she resemble the canary Duke Herhardt raises in his bedroom?’)

Those were the words Claudine said last summer during one afternoon as she had been looking out the window, still all smiles and hearts filled with light. She had been busy looking at Leyla Lewellin, who had been returning home after a day’s work in the garden.

Riette could still remember the way Leyla looked at that moment. Her voluminous blonde hair bounced softly with every step, swaying as the wind fluttered through her. The sweat on her brow glistened, making her shine in the afterglow of the setting sun. She did greatly resemble a bird, whose wings were flapping so exquisitely.

( ‘Are you possibly wanting to tell me that Matthias started to raise a canary because of her?’)

He had asked Claudine in disbelief that day. She only looked at him meaningfully, all confident as she gave him a clandestine smile.

Yes, Claudine conveyed wordlessly. She was so certain, Riette couldn’t help but believe her. She was always so rational, so logical, so he trusted that she wouldn’t make such a decision lightly on a small coincidence. After all, he too had been a little apprehensive with Matthias’ sudden change of heart in raising a bird.

Coupled with the fact he had overheard that Matthias had planned to create a rift between Leyla and Kyle Etman, it seemed more and more plausible that Claudine’s assumptions were correct.




‘But how can he act like this?’ The more he pondered about it, Riette felt as if he had lost his way in a maze of increasingly complex questions.

How could he act so indifferent towards the woman he has strong feelings for? Sit across him and make jokes about the way his cousin acted so callously towards her, leading to injury? And if Claudine had indeed been right, what did that mean about their relationship with each other?

‘Have they broken up already? But then why does Matthias still care for the canary, safely tucked in his bedroom?’

“Riette von Lindman.” Matthias spoke up, blowing a drawn out puff of smoke, looking at his cousin now with indifferent eyes. Riette, who had been preoccupied with his growing questions, looked up at the sound of his name, schooling his expression immediately. “Why don’t you create your scandals in your own estate and not mine?”


Though Matthias slightly quirked up the corner of his lips into a smile, his eyes told a different story. “Don’t you remember? I’m willing to do anything to keep Arvis in order.” He blew one last puff of smoke before disposing of his newly used cigarette to light up a new stick.

Both cousins locked eyes on one another, Matthias resolutely trailed on Riette, who still could not pick up any hint of his emotions. There was no tell of jealousy, anger or anything else, other than indifference. In fact, Matthias greatly resembled that of a mischievous child.

‘Your cousin was a gentlemanly demon.’

Riette’s mind flashed back to the officer he met not too long ago. He held quite the appalled expression as he had been describing how the Duke looked like while on the battlefield. Riette involuntarily swallowed his saliva, making his mouth feel dry. His hands lightly shook the longer they kept eye contact.

“I’m sure you know that better than anyone else.” Matthias finished in a low tone, warning him slightly before breaking eye contact. At that moment, Riette could see his cousin looked a little worse for wear, a slight look of fatigue could be seen in his face.

‘I don’t understand him.’ Riette thought, before sighing out, his smoke mixing with the growing fog in the room as both men continued to puff out their cigarettes. ‘Perhaps a little more provocation is in order, though I do wonder…’

His thoughts trailed off as he regarded the growing embers at the end of his stick. He brought it to his mouth and took a long breath in, before blowing another drawn out puff into the office…

‘I wonder if the answers I will find, prove useful to you, Claudine?’ and so Riette swallowed back down his nervousness to calm his nerves.



Tap. Tap. Tap.

The familiar sound of Phoebe pecking her window broke through the silence of the dimly lit room. Normally, Leyla would have opened it up to let her bird in. However, she found herself stuck in her head, staring into nothing but the space in front of her as she curled in on herself, lying on her side on the bed.

She blinked occasionally, looking but not really seeing what was in front of her. Should anyone stare at her eyes now, they’d find themselves feeling as though they were looking inside a deep, yet empty well.

Leyla couldn’t remember how the accident happened or how she returned to the cabin. She had simply wanted to run away from Marquis Lindman, but next thing she knew, she was met with a burst of light coming towards her, and not a second later, felt faint pain that spread throughout her entire body.

Though it hurt a lot to be hit, it felt nothing compared to when she found out that the car she was hit with belonged to Duke Herhardt, who had been inside during the incident, with his fiance, Claudine.

At that moment the physical pain she felt was nothing compared to the sudden sting inside her heart.

All she could think about at that moment was to escape, to be as far away as possible from them.

A few more minutes had passed before she was finally back to herself, but opted to remain in bed for a little while longer. The accident earlier left her with no tear on her skin or fracture in her bones. But it did leave behind a few bruises, and pain in her left shoulder and back, which took most of the hit. It felt as though her bones would crack every time she moved.

She should probably get some sleep in, and rest early, but the pain made it impossible to even close her eyes. Eventually Leyla managed to convince herself to get up from her fetal position to open the window for Phoebe to get in.

Once the bird fluttered by the windowsill, Leyla noticed there was a note attached by her bird’s ankle. Her eyes narrowed as she suspected the note might have come from Duke Herhardt. She was certain of that.

With a deep sigh, Leyla untied the note, and lightly caressed Phoebe for a moment. Sensing that she had done its job, Phoebe flew back to its cage, having eaten its fill back at the Duke’s mansion.

Leyla pursed her lips as she stared at the note, pondering if she could leave the note unread. Deciding otherwise, she quickly closed her window shut and sat down by the edge of the bed. She unrolled the note open, grabbing her glasses by the pillow beside her to read its content.

[You need to bring the handkerchief, Leyla. If you don’t come here, I’ll go there instead.]

Leyla’s hand shook as she read the note, her fists clenching at the trepidation that came over her. She soon dropped the crumpled letter on the bed, before sliding down in anxiousness. She clutched the end of the bed, hands fisting over the sheets as her body shook, before she let out a quiet sob.

Her hands came up shakily to grab her glasses, tossing it carelessly aside before burying her face into her pillow to release a muffled scream! She felt as if she was going mad!

‘If only… If only I could run to a place far away from this man.’

However no matter how hard she wished, reality still caught up to her. She was still here, she was still in Arvis, which meant she was still within his reach. Which brought her back to the letter’s content.

Should she decide not to go to him, he would not hesitate to come to her instead. He wouldn’t mind it too, if he was to be caught by Uncle Bill.

‘Should that happen then Uncle Bill would…’ Leyla’s thoughts trailed off as she recalled one of the things her Uncle Bill had told her some time ago…

‘You’ll become a pretty decent adult.’

Uncle Bill’s fond smile, and soft voice filtered through her mind, bringing fresh tears into Leyla’s eyes. No matter what others had said about her, what rumours spread, Uncle Bill had always been there for her.


He believed in her when no one else did. He had been, still is, proud of her and her achievements. He made sure she knew that too.

“You’re almost like the Duke’s mistress, are you not?”

That one sentence, from Marquis Lindman immediately crushed the light feeling from Uncle Bill, with a bitterness that was hard to swallow.

She struggled for a while, but managed to find footing to raise herself up from the floor. Leyla gingerly reached out for her bag, which had been thrown haphazardly on her desk, and took out the handkerchief that had been weighing her down all day.

Resolving to end this quickly, she clutched the handkerchief and immediately turned to leave her room, locking it behind her. As she passed by the living room, Leyla slowed her steps as she listened to Uncle Bill’s soft and steady snores. She hated that she had to leave Uncle Bill, but she knew she needed to if she wanted to escape Matthias.

She really despised the Duke, so much…, so she felt as though her heart would burst into flames. It didn’t matter if it was Marquis Lindman who had been the indirect cause of her accident, it was the Duke’s involvement with her to blame everything going wrong in her life.

She walked out of their house, and braved the woods at night, with only the moonlight to light her way.

Overhead the clouds rolled by, often dimming the moon’s glow, but Leyla could see just fine in the dark.

She was familiar with these woods.

She walked the same path she always took towards the annex, reaching the clearing that led to the Schulter river in no time. Leyla picked up her pace, eager to put this entire thing behind her. She was freezing, as the nightly chill washed over her, but her cheeks burned with her frustration, giving her heat in the cold.

“You came.”

Leyla stopped when she heard the voice from the darkness. It was Matthias. He was leaning against the railing by the stairway that led outdoors, connected towards the dock and the annex’s second floor. His gaze was resolutely locked onto her form, regarding her with a resigned air.

“I was just about to leave.” He hummed, before he pushed himself off the railing, and began to saunter towards her with a predatory grin as she stood frozen in place. Once he was only a step away from her, he stopped in his tracks and took in the sight of her.

Leyla’s blonde locks were tussled by the wind, her hair and skirt swaying slightly with the night breeze. He also took note of the goosebumps up and down her arms, and the slight shiver she involuntarily made.

“Aren’t you cold?” He frowned in concern as he noted she wasn’t dressed warmly.


Leyla scoffed at the sudden concern he was showing her. Where was it when she had been hit by his car earlier? But that didn’t matter to her, not anymore.

She thrust her hand out in front of Matthias, her hand holding the clean handkerchief towards him to take. “Here, I’m returning your handkerchief to you.” She huffed out, cold puffs of smoke escaping her.

“Leyla-” but Matthias got cut off, as she hastily made him take the handkerchief back, before pulling away from him.

“Goodbye then Duke,” She bid him adieu, “I hope to never see you again, ever.” She finished, turning swiftly on her heels. Her task was done, and she felt some weight lift off her shoulders the more she put some distance between them.

Only her soft footfalls echoed through the forest. Leyla breathed in the earthy scent of the trees around her, making her head feel clear and refreshed despite her dark surroundings, despite the way her body shook with every step due to her bruised body.

“I order you to stop, Leyla!” Matthias commanded, a few steps behind her, making Leyla jolt in surprise.

She attempted to break out into a run, but found her body frozen after hearing his command.

He caught up to her in no time.

“Leyla,” He called out to her softly, his hands grazing the back of her hand, trailing it up to her left shoulder, before she regained her movement and slapped his hand away from her. “Leyla!” Matthias exclaimed in frustration.

Immediately he crowded into her personal space, face set into a frown as he grabbed her, and lifted her bridal style as though she weighed nothing more than a feather.

“Ackh!”

Leyla choked on her scream at the sudden change in orientation, before realising what was happening to her.

“No! Let me go! Let go!” She yelped, struggling against his hold, but Matthias resolutely held onto her, before shifting his hold on her and hauled her over his shoulder like she was a sack of potatoes.

Leyla kept thumping her fists against his back, kicking and screaming against him but he made no indication he had been affected by anything she’d done so far. Matthias resolutely climbed up the flight of stairs into the annex building all poised and steady despite his struggling companion.

Leyla’s screams grew louder with each step, but they were deep enough into the forest and no one else would hear them at this time of night. Matthias kept walking down the corridor, leading them both towards the reception room.

He then reached his bedroom, opening the door without delay, before dragging Leyla inside.


Chapter 60.




I Won’t Make It Hurt.



Leyla continued to thrash in Matthias’ hold, squirming whichever way she could. Suddenly she felt her whole body shift once more, before she was unceremoniously dumped off of him.

It was only when her back hit the familiar feeling of a soft bed did she realise where he had taken her and what he planned to do with her. She looked around frantically before scrambling to get up the bed.

“N,no! Go away! No!” Leyla screamed hysterically, the pain in her body momentarily forgotten. The white sheets which had been painstakingly prepared just this morning began to wrinkle beneath her weight, her thrashing crumpling the sheets in no time.

“Stay still.” Matthias ordered sternly, immediately catching one of Leyla’s flailing wrists and pulled her still…

“Ackh!”

The pain she had forgotten returned in full force, bringing tears into her eyes as she yelped in pain.

Matthias frowned, and immediately released his hold on her.

Just as he did, Leyla twisted her body further away from him that she had almost fallen off the bed. Fortunately, Matthias’ reflexes were quick, and managed to stop her from toppling over, this time his hold gentler from moments ago. However his resumed contact with her only served to make Leyla thrash some more in panic.

“Let go! Let go of me!” She shrieked, but Matthias held onto her resolutely, careful not to put too much pressure on her this time. Leyla continued to thrash, making him take a deep breath.



“If I let go of you now while you move so recklessly then you’ll only injure yourself further.” He tried explaining, but Leyla wasn’t listening, continuing to thrash around in order to escape from him.

“No! No! No!” She kept pushing him away. The more she protested, the more it grated on Matthias’ nerves. He won’t say it out loud, but he would admit to himself that he misplaced his anger a while ago on Leyla when he had scolded and grabbed her harshly.

The anger was for his cousin, Riette von Lindman, after all. And he had dumped it on her in a fit of anger.

However now, he could only feel concern over her battered body.

Matthias knew very well that Leyla would have hidden from her Uncle Bill the fact she had been involved in a car accident, much less had been the victim of one, so he had prepared beforehand some medicine, safely tucked away in his room at the annex. He brought it here, all the way from his mansion.

He had planned to bring her here from the start, reeling her in with the sparsely written note he had attached to the leg of her precious bird. Matthias can’t help but laugh mirthlessly to himself as he remembered how imprudent he had been acting, watching as she dragged herself to the edge of the bed.

Just as Leyla was about to bolt off the bed and out of the room, Matthias intercepted her and gently plopped her back onto the bed, making her huff out in surprise. She finally looked up at him and began to beg…

“Duke, don’t be like this, please.” She pleaded, hastily moving back from him as she attempted to escape once again, but Matthias swiftly got on top of her, straddling her waist, keeping her in place. He grabbed both of her wrists gently, pinning them over her head as he held her down.

Leyla struggled feebly beneath him, squirming futilely before sobs wracked her body as a terrible wave of helplessness washed over her. “St-stop, please,” She begged, fat tears streaming down her face, “Please, I’m begging you, stop! It hurts, it hurts so much…” She whispered.

She’d been paralyzed by both her fear and the Duke looming above her. The pain in her body screamed for relief the more she strained as she lay on the bed.

“Duke please,” Leyla called out pleadingly, whispering beneath him, “It hurts so much.” She sniffed, crying softly from under him. The Duke’s face began to blur as fresh tears kept forming, but she resolutely met his gaze, as he eyed her carefully.

“Did he touch you?” Matthias inquired, “Did Riette touch you in any way?” He whispered as he eyed her slowly from the face to the bottom of her belly.

Matthias tilted his head as his eyes met hers once more, prodding gently for her to answer truthfully. His hair swayed to the side as he did, revealing his intense gaze on her.

Immediately Leyla shook her head in denial despite the sobs wracking through her. She hated what Marquis Lindman had done to her, but hated all the more that Matthias had found out about it. He shouldn’t have to.

“N-no,” She began to explain, “He only teased me rather badly that I got so scared that I couldn’t help but just up and left in such a hurry.”


Matthias listened intently as she stammered through her explanation. The shaking of her body seemed to finally calm down after a few more rounds of her crying, then stopping, then crying again, until she calmed herself into exhaustion.



Her cheeks glistened with the streaks left by her tears. Gently, Matthias pried off his fingers that held down her arms before moving to caress her hands, gone was the strong grip from before replaced only with such gentle and tender caresses.

“Stay still, Leyla.” He murmured softly, interlocking their fingers together as Leyla stiffened beneath his touch on instinct. “Lie still,” He repeated as he held her gaze, “I promise it won’t hurt, not even a little.” and he dipped his head down a little closer to her.

Leyla forced herself to watch as Matthias loomed over her, eyes darting to her prone figure on the bed, then to the room they were in. The two of them were the only ones in the annex, which was located deeply inside the forest.

In her head she had already imagined the multiple scenarios she could have done to push him away and make her escape, but she knew there was no escape now. And that just pushed her deeper into despair.

“You promise?”

Leyla finally responded in a meek voice. She was being quite foolish right now, but she was also earnest.

She had no choice but to submit right now. She was at his mercy after all.

She hoped that he would also grant her a small mercy in her vulnerable state.

Leyla looked up at Matthias pleadingly as he remained unresponsive to her inquiry. She shivered as he stared at her some more. His eyes raked her up and down in appreciation, wetting his lips lightly at the sight of her tear-streaked face.

Finally, Matthias nodded at her in promise, making her sigh deeply in relief as she relaxed underneath him. He pulled himself away from her, hands digging into the pocket of his jacket where he had shoved the returned handkerchief carelessly in his haste to catch up to Leyla.

Leyla allowed herself to remain still despite being unbounded by the Duke’s hands, watching his hands, and believing in the promise he’d take care of her. She watched as he brought the handkerchief next to her forehead, and began slowly dabbing away the sweat on her brow.

Matthias kept gently wiping at her face, grabbing her chin gently to keep her eyes on his when she instinctively tried to turn her head away from him. Her emerald orbs shone brightly in the dimmed light. He tucked back her ear a few stray locks of her hair before fully standing up as he finished wiping her face clean.


Leyla watched attentively every move he made, struggling to stay still so as to not aggravate him. Matthias then got off the bed as he rummaged through some of the things he had set aside, and returned with a medicine box in hand.

He then sat down by the edge of the bed, and laid it on the bedside table, before turning to her calmly.

“Show me your injuries.” He gently ordered, and Leyla immediately shook her head frantically, and began retracting her words from before…

“Oh, there’s no need really! I wasn’t really injured even-”

“You said it hurts.” Matthias interrupted, “Your words were: it hurts… so much.” He reminded, eyes narrowed as he regarded her.

“No, I was… that was…”

Leyla stumbled through an explanation, unable to provide a good excuse on the spot as she gingerly sat up from her position. Her eyes darted everywhere around her but his.

Slightly annoyed by her stubbornness and refusal to look at him, Matthias began to uncuff the sleeves of her blouse, immediately gaining her attention. She panicked and began to struggle once more as he rolled them up to her elbows.

“I guess the arms were uninjured then?” He remarked dryly, swifting grabbing the hem of her skirts, riding them up further as it hiked above her knees.

Yelping in the suddeness of his actions, Leyla stilled his hands immediately, “Back!” She blurted out, “It’s… it’s my back… that hurts…” She trailed off in all honesty. Matthias stopped moving his hands as he stared at her, urging her to continue, “I hurt my back a little, and my left shoulder.” she reluctantly admitted.

He pursed his lips together, backing away from her to give her one more once over, to determine if she was telling the truth. His fingertips tapped on the lid of the medicine box rhythmically, making Leyla squirm in the silence between them, before the tapping stopped.

“I want to see it then.” He demanded, “Take it off.”

Leyla’s eyes snapped towards him, before shaking her head in denial once more, unwilling to remove any layers of clothing around him. But Matthias wouldn’t take no for an answer. His eyes narrowed at her before growling under his breath.

“If you won’t let me take a look, then I won’t hesitate to call the doctor for you!” He hissed and stood up, grabbing the medicine box with him. “And not just any doctor, mind you, but Dr. Etman!” He threatened her.


Leyla’s breath hitched at the thought, before shaking her head once more, pleading for him not to do it. She would rather drown by the Schulter River than be caught dead by Kyle’s father in such a compromising position! She looked practically scandalous as she lay on the Duke’s bed!

“Then make the choice Leyla.” He gave her an ultimatum, “Either strip and allow me to assess your injuries myself, or I will call for Dr. Etman.”



Matthias had left her alone with her thoughts, basking in the room’s silence for quite some time now.

Leyla’s body was still aching due to the strain it underwent with her thrashing and squirming.

Matthias waited patiently for her final decision. He reclined against the nearby chair as he continued to run his eyes up and down her figure.

He sighed deeply, watching her rumpled form on his bed, hair a mess and eyes swollen red. There was something sensual in the way she basked in the dim lighting, all shrouded in doubt, fear, sprinkled with a dash of hope and trust in him.

“Do… Do you really promise?”

Leyla finally asked, breaking the silence. Her eyes clenched shut as she resigned herself to her fate. It didn’t matter anyway if she would try to negotiate with him. His promises, her promises, they were only just words unless they made it true.

She was well aware by now that Matthias could do whatever it takes, just so he could get what he wanted in the end. Just as he once did before. The circumstances between them hadn’t changed. She was still bound to cross paths with him, doomed to suffer in his presence.

She would only complicate things further for herself if she would continue to resist. She had her answer now. She’s made a decision. But that didn’t stop the fresh tears from running down her face as she felt utterly useless in front of him.

The tears flowed, saturating her blouse the more she cried while Matthias continued to stare at her.

‘How happy he must be again to see me cry.’ Leyla thought miserably, she choked down her sobs, swallowing as she turned away from him, giving him a silent permission to undress her himself.

She felt the rustle of his clothes, and the dipping of the bed. Calloused hands came up to her shoulder, caressing her back gently as it trailed towards the buttons at the back of her blouse. Slowly, she felt the gradual loosening of her blouse as his fingers deftly unbotted it one by one…

Her body shook with sobs as she kept her head down, aiding in removing her blouse once everything had been unbuttoned. She wanted to keep even just a little bit of her pride by refusing to look at the Duke.


The cloth slid down her skin, revealing the soft, smooth flesh underneath. It had only been a second, but for Matthias it felt as though time moved slowly, sensually revealing inch by inch her skin, teasing him, goading him to touch it. From the slender slope of her neck, to her petite shoulders…

His eyes travelled further down, following the perfect curve of her back, riddled with blotches of red bruises. It looked as though any touch of his would bring her to her knees in front of him.

Matthias found himself mesmerised by the swelling on her back. It was littered everywhere on the expanse of her left shoulder blade, down to her waist. It was no wonder why she wailed like she did in pain.

He found himself amazed by her strength in brushing her injuries as if they were nothing as she continued to bike away from him. Though she did look a little pathetic as she did so as well, running away like a dog with her tail between her legs.

‘If I had ignored it , you would’ve hid your bruises and suffered all by yourself.’ Matthias thought, causing an anger-like feeling to well up inside him. Opting to push it down, he began to move, lightly touching the bruises…

Only Leyla yelped in pain, making her flinch away from him, twisting her body as if to shield her prone side despite her state of undress. He hummed in thought, a frown marring his face. It would prove difficult to treat her if a slight touch would cause her too much pain.

“Tell me if the pain gets worse.”

Matthias murmured softly as he moved his hands, touching the areas around the bruises instead as he assessed the extent of her injuries. Whenever she tensed up beneath his fingertips, or let out soft groans, he would ease up, and move to the next area after she had relaxed once more.

It was fortunate that Leyla could still move her arms and shoulders. The ribs and spine seemed to be fine as well. Overall, she was in good condition considering a car had hit her. The creases on his forehead disappeared as he found himself relieved and quickly proceeded with the treatment.

He took some smoothing salve, before wrapping her bruised shoulder with bandages in silence. Leyla sat still, head still looking down, as her body shook in the tension between them.

Matthias rubbed smoothing circles on her uninjured side as he went and wrapped her bruises securely, yet tenderly. He had been right; she was smooth to the touch, very soft beneath his fingers.

He wanted to touch her more. She was such a frail woman indeed; so small and so vulnerable.

“Leyla.”

Matthias softly whispered. Leyla found herself raising her head in response, a little dismayed at how quickly she did so. By the mantle on the fireplace, hung a large mirror, with an intricate golden frame. In it, was her reflection.

She met her gaze in it, seeing as clear as day, the shame and despair written in her eyes.

Her eyes then shifted to meet Matthias’ in the mirror, seeing his cerulean eyes staring back at her. A strange feeling came over her, locking her in place as she found herself unable to look away despite the terror she was feeling.

‘Why…?’

She wondered to herself the more she looked at him through the mirror, trying to convey the question with her eyes…

So innocent… so clearly looking at him for some sort of explanation as to why this was all happening.

‘Ah …’

Matthias chuckled dryly to himself in his mind, his eyes breaking contact to take in her now bandaged shoulder. He felt too hot, his breath controlled, yet too harsh as he struggled to wet his parched lips.

His eyes went back to look at Leyla once more, before realising that he had been the one to back away first from her. In all his years of knowing Leyla, he’d never once backed down for her.

‘Damn it.’

He cursed himself for his ineptitude. He felt as though he had been cursed, but only he could feel the way his body grew hotter, breathing out hot puffs of air through his mouth.

Before he could let out another sigh, Matthias leaned forward and planted a light kiss on Leyla’s shoulder in order to turn a blind eye to the unfamiliar emotion stirring inside him and a vague attempt to console the wounded girl. He wasn’t acting like himself, but he found that didn’t mind; not even a little bit.

“It’s all right.” Matthias tenderly whispered in Leyla’s ear while she attempted to turn her body away.

His voice dipped down into a husky tone, creating a strange sensation travelling down Leyla’s spine.

She hastily avoided his gaze once more, unable to look any longer in the mirror.

The last sight she saw was seared into her mind. His strong imposing figure loomed behind her vulnerable form; his large calloused hands wrapped around her bare waist. She tried to subtly shrug the hand off of her, but was unsuccessful to do so.

Matthias continued to trail soft kisses through the expanse of her shoulders, before on hand travelled to grab and interlock their fingers together.

As the pain in Leyla’s body began to soothe, she found it being replaced with a foreign sensation pooling in the pit of her stomach.

Leyla clenched her eyes shut, feeling more vividly the way the duke’s warm breath grazed her skin.


The touch of his lips, and the impression it left as he continued his tender ministrations across her bruises, were as soft as a feather.



Chapter 61.


Charity Performance.



Several days have passed since that night, and soon it faded as though it all had been just a dream. A peaceful dream in an unfamiliar way. She still couldn’t believe it happened.

In the time that passed, Marquis Lindman had finally returned to his estate, and the Duke no longer sent her letters demanding her, or gave her unexpected visits. Soon autumn left, and winter had taken its first step upon its month-long journey, bringing with it a new season. Leyla opened up her window, breathing in the cold chill in the air, loving the smell winter brought.

She quite enjoyed the breeze, senses numbed to the cold for a while, as she appreciated the way the sun would hit the snow, making it glint as though the forest was made of diamonds.

She kept the window wide open, until the cold began biting at her fingertips. With one last deep breath, she shut it closed and turned around to get ready for the day.

Today was the day of the charity performance prepared by the school children at the town hall in downtown, so her preparation before going to work took a little longer than usual. Shosted royalty and the children were the ones going on stage, which meant she couldn’t wear the usual clothes she would.


This year’s performance was being held in a reputable venue. It hosted many events which prominent figures and powerful people had attended regularly. She needed to look her best for the school and her students.

‘You have to present yourself as a dignified teacher. Okay, Miss Lewellin?’

Even the Principal knew she needed to improve her wardrobe. She even added in a few more remarks about her image during yesterday’s meeting, especially about hoping to avoid seeing Leyla ride her bike to the town hall.

Leyla couldn’t help but frown at the thought, hands busying themselves as she braided her hair into an updo style. “What’s wrong with riding my bike?” she muttered under her breath.

She finished rather quickly with her hair. She was rather thankful for her newly gained experience in that department by the way, seeing as she had to do so multiple times throughout the semester.

‘That hair, it doesn’t suit you.’




Ah, just when she thought he wouldn’t find a way to disturb her. But it seemed even in her thoughts she couldn’t escape him. Those had been the words the Duke gave her by the platanus road during the early autumn season.

The autumn sun had just filtered through her room, hitting the mirror and rebounding in an angle that hit her hair. She had flinched at his sudden reflection of appearance on the mirror, having felt he was watching her. Leyla quickly turned her gaze away, just like how she avoided his eyes back then too.

‘It’s beautiful, your hair. It’s like a wing.’

And suddenly, a dam broke in her mind as one after another she recalled every compliment he had ever given her. It flustered her more than the insults he sent her way. Especially when he’d look at her with those cold, indifferent eyes.

She resumed brushing her hair, checking her side profiles before deeming herself well and ready for the day. It was fortunate that unlike her memories of their latest night together, the bruises on her shoulder had begun to fade.

He had been true to his word that night after all.

True enough, she had been terrified out of her wits when he carted her off to his room. The tension between them in the beginning had been so thick, you could have cut it with a knife. But that soon diminished with each kiss he planted on her bruises.

He let her be, and treated her carefully, as though he didn’t mind the struggling and thrashing she made moments before. His gentle touch trailed along her injuries, rubbing the soothing salve to numb the pain before wrapping bandages protectively around them.


His movements were so calm, and skillful, it rivalled that of a doctor’s. Not to mention his azure eyes resolutely trained on her, even as she sluggishly put her clothes back on…

In the corner of her eyes, she spotted a clock, making her gasp at the time. Immediately, Leyla rose from her seat and rechecked herself on the mirror one last time, before flitting around the room for some last minute preparations.

The dress she wore was brand new, which she bought with her own money just for today’s event. She dashed around, looking for a good pair of shoes, before snatching up some high heels. Leyla could already imagine her feet throbbing with pain by the end of the day, but she would need to endure it. Satisfied with her final look, she finally went out of her room.

“Ah, you’re so pretty Leyla!” Uncle Bill greeted her with awe as he regarded his niece. He had just come out of the kitchen, making some breakfast. “You’ll be the prettiest one tonight at the town hall!” he praised. Leyla only giggled disbelievingly before responding.

“There’ll be plenty others who’ll dress better than I,” she pointed out, “There will be tons of young ladies and madams attending the event.”

“Ah, but what have they got against you?” her uncle pointed out, “Neither their silver nor gold on their skin could make them hold a candle to you!”

Leyla rolled her eyes. “Perhaps not in my uncle’s eyes.” she hummed, a fond smile creeping up the corner of her lips as she sat across from him.



“Oh, yes, I just remembered,” Bill said before gesturing to his neck, “The necklace you have, why don’t you wear it as well?” he suggested, taking a bite out of his breakfast. Leyla’s brows furrowed in confusion before widening upon remembering.

“Ah! You mean the necklace you bought for me?”

“Yes! The one you wore for the Duke’s party last year.” he swallowed, before cutting up more of his food, “I think it would perfectly complement your outfit today. You don’t have to wear it if you don’t want to, but I’m certain what a sight it will be!”

Bill Remmer might know nothing when it comes to women’s fashion, he was certain indeed that no one could hold a candle to his niece’s beauty. Just remembering the way Leyla stood out at the Duke’s party was enough to make him so proud that even just for that one night, he could turn Leyla into a beautiful princess.

Leyla smiled and nodded, seeing the smile in her uncle’s eyes as he suggested it. She got up from her seat and went back to her room, searching for where she had kept the necklace in. She reached deep inside her closet, before she found it.


She straightened up, and clasped the necklace around her bare neck. Deeming it secure and worn well, she went back out and stood in front of her uncle, arms tucked behind her, as she puffed out her chest to showcase the necklace more.

“So, how do I look?” she asked him demurely, and Bill cheered jovially at seeing Leyla wearing the necklace once more.

“Ah! Absolute perfection, my dear.” he praised before clasping warm, gentle hands on her shoulder, before giving her a brief hug. He pulled away and looked at her, eyes wrinkled with a smile, before looking at her with a slight concern…

“Now you be careful out there Leyla, don’t stray too far,” Bill warned her softly, “You’ll catch a lot of attention because of how you look, but be wary of them too, or they might just take you away for themselves.” he finished, and Leyla nodded in agreement.

“I will uncle, don’t worry.” she promised.



She was like a dot from a far, hardly recognizable at such a distance, but Matthias could spot her even from a mile away, a slight curve up the corner of his mouth began to appear.

He knew it was Leyla, the woman who was walking along the path through the hunting grounds, all the way towards the rose garden behind the mansion. He tilted his head at the sight of her, his brows furrowing in wonder…

‘Why is she walking to work today?’

Matthias let out a low whistle, moving closer towards the window, and outstretched his hand, index finger popping up in wait. Not a moment sooner a little bird fluttered to land on it.

He brought the bird up close to his eye level, using the sight of Leyla drawing near as a backdrop to it. He leaned against his window sill by the damask curtains that hung from the ceiling down to the floor. It swayed with the wind, framing him perfectly from behind, and hiding him from any passerby.

He shifted his arm, as if to present his canary to the unsuspecting woman, but the bird had fluttered away, and right back into its cage. The introduction to his two birds were unsuccessful, but that didn’t mean it was entirely a waste. And so Matthias stayed by the window, even long after Leyla had disappeared from his sight.

It had become some sort of routine of his, to perch by the windowsill every morning for the view it offered, day after day. And all the while, he’d only look, waiting for the moment she would leave the quaint gardener’s cabin, and into the path through the forest just to go to work.

At this spot in his mansion, he could always see her, and what she would do whenever she’d go home.

‘Is she all better now?’

He couldn’t help but think as he recalled how frail she looked the last time he saw her so close. She had been all bruised up and in pain. Her quivering body as she sobbed desperately at him…

Those flushed, tear-stained cheeks, and glistening emerald eyes. He could just lose himself at the sight of her.

It was a shame he hadn’t had the fortune of running into her, or see her since then. He could have gone to see her, much like he did before, but this time he chose not to. There had been some strange stirrings in him, that night, feelings he couldn’t put a finger on.

Matthias pushed himself away from the window, and settled down onto the wingback chair near the fireplace in deep thought. Absent-mindedly, he reached out towards the morning paper and flipped it open, but his eyes unseeing the words printed on it.

His mind kept returning to those tears she shed that last night. He’s seen her cry countless times now, but there had been something different about the way she did last. It was imprinted in his mind by now, and he couldn’t escape it…

‘Wait,’

Matthias recalled him saying, as he prevented her from leaving right after he managed to bandage her, and handed over some medicine.

‘These are painkillers, drink them sparingly.’

Leyla’s face, at that moment, grew contemplative as she eyed the bottle, still in his outstretched hand, warily. Impatiently, he opened the lid as he neared her. She flinched under his touch when he had suddenly grabbed her by the chin, gently prying her mouth open to pour the liquid medicine down her throat.

She took it like a veteran, eyes trailed at him in an indecipherable manner, gulping the medicine down as best as she could despite the bitter flavour. Matthias smirked as he watched her struggle.

Once he was satisfied by her medicine intake, he gently wiped the excess medicine that dripped down the corner of her lips with the returned handkerchief. Once she had been wiped clean, he took out a piece of candy in his pocket, and popped it in her mouth.

Leyla had blinked back tears as he continued to shower her with his care, unable to make a sound. The tears flowed down her cheeks once more, as she kept the candy inside her mouth, neither spitting or making an effort to swallow it.

Finally, he had been unable to hold back, and began to caress her cheeks, not minding the way it soaked his hand. His movements were stiff, and unpracticed, but he kept going.

‘Does it still hurt?’


He couldn’t help but inquire. He’d never felt so useless before, so helpless, when he’d asked her that. Leyla nodded back in reply not a moment soon. Unable to do anything else, Matthias gathered her up in his arms once more, and held her in comfort.

She tried to resist him at first, but eventually gave in. She continued to tear up in his arms, tongue rolling the candy around in her mouth for quite a long time. By the time she stopped crying, the front side of his sweater was completely soaked with tears.

Even the memory of it brought a certain sorrow to Matthias. He let out a sigh, and set aside the paper he hadn’t bothered to read. He leaned his head back, until all he could see was the ceiling.

He really can’t get that image of her out of his mind. Normally when Leyla would cry, all he could feel was amusement. He liked seeing a pretty face cry, so he’d relentlessly bully her. Though there were times, too, when it bothered him to see them.

It made him irritant that anything, or anyone, other than him had made her cry. During those times, he would wish them to stop. No one else but him should make her cry. And not even just her tears…

Her smiles, her laughter, hopes and dreams… everything! Everything she has must be his!

She must be his.

The tears she kept crying back then made him feel as though he’d lost, and he was at a loss at how to turn his defeat into a victory…

Such strange tears indeed.

Whenever Leyla would cry, she had the tendency to let her temper get the best of her. Sometimes she’d feel afraid, or even terrified. And he would enjoy every emotion he’d managed to get a rise out of her.

But she didn’t even seem to understand why she was crying at that moment. They were not filled with any anger, not even fear of him. They looked like something foreign…

Almost as though her eyes were empty. And he found out at that moment he hated those tears very much. He wanted to stop them. It raised in him a feeling he hadn’t felt when he watched Leyla cry over Kyle Etman…

Made him want to strangle her just so she would stop crying.

Such an odd, uncomfortable feeling indeed festered inside him, but Matthias did not mind it. It was reminiscent of the feeling of getting drunk with a fragrant liquor against his nose. However, it also made him feel as though something was closing in on him.

It confused and gratified him immensely.

Yes… it made him quite… happy.


He felt unbridled happiness, completely different from the enjoyment he used to feel whenever he tormented Leyla. He hadn’t tossed her aside because he wanted to feel more from her. To know this joy, and to experience it to the fullest capacity!

Leyla had entrusted herself to him. He remembered it, the resignation on her face as he gazed at her exhausted form while he kept comfort.

And so he kept wiping the tears away, sweeping her hair back to see her more clearly in the dim lighting. He watched as the slight hope in her eyes turned into unbridled fear, making her entire body tremble in his touch.

He waited a long time for her to be at ease, to trust him once more, because whatever joy he felt before was swiftly snuffed out of his system. He wanted it back! But how would he get it once more? The answer was the same.

It’s always been the same.

A sudden knock disturbed him from his thoughts, making him frown at his broken trail of thoughts. He’d just been onto something important, a little more time and he would have found some resolution. But life has a way of making important things slip through you, much like holding sand in the palm of your hands.

“Master, this is Hessen.” a muffled voice came from behind the door.

“Come in.” Matthias calmly answered, his eyes no longer trailed on the ceiling as he straightened up in his seat. He watched as Hessen opened the door, approaching swiftly and stopping by the side of his seat at a respectable distance. Hessen stood at attention, before dipping his head in a bow.

“Madam Elysee had asked about the master’s dinner schedule today.”

Matthias’ brow quirked up at the news. “My mother?” he asked.

“Yes,” Hessen confirmed, “Initially she had planned to attend a charity performance with Madam Norma tonight at the town hall, but she’s fallen ill with fever so she won’t be able to go out.” he explained to his master. “So, she wondered if you could go in her place, instead, in accompanying Madam Norma. That is, if you have no prior engagements.”

“A charity performance you say?” Matthias hummed, as he tapped his fingers on the armrest.

“It’s a performance held by several schools here in Carlsbar,” Hessen hastily informed, “Even children from this village would be taking part.”

“Ah.” he said, smirking to himself.

Now he knew why Leyla had walked herself to work today, all dolled up more than she usually does on a normal work day.


“It would be my pleasure to escort my grandmother tonight.” Matthias responded as he got up from his seat, “Well then, we best get prepared properly for the charity event.”


Chapter 62.

A Night At The Town Hall.




	” The chatter around the town hall was loud, Leyla herself had been quite busy overseeing the progress of her students’ preparations. Just as she’d come out towards the lobby, Mrs. Grever came up to her, face flushed as she saddled up beside her.

“Miss Lewellin, look here!” she whispered hurriedly, “It’s Duke Herhardt! He’s here!” she squealed rather excitedly. Leyla felt as though a bucket of cold water had just been dumped at her.

“The Duke? He’s here?” she hurriedly inquired, looking towards the direction Mrs. Grever had been pointing to, “I thought it would be Madam Herhardt that would be attending tonight.” she murmured as she realised Mrs. Grever was right.

Matthias was here.

“Yes, it’s the Duke, not his mother who is attending.” Mrs. Grever giggled, before cooing in awe, “And look! He even brought his grandmother along with him!” she exclaimed.

It was surprisingly easy to spot the Duke, mostly because of the crowd that had swarmed him the moment he’d arrived. It was the exact moment she was looking at him, did his eyes manage to meet hers.

Leyla felt her chest suddenly constrict underneath his gaze, and lightly tipped her head forward into a bow, pretending as though she was wordlessly greeting him from afar. Fortunately, they didn’t have too much interaction as he was quickly swept away by the crowd.

Leyla found herself sighing in relief at his disappearance.

“Say, Miss Lewellin, you live right next to Arvis, don’t you?” Mrs. Grever asked, and she nodded, “Then that would mean you see him quite often too?” The missus looked quite despondent that the Duke had disappeared from their immediate vicinity, completely missing the way Leyla shifted on her feet uncomfortably.

“I, well, I guess… sometimes,” she mumbled, hands clasped in front of her as she fidgeted, feeling absolutely guilty even though she had no reason to. Mrs. Grever sighed, pouting slightly.




“Ah, how lucky of you!” she sighed once again, “It’s sure quite the treat to see such a handsome face everyday. Even at a distance.” she finished before moving away to get back to choir practice as she had been charged with taking care of the upper class’ performance.

Ever since the picnic last autumn, the one held in Arvis, Mrs. Grever had grown quite fond of Duke Herhardt, never missing an opportunity to praise him and his deeds. She would praise how wonderful he was, or how elegant he walked, or how aristocratic he acted.

With a sigh of relief, Leyla too went and joined the other teachers for some last minute preparations, when she finally came face to face with the Duke by the hallway. Her steps faltered for a moment, before she regained her composure to keep walking.

She hoped that he wouldn’t notice her passing through. He seemed to be engaged in conversation with an elderly gentleman. She couldn’t help but pause once she did pass him by, just to take one last look at him.

He looked so tall from where she stood, the long shadow on the marble floor he casted made him look all the more imposing. The suit he wore accentuated his lithe form, though it also perfectly hugged every firm muscle he had on his body.

Ever since they were children, he made her so fearful and uncomfortable around him. And despite the numerous praises she heard about him, she couldn’t find it in herself to find out why they thought so highly of him since she obviously thought otherwise.

Even now, that fact remained unchanged for her, though she now had an insight as to why he was highly respected in their community. He played his role perfectly as the esteemed Duke Matthias von Herhardt, making everyone believe he was born to be respected.

If only they knew, like she knew, how childish he could be. Indeed, she thought it so strange to see him in such a respectable manner. Could she even describe him as her beautiful nightmare?

Also, his eyes glinted in the light…


‘Wait… eyes?’ Leyla blinked, before she realised Matthias was now looking straight at her, his body turned slightly towards her direction even as he was talking to the person in front of him.

‘Why… Why is he looking at me?’ she wondered, slowly feeling her cheeks grew warm the longer she held his gaze. Though his eyes betrayed no emotion, she could see the way the corner of his lips lift up into an unnoticeable smirk.

“Miss Lewellin, why are you here?”

A voice interrupted their silent interaction as Leyla quickly spun around to come face to face with the school’s principal. She drew closer to Leyla, momentarily appraising her looks before nodding satisfactorily, “Come on now, stop dilly dallying, we have more guests to welcome.” she gently reminded, pushing her softly towards the direction she needed to be in.

The Principal led Leyla towards where the other teachers had been lounging on, which coincidentally was where Matthias and his grandmother currently were as well. As she was left to the crowd’s mercy, she carefully avoided bumping into anyone, jerking left and right when someone got too close…

Before she knew it, she was right near the Herhardts, within Matthias’ line of sight. There was no way she could escape without having to converse with him now. Leyla gulped back down her nervousness at being so close to him after their prolonged separation.



Matthias had been busying himself in interacting with the others, guests and teachers alike, before he noticed Leyla had managed to find her way in front of him. She averted her gaze, hoping it would buy her more time, but caught the glimpse of a growing smirk.

She looked down, busying herself with the sight of his well-polished shoes and began thinking about the nearing performance of her students…

Unfortunately for all her preparations, she hadn’t come to expect to be the butt end of a joke by the time the night ended.



After the crowd dialled down around them, Norma finally took the time to appraise her grandson. She tilted her head as she observed him critically, seeing the slight glint of his eyes.

“You’re looking quite lively these days, Matthias.” she pointed out with a smile as soon as they sat on their seats, “Is there something you’d like to tell me?” she hummed, eagerly awaiting for an answer to her grandson’s sudden mood change.

“Hm? No, not really grandmother.” he answered truthfully, unwilling to divulge any information for her, giving her a placating smile. Norma was disappointed that Matthias felt no need to share with her any progress in his day to day life.


She knew something had changed. He acted differently than before, giving off a lighter aura about him. He almost looked like someone his own age. Don’t get her wrong, she knows her grandson was one of the most handsome people in existence. He just never acted like his age before, always so mature…

Sometimes she would forget how young he actually was until she noticed the slight bounce in his steps, or how lighter he looked. Almost happier even. An absurd thought, if you will, but one she’s unwilling to take back.

“Ah, well,” she hummed, turning away from him to look towards the stage as the others continued to settle down around them, “Either way, it’s nice to see you like this.” She was only curious after all, but if Matthias felt more comfortable with her not knowing, then who was she to pry further?

They sat there in silence, Norma busying herself with a conversation or two with people who stopped by to greet them. She noticed in all their interaction, Matthias looked rather bored, eyes darting here and there, before a slight slouch in his posture told her he was finding everything a little boring.

“I know these things may seem quite trivial to you, Matthias, but I like to see it as an opportunity to receive support and respect in these gatherings,” she told him, quiet enough that only the two of them could hear her. “And I am delighted to know that despite your duties as the head of our household, you still found the time to participate diligently in events like this.”

She turned to Matthias and patted his chin lovingly, to which he automatically took in his hand and kissed her palm in response.

“Oh, your grandfather and father weren’t half the man you were at your age. And of that I’m so proud.” She praised him. He truly was the Herhardt’s masterpiece.

The public had given Matthias the moniker of being Herhardt’s masterpiece. They’d witnessed his hardwork and glory in the deeds he’d done here and there. Norma couldn’t help but smile in the memory of all of them. And though she’d like to be modest about it, she agreed with the public wholeheartedly.

She had been saddened when she outlived her husband, as well as her son, but she believed it was to witness her grandson rise up and beyond the expectations set for him, and see him thrive in it; to bring glory to the Herhardt household once more when its last patriarch left them.

Suddenly the lights went out, making the crowd gasp in surprise as Norma was busy admiring her grandson. A drumroll began as some spotlights began darting back and forth everywhere before settling down on the stage. The crowd quieted down and the host finally appeared in a puff of smoke on stage.

The crowd began clapping at the dramatic entrance, Matthias included as he straightened up in his seat, but not because of what was happening on stage, oh no. In fact, his eyes were glued on Leyla.


He can’t believe how he missed it before, but she was wearing it. She was wearing that exquisite necklace she owned. Yes, upon prolonged inspection, he was certain it was his emerald necklace she was wearing.

Matthias felt the stirrings of satisfaction deep inside him, loving the fact she had it on. It made him feel as though he had marked her, and she was proudly announcing to the world that she belonged to him alone.

Whether she knew that he felt that way when she wore it or not, it didn’t matter to him. She was his.

Eventually he managed to pull himself away from looking at her and focus on the show. He paid attention to the introduction of the play and watched as the students performed, observing each one of them carefully.

The play was about some fairies who lived by the woods. Each child wore translucent wings, with glitters splayed strategically to give it some sparkling effects. They walked and acted in practised manners, delivering their lines nervously.

The crowd oohed and awed at the play, chuckling here and there when they would do something adorable. He found that he recognized them as the children who came to have a picnic with Leyla at Arvis.

The thought of her made him seek her out, eyes glancing to the dimmed bottom part of the stage, where Leyla sat attentively watching her students. He watched her interaction with them, noting from time to time how the children would glance nervously, looking for their teacher amongst the crowd for cues and validation they were doing the right thing.

Suddenly, the smallest, and probably the youngest, of the children began to openly cry, surprising the crowd and the Duke. The wail echoed throughout the venue, momentarily drawing everyone’s attention away from the play. Matthias then recognized the child as the girl who spilled ice cream all over Leyla’s clothes on that picnic.

‘I wonder how Miss Lewellin would handle this?’ he wondered, tilting his head as he tried to imagine how Leyla was looking like right now. Judging by how she straightened up, hands silently conveying for the child to relax, that she was beginning to grow nervous herself.

“Oh dear.” Norma sighed. Matthias spared her a glance before giving the little girl his attention once more. Said little girl was now leaning over the stage, staring right at Leyla as she tried to reach out to her…

“Teacheer!” the little girl bawled, her voice echoing in the now silent hall. All other child actors also ceased their presentation, distracted from the sudden interruption. It was clear at this point whatever role the child had was void, which made all the other children begin panicking over what to do as well.


‘What are you going to do now, Leyla?’ Matthias asked in his mind, narrowing his eyes at her back. Eventually the principal made her way inconspicuously towards the rookie teacher, whispering in her ear.

Whatever she said had made Leyla tense. He watched as they exchanged a few words, Leyla shaking her head frantically at the principal’s insistence. In the end though, the principal got her way and Leyla resigned to her task.

Gingerly she got up from her seat amongst the teachers, and slowly went up the stage. She carefully pulled the bawling girl aside and wiped her tears. She was speaking to the child now, softly placating her, he would assume from behind the fake flower bush they used as a prop.

The child was now holding onto dear life on her teacher, Leyla letting out a sigh of defeat before rubbing her palms up and down the child’s back to soothe her. Any further delay would only build up more panic amongst the inexperienced children.

Just as Leyla was planning on getting off the stage with the child, the Principal came close to her once more, handing her a stack of papers. Matthias watched as she paled at the sight of them, frantically exchanging words with the principal. The principal tried to take the crying child with her, but the girl refused. With that, she left Leyla and the little girl on the stage.

“Hmm, I think I recognize that teacher.” his grandmother remarked as she squinted her eyes in order to see Leyla better, “Yes, isn’t that Bill Remmer’s foster daughter?” she exclaimed softly, looking pleased to see a familiar face.

Reluctantly, Leyla went back, hands clasping around the girl’s arm as she dragged her along gently once again, and began to sink down behind the way-too-small of a bush, and began flipping through the papers rather hurriedly. She eyed the crowd a couple of times, clearing her throat as she took a deep breath.

It was amusing to see her face growing redder by the second.

“U-waa… look at th-this everyone!” Leyla giggled nervously, “Pre-pretty flowers have bloomed.” she finished awkwardly, stuttering through her line, leaving Matthias perplexed at seeing her be a bumbling mess with such a public audience.

It seemed as though watching someone more nervous than themselves gave the children a boost of confidence, and the play began to once again resume, each child growing more and more confident in their gait and acting.

Though her lines were short, Leyla couldn’t seem to find her composure whenever it was her time to deliver them. The crowd giggled, trying to keep their amusement at bay whenever it was her time to speak.


It was just way too funny seeing Leyla so awkward and serious in her task. They tried not to laugh too much, really they did!

But then one of the audience let out an unexpectedly loud accidental laugh when Leyla said a line, and suddenly a dam broke! The entire town hall was then filled with boisterous laughter, finally unable to hold back. Even his grandmother, who had been trying to be as respectful as possible, let out a laugh along with the crowd.

Matthias went back to looking at Leyla, head resting on his knuckles that were perched on the arm rest.

His head tilted as he stared at Leyla with a frown on his face, hardly noticeable in the dim lighting.

The child had finally stopped crying, and was now sitting uselessly next to Leyla, flapping her hands up and down. Eventually, the child looked up at her teacher, and as though trying to thank her, she removed the flower crown on her head and placed it in a lopsided manner on top of Leyla’s golden mane.

Unfortunately, the child’s efforts had gone unnoticed as Leyla was far too focused on reading the script.

“Th-this is a great party! Hahaha!” She laughed dramatically, but the stern expression on her face made it humorous. “I’m so excited!” She then looked up and smiled shyly at the crowd.

At that point, Matthias finally snorted before laughing along with the crowd. Leyla was practically already red in the face, matching the roses on her flower crown, yet she forced herself to continue with the play.

Matthias could already predict that in the play, the crowd eagerly awaited for when Leyla would speak up next. And consequently, he could also predict that amongst all the presentations today, this play by the lower years would be the talk of the town starting from tonight.

When the play finally came to an end, and Leyla was finally done with her part, she hurried off the stage, smiling politely, yet hurriedly through the crowd’s warm round of applause just for her. Matthias also found himself clapping for her. He’d been thoroughly entertained by the pretty flower fairy tonight, who ended up being the star of the show.


Chapter 63.


Pretty.


The play performed by the lower year students had come to an end, which drew most of the audience’s attention and laughter. Everyone clapped as the children bowed on stage with Miss Lewellin and they all exited the stage to give way to the upper years.

Each child immediately went where their families were located, those who had older siblings had to stay behind and watch the remaining plays, while the rest of the children had to go home for their bedtimes, leaving the town hall with fewer audiences.

“We apologise so much for Monica’s behaviour!” The little girl’s parents repeatedly apologised to Leyla, who was escorting them to their carriage.

“Please, it’s fine!” Leyla tried to reassure them, “It’s my duty as their teacher to be there for them.”

“Still, because Monica couldn’t continue with the play, then Miss Lewellin had to endure getting laughed at during the play.” interjected Monica’s grandmother.

At the reminder of the humiliation she had to go through, Leyla flinched slightly, effectively silencing both Leyla and the apologetic parents. Eventually they settled in their carriage, bidding Leyla goodbye. Once they were out of sight, Leyla sighed in relief.

“Miss Lewellin, shall we get a cup of hot coffee?” Mrs. Grever immediately offered with a kind smile as she neared Leyla, finally finding her alone. Leyla jolted at her unexpected appearance, before gently shaking her head, smiling back politely.

“Oh, thank you, but I’m fine.” she reassured, “I think I should get a breather alone for a while.”

“Oh well, that’s understandable.” Mrs. Grever agreed, before patting Leyla on the shoulder, squeezing it comfortingly, “For what it’s worth, I think you make quite a cute fairy, and I enjoyed the play a lot more because of you.”

Leyla giggled softly, “That really doesn’t make me feel that much better.” she jokingly, and both of them chuckled.

“I know it doesn’t sound that much better, but it is the truth.” Mrs. Grever said, “Usually the nobles that attend these events rarely pay attention, or even get entertained, but you did. You made them enjoy it,


and not make it feel like just a publicity stunt for them.” she sighed and squeezed both of Leyla’s hands this time, “So you did an amazing job today.”




The words were meant to be comforting, and any other time Leyla might have found comfort in them, but not in this instance. She fought back a grimace as she thought about someone who most certainly was in the audience…

‘Oh, I bet he really was entertained back there. Oh god.’ she despaired in her thoughts.

“Also, because of you, the principal predicts our donations will also increase. Which makes her so pleased with you as well.” At the mention of the principal, Leyla couldn’t help but groan.

“Ugh, I really hate her right now.” she sighed, before they both giggled once more. They both know how overbearing the principal could be when she wanted to. Leyla then proceeded to tell Mrs. Grever, that she would be fine on her own, prompting the missus to go back inside ahead of her.

Satisfied that no one was trying to approach or speak to her, Leyla began to trudge along the park, which was located right behind the town hall. She needed time for herself. Each breath she took felt as though she was leaving pieces of her soul behind as she embraced the chill in the night air.

The park was indeed devoid of anyone. She sat down on one of the nearest benches and gingerly took off her shoes.

‘What have I done?’ she thought as she rubbed her painful feet. White puffs of air escaped as she leaned her head back to look up at the night skies. She let out a long deep breath as she did so…

She was surprised she was still alive after that shameful display. Something was building up inside her, threatening to burst!

“AAAAHHHHH!” she screamed into the open air, letting her breath turn white as though they carried her soul with them.





Matthias found Leyla at the very place he had predicted her to be.

He had predicted after being humiliated like that, she would run off to a secluded place. Additionally, she had been wearing heels tonight, she wouldn’t go far and find somewhere to sit. Add to the fact she was a bit of a coward, she would stay by a well-lit place, and still be nearby despite the seclusion. Which could only be the park right behind the town hall.


And indeed she was right there, sitting as she looked up at the night sky, seemingly lost in thought. She was barefoot, heels hung by the tips of her fingers instead. She was sitting on a bench by a massive tree, with a street lamp lit up right next to her.

He walked slowly with steady steps, his footsteps almost silent in the quiet night and stopped when his shadow loomed over her unsuspecting figure. “I expected you to be here.” he announced, making her gasp in surprise.



Leyla whipped her head around, eyes widening at the sight of him within arm’s length.

“Ho-how did you-” she stuttered, staring up at him before her eyes were darting around them both in a panic. Immediately she grabbed both of her heels tightly before hastily putting them back on, remembering the time when her shoes were snatched away from her.

Matthias found himself grinning at the wary look on her face. He looked down, staring pointedly at her shoes, which she was securing to her feet, he hummed as he took a step closer.

“You really think that’s going to stop me from taking your shoes?” he asked her teasingly. Leyla only huffed out a breath, before locking the last of the straps securely and jumped up from her seat, looking a little relieved she managed to completely put them back on.

Looking at her now, well, it seemed like he didn’t have to be so worried if her injuries were still bothering her. They seemed to have healed up rather nicely, judging by how fast she was moving compared to before.

“Don’t get up on my account.” Matthias tried convincing her to sit back down, but she shook her head, now standing right next to the street lamp.

“No thank you, I’ve sat enough.” Leyla refused politely. Matthias eyes’ narrowed at her for a moment, before pushing down his irritation at her resistance. The street light shone down on her much like the stage lights did just a while back.

It wasn’t such a bad sight either, as he continued to roam his eyes appreciatively over her.

“You should’ve been an actress instead of a teacher, Leyla,” he pointed out with a wide smile, “I’ve never seen such an actress who’s able to make that large of a crowd laugh so much in one sitting.” he praised.

Leyla’s arms tightened around herself, hands gripping tight as she bit her lips and looked down on the ground resolutely. She swallowed her pride before trying to politely reply back to him…

“Y-yes, my acting was quite clumsy, wasn’t it?” she laughed nervously, trying to pass it off nonchalantly.

‘It might even be the reason you sought me out tonight, isn’t it?’ she thought scornfully, but refused to voice it out.


“Hm, it was, just a little,” he chuckled, eyes watching as her body began to tremble in the continued embarrassment despite their play being over. Leyla began to shift nervously before finally finding the strength to move.

“Well, then, I must get going now Duke…” she began to move away..

“So pretty.” Matthias slipped out, making Leyla freeze and look up at him in shock. Her face flushed against the cold at the unexpected complement he had given her. He held her gaze as she struggled to find a reply…

‘Should I say thank you? No, it’s too ridiculous! Not at all duke? Not that one either.’ she fully bit her lower lip as she struggled to find the right words, squirming underneath his observation.

‘Should I just leave? But he’ll catch up to me anyway!’

She could feel the way his eyes trailed all over her. From her flushed cheeks, down to her pale neck, and onto her dazzling emerald necklace adorning her neck. She watched as his lips spread out into a pleased smile the more he looked down at her, eyes locked at her necklace.

“U-uncle Bill bought them for me.” Leyla finally said, careful to keep ample distance between them. Perhaps he wasn’t talking specifically about her, but her clothes, or maybe her necklace! Yes right, he must be talking about her necklace.

‘I also got a few compliments before about my necklace.’ she added as an afterthought. He hummed, before lifting his gaze back to her eyes, watching her for reactions.

“Do you like it?” he inquired, making her blink.

“What?”

“The necklace,” Matthias gestured back down before returning his gaze to look into hers, “Do you like it?”

A frown marred her face, she was confused as to why that mattered.

“Uh, of course.” she answered honestly, and Matthias chuckled, making her more confused. What was so amusing? Still she had been surprised to see and hear his laughter. She hadn’t seen him like this…

And his laughter… it sounded low, like his voice, but soft and velvety to the ears.

She stared at him in a guarded manner, wary of this new side he was showing her. Eventually he stopped laughing, before locking eyes with her once more. There was tension between them as they both stared each other down…

The pregnant silence between the two was broken when there was a sudden chirp, and a bird flapped away from the tree branch near them. Leyla was caught in a surprise, yelping at the sudden disturbance as she whipped around in alarm, just in time to watch the bird fly off into the night.


She knew she had to get away quickly from him before they could be seen together. Unfortunately her foot twisted in an awkward manner as she turned to step away from the unexpected intrusion.

Leyla tried to right herself back to a balanced position, but Matthias was quicker, swiftly grabbing her by her waist, and pulling her flush to his body.

“Ah!” she exclaimed as he turned her around, their chests pressed together as he pushed her back into the cold steel of the lamp. He loomed, tall and firm, over her, eyes glinting dangerously.

“I-I’m going to scream for help.” she softly threatened, breath quivering in terror. Leyla could feel the tears pooling in her eyelids as she pushed her palms on his chest in an attempt to get him away from her.

“Do as you wish.” he dared her, eyes still softly admiring her unwaveringly. Matthias cupped her face with one hand, keeping her gaze on him. “Where do you hide it?” he asked her as she struggled.

Leyla frowned as she looked up at him.

“Hide? What do you mean? Hide what?” her voice shook as she tried to push him away with all her might. Her eyes looked at him inquiringly, not understanding what he wanted to know from her this time. Matthias kept looking at her, before sighing disappointedly.

He thought he’d catch a glimpse of those feelings again, but alas, he was mistaken as it disappeared too quickly this time. Which was frustrating because her beautiful face was enough to erase his growing desire.

He lowered his hand slowly, gently caressing her cheeks, grazing the back of his knuckles against her jawline, before resting an open palm around her slender neck. His fingers gingerly wrapped around it, fingertips grazing the pearls of the necklace as she gulped nervously at him.

He could feel the way her throat bobbed up and down as she swallowed. She’s so sensitive here…

It was so easy to leave his mark all over her body. Just a little pressure on her neck would probably be enough for his hand to leave its mark on that pale skin. Or perhaps he should kiss it deep enough it would leave a mark to stay for days?

‘How easy it would be, from the top of her head down to the tip of her toes, to leave my mark all over her…’ he thought, entranced by her pale skin, ‘Then, everyone will know she’s mine, only mine.’

He could do it to her, but eventually decided against it as he let out another despondent sigh. Finally, Matthias pulled his hand away from her neck, making Leyla breathe in a sigh of relief, before he was replacing them against her cheeks once more.

His fingers touched her lips, rubbing against it’s warm moistness.

‘If I touch you in there*, would they feel like this too?’ he wondered out loud. Leyla opened her mouth to protest, but Matthias was already pushing fingers in her mouth, drowning out her resistance.


The pads of his fingers rubbed against her tongue, fondling the inside of her mouth as they both breathed heavily against each other. His fingers went deeper, reaching the back of her throat…

And with all her strength, Leyla bit down on his fingers. Hard.

But Matthias only laughed at such a weak display of strength. He barely even felt it now that his fingers were so deep inside her mouth. He smiled at her feeble attempts to get free.

“You should bite harder, Leyla.” he mused as he watched the way her teeth met his skin. “Harder than that, and then I’ll feel the pain.” he whispered against her, his warm breath hitting her face.

The only thought that ran in Leyla’s mind aside from indignation, was how out of his mind the Duke really was.

‘He’s insane!’

She was appalled by the way Matthias was grinning down at her that she could feel her temper spike.

And so she loosened up. She knew that no matter how hard she tried to make it hurt, he wouldn’t back off.

Seeing her calm down, Matthias gave her a victorious smirk before pulling his fingers out of her mouth, before he stroked her lips with his wet fingers.

‘If I would kiss you, no doubt you’d protest once again.’ he thought as he rubbed her plush lips. It would be an easy thing to do too. He knew by now how to quickly snuff out any form of resistance from Leyla.

How easy it would be for him to satisfy his lust and greed for her as he’d done so before. However, he found himself unable to do so as he stared at the way she was trapped in his arms. So willing, and so submissive as her hands were now only pressed on his chest, neither pushing or hitting him away from her.

He thought of the dreamy moment that had passed by and the joy he had felt.

He trailed his hands lower once more, resting it against her neck as he stroked the pale skin again. He found himself at a loss on what to currently do. Unconsciously, he swallowed his mouth dry.

‘Goddamnit.’ he thought, the curse threatening to escape from his lips. He found himself clenching and unclenching his other fist, before bringing up both hands this time to cup Leyla’s face.

With a quiet sigh, Matthias finally pulled away, letting her go. Leyla felt puzzled about it, though she was absolutely relieved to be free of him as he took a step back from her.

Matthias expected her to flee by now, but she remained rooted to the spot, blinking at him in a dazed manner as she frowned in a deep thought. They stayed that way for some time, Matthias content in observing her through it all.


While Leyla had been pondering about his strangeness tonight, she failed to notice when something cold and wet skewed her vision a little, making her blink in surprise. She raised her head, leaning her head back to look at the sky, Matthias following in suit.

The first snowfall was finally here.



By the time the second half of the event was done, the night had gotten darker, and the audience soon began to leave. Meanwhile the organisers were busying themselves in cleaning up the place and some last minute checks that everything was fine.

Leyla was just finishing up, gathering the last of her belongings before deeming herself done for the day. Her feet wobbled as she walked past her colleagues, bidding them goodbye as she quickly walked through the halls.

The heels she wore dug painfully on her soles, it was best she took them off once she boarded the bus or a stagecoach passing through Arvis. She quickly checked the time, noting it won’t be long before the last of the transport would leave. She picked up her pace, eager to catch the last ride home.

“Excuse me, Miss Lewellin!” called out someone from behind her. Surprised, she quickly turned around, towards the town hall, where she heard her name be called out. She recognized that voice.

“Ah, Mr. Pat!” she exclaimed as she saw just who called for her. Mr. Pat was a friend of her Uncle Bill, he was also known as the coachman of Arvis. He waved towards her with quick strides, before stopping right in front of her.

“I apologise for the late notice, but you’ve been invited to ride with us.” he told her, gesturing to the nearby coach. It was unmistakable, the carriage of Herhardt household was parked where he was pointing at.

Leyla reflexively began to decline, shaking her head as she saw the emblem imprinted by the side of the carriage.

“Oh please, there’s no need for that-”

“Madam Norma insists, Miss Leyla.” Mr. Pat said kindly, halting Leyla in surprise.

“The madam insists as you are returning home to Arvis as well, you can ride with both of the house Herhardt tonight.” Mr. Pat finished as he once more gestured for Leyla to go along with them.


Chapter 64.



Glance.




Once the snow had started to fall, it fell down heavily. Already, the roads were thickened of white frost, making it difficult for the carriage to move faster than it could. Leyla couldn’t help but look out the window, worry clear on her face.

“You don’t have to worry too much, my dear.” a kind gentle voice interrupted her. Leyla looked in front of her to see Madam Norma Catharina von Herhardt smiling for her, eyes wrinkled kindly as she regarded the young teacher sitting across from her.

“Oh, no, it’s not, um,” Leyla began to stutter, but Norma graciously cut her off with a soft laugh.

“I know this might be a little uncomfortable for you, but please, there’s no need to be so nervous.” she comforted the young miss, “I don’t wish for you to be so tense in this ride. Especially since I extended the invite myself.”

Leyla found she could not begrudge the esteemed woman. She radiated so much warmth, she couldn’t help but feel a little bit at ease with her around. Norma sighed as she finally spared the outside a little glance.

“Just the first day of snow, and already the roads have grown thick with snow. I expect this winter to be colder, don’t you think so as well, Matthias?” Norma asked her grandson, turning to look at him for a response.

Leyla, too, followed her gaze to spare the Duke some attention. They spared each other just a glance, but already she could feel her heart beating loudly against her chest.

“I think so as well, grandmother.” he agreed readily. It was clear for Leyla that Norma was a tactful conversationalist. She took charge with the small talk, asking her about her school life, and even praising the latest charity event. Which of course led her to a conversation Leyla was hoping to avoid.

Her class’ play.


“You seemed so flustered up there, but I want you to know you did marvellously.” Norma said, eyes glinting in amusement as she recalled how much she enjoyed the play. Leyla felt her cheeks flush at the praise. Somehow, it sounded a lot more comforting than the other praises she received earlier.

“I thank you so much, madam!” she thanked profusely. Her cheeks felt hotter, the tip of her ears turned red at the praise, giving her pale skin a vibrant colour akin to a ripened fruit.



Matthias fought to hold back his laughter at her expression. It was very reminiscent of her face when she had been up on the stage. She sat up straight in front of him, hands demurely clasped on her knees as she fidgeted restlessly with her fingers.

She was not good at acting indifferently. She can’t hold in her emotions very well. Not to mention how terrible she was at lying, which was probably why her acting ended up being so hilarious during the play.

He leaned back against his seat, stretching his legs a little further, gently grazing the tip of his shoes against her heels discreetly so his grandmother wouldn’t notice. Leyla felt him graze her foot, and moved her feet farther from him, but he wasn’t giving up easily.

The carriage rattled as it began to rock due to the unevenness of the well-polished road before. Leyla couldn’t help but feel as though she was about to cry. She tried so hard not to let him touch her, but she could only move so far in a small carriage.

And now his feet were firmly pressed against hers. The contact wasn’t much, but it was enough to make her feel as though he’d just stripped her naked.

“For such a young lady, you seemed to handle the children well.” Norma praised again, making Leyla raise her head back up to look at Herhardt’s matriarch. As much as she’d like to avoid the small contact Matthias was forcing on her, she didn’t want the matriarch to be suspicious, and thus reluctantly ignored it.

“Tell me, do you like children, Miss Lewellin?”

“Of course madam.” Leyla answered earnestly. She wouldn’t have chosen to work as a teacher if she didn’t like kids.

“Well then, I reckon you’d be a great teacher in the long run,” Norma smiled, as she leaned back, “You are both intelligent and love children, two qualities that’s important to being a teacher. Don’t you think so, Matthias?” she turned to her grandson again, prompting him to join in on the conversation.

“I completely agree, grandmother.” Matthias replied, quickly sparing Leyla a glance before giving his grandmother his full attention.


Leyla on the other hand, couldn’t help but feel so perplexed by him tonight. She knew it was a general answer, some polite courtesy on his part, but his behaviour by far was so polite compared to how he was before.

If it were anyone else, he would have just nodded and given monosyllabic responses before leaving it at that. That was how she knew him, that’s how she thought he would be. Just then Matthias’ eyes slid back to her.

“The semester break is coming soon, isn’t it, Miss Lewellin?” he asked her directly this time, making her jolt in surprise before hastily averting her gaze away from him.

“Yes, it is, Duke.” She tried not to act too flustered by him, mentally berating herself to keep her composure and just pretend as though she was just like any other family member of her Uncle Bill.

“How are you planning on spending your vacation off school?”




“Uh, pardon that’s, uh,” she fumbled for words. Matthias had asked it so nonchalantly but Leyla could see the slight curve up his mouth. He was having fun with her.

“Uh, I mean to perhaps help out Uncle Bill with his workload…” the foot pressed up against hers slid up slightly, almost making her gasp in the sudden movement but managed to continue anyway, “A-and also prepare for the next semester!” she finished, raising her voice slightly at the end of it due to embarrassment.

Norma couldn’t help but laugh at the strange behaviour Leyla had. She had been watching with apt attention, and noted as though she was trying to make a quiet declaration of what she wanted to do.

It was a refreshing sight to see for the matriarch.

“Those are very good activities over the break Miss Lewellin,” she told Leyla, “Bill Remmer raised you very well indeed.” she smiled brightly, making Leyla flush in appreciation at the way Uncle Bill was commended.

“I’m flattered you thought so, Madam.” she replied softly, voice now dropped to a whisper as she now wanted to crawl into a hole. Matthias then shifted, crossing his legs as he looked at Leyla rather smugly, from beside his grandmother.

“Yes, you would make a fine teacher one day yet, Miss Lewellin.” Matthias added and Leyla looked back at him, “And I can’t wait to see more of you.” he finished.

Leyla can’t help but want to trample his nearest foot with her heels, but resisted to do so. For now, she would have to give him the same respect she would with Madam Norma.


“I thank you for your words, Duke.” she politely responded. Satisfied the conversation was over, she looked back outside, deciding to not look at the Duke any more tonight. Then again, it was a tedious task to do because of the small carriage.

When their eyes met again, Leyla couldn’t help but flinch away. His eyes were now dull and held no emotion, as though to compensate for the various expressions he’d shown her before.

Those eyes…

Those eyes reminded her of that summer day when the river engulfed her.



The journey back took twice as long, no thanks to the growing snow before they finally turned towards the road that led straight to Arvis.

The rest of the journey had also taken a quiet turn not too long ago, when the Herhardt matriarch fell asleep along the way. The only sounds that could be heard was the stomping of the horses’ hooves outside, along with some rattling the carriage made.

Matthias had looked out the window long ago, before finally turning his gaze towards Leyla, wondering what she was doing to pass the time, when he saw her fast asleep as well. He noted that not too long ago she had been awake, trying to be vigilant within his presence. Though it seemed at some point she fell asleep anyway.

His eyes now unashamedly trailed along her figure, his gaze stopping right by her shut eyes. Even in the dim light inside the carriage, he could see the way her necklace gleamed beautifully, reflecting the moonlight that managed to seep in.

His eyes trailed further down, watching the way her lips parted, the slow and gentle rise of her breathing, down to her heeled feet. They looked so small compared to his own, now that they lay side by side with each other. Her feet almost reminded him of a doll’s.

He found himself amazed by how such small feet could carry such a majestic woman as though it was nothing.

Suddenly, the carriage pulled into a stop, shaking Matthias away from his thoughts.

“Bill! Why are you out here?” Mr. Pat, the coachman exclaimed, when he saw his friend waiting around in the cold. At the sudden halt, Leyla jolted awake, looking around in a daze as she rubbed the sleep from her eye.

“I saw the weather beginning to look bad, so I got worried about Leyla.” Bill replied to the coachman.

“Leyla’s fine, she’s right inside here with the Herhardts, thanks to Madam Norma. I’m certain she was well taken care of.”

“Oh? She rode with you?”

The muffled sounds of the conversation outside filtered towards the occupants of the carriage, that it was enough to awaken Norma Catharina von Herhardt. Seeing her awake, Leyla quickly fixed her appearance, before gently taking the madam’s attention.

“Uh, Madam Norma?” she called out softly, with a soft smile. Norma need not hear the words, for she understood completely what Leyla wanted and nodded, smiling back at her.

“Well then, this is goodbye for now. Off you go, Leyla. Bill’s waiting for you.”

Leyla bid them both adieu before taking leave, leaving both Herhardts in the carriage behind.



“She’s lucky to have been raised by Bill Remmer,” Norma said as soon as the carriage began to move.

“I agree, grandmother.” Matthias responded, having practised his responses for her with ease over the years, eyes staring outside, watching the way Leyla ran up to her uncle with a tight embrace.

For now, he could only stare uselessly at her back as she continued to grow smaller the further they got.

He didn’t like this feeling in his chest; this feeling telling him he was leaving something important to him.

“Hmm, I’m surprised Bill has a soft side to him,” it seemed like he wasn’t the only one looking back, “I can’t even act like that around my own child. I doubt even God predicted such a side from him as well.” Norma continued on as she stared wistfully at the old gardener and his foster child.

Matthias remained silent, unsure of what answer to provide his grandmother to show he was listening.

“I hoped she’d stay forever by Bill’s side. But I didn’t expect her to want to leave Arvis.” his grandmother grumbled, making Matthias’ thoughts halt at the new information he just heard.

“Transfer? Leyla Lewellin wishes to be transferred away from Arvis?” he asked, a frown burrowing in his brows and his grandmother nodded in confirmation, oblivious to the troubling thoughts of her grandson.

“Oh yes, I received word she requested to transfer to a different city, something about broadening her experience.” Norma can’t help but scoff, “Young women these days are never content to stay close. Don’t they know home is the best place for them?”

She tutted softly beside Matthias, before continuing with her tirade. Matthias only opted to remain silent, attentively listening by now.

“I only heard about the transfer a while ago, when the Principal told me. She tried to dissuade the girl, but she was quite adamant to go.” Norma shared, “Even the Principal was shocked she wanted to leave. All her students love her after all, including their parents!”

The frown on Matthias’ face grew deeper as he listened to the next part of his grandmother’s news.

“Though maybe her leaving has something to do after she broke off her engagement with Kyle Etman, which is understandable to me; though that doesn’t explain why she wants to move so far away from Bill.” she sighed finally finished. Matthias jaw clenched as he slowly fisted his hands in quiet anger.

“I see.” he finally said, eyes glaring at the snowfall outside.

“Of course the Principal told Leyla she still has the rest of the year to complete, and should she change her mind not to hesitate in telling her so.” she added as an afterthought, “Though personally, I want her to stay.” Norma sighed wistfully once more, looking somber at the thought of Leyla leaving Arvis.

And then a sudden thought struck Norma.

“Come to think of it, doesn’t the Principal have a distant relative nearby who owns that big grocery store downton?” Matthias wordlessly nods, “Yes, I remember she mentioned wishing for Leyla to meet and hit it off with him. Which would work perfectly!” she cheered to herself.

“Think of it, she might not come from a good background, but with her pretty face and her brain, she’d be a catch to anyone. After all, it’s quite common for engagements to be broken off nowadays. Though I wonder if marrying someone would be enough to change her mind…” Norma wondered out loud. “The Principal seems to want to match them up.”

“I completely agree.” Matthias took a deep breath, trying not to make his irritation noticeable.

“Ah well, even if Bill disapproves of the merchant, I can always ask Hessen for a decent, young, unmarried man who lives nearby and present him to Bill.” Norma said, content with her recent plan so far, “After all, it’s best for someone like her to marry young and have a family while she teaches. Not to mention still manage to live near Bill. Don’t you agree, Matthias?”

Just in time, the carriage halted to a stop, signifying they’ve arrived at their mansion. Wasting no time, Matthias immediately opened up the carriage door, and got off, trying to compose himself, before schooling his expression.

He turned around, fixing his lapel underneath his coat and gave his hand to his grandmother, who gratefully took it. “Shall we, grandmother?” he asked, as polite and graceful as ever.

“Thank you, sweet boy.” she smiled at him as he helped her down the carriage. With their conversation officially over for the night, the only sounds left were the click and clacking of their shoes against the polished floors as they walked inside the mansion’s halls.



When Bill and Leyla pulled away from each other after they hugged, they held hands as they continued their walk back home after seeing the Duke’s carriage had finally left the entrance of Arvis.


Bill had immediately asked Leyla about the charity event, who after being sworn by Leyla not to laugh, eagerly listened. Leyla told him about the people, how the play went, before one of her students broke down crying that she had to stand in as their substitute. The rest of the evening then went downhill for Leyla as she was humiliated.

Bill couldn’t help but laugh out loud at her story!

“You promised you wouldn’t laugh!” whined Leyla, flushing red in embarrassment, which only served to make him laugh more. Leyla harrumphed defeatedly, before resigning herself to the fact at least one more person was laughing because of her.

Bill’s laughter soon died down as he wiped a tear from his eye, before patting Leyla on the back comfortingly.

“There, there now Leyla, I have no doubt you looked absolutely adorable next to the children. No doubt at all.” he grinned at his foster daughter. Leyla pouted before hugging him from the side, as they both huddled for the warmth each other brought.

“I doubt the rest of the audience thought so as well.” she grumbled, resting her head on her uncle’s shoulder as they continued to walk. Despite the growing ache in her feet, Leyla couldn’t help but feel all is better in the world once again now that her uncle’s here.

They reached as far enough as the outskirts of the roe garden before Bill let out a cough and stopped to look at Leyla’s feet. “Do you want to ride on my back, Leyla? It would make you feel better to be off your feet.”

“What?! There’s absolutely no need for that!” she chuckled, denying vehemently the offer, “Besides, I’m no longer a child, uncle. I’m fine, really.”

“Are you sure?” he asked her sceptically, “Because I’ve noticed for a while now you’ve been limping. The heels must be uncomfortable by now.” he pointed out, making Leyla squirm. He sighed, knowing just how stubborn she was, but he was equally stubborn too.

He crouched down in front of Leyla, waiting no further reply as he wordlessly encouraged her to get on his back.

“Uncle…” Leyla murmured, touched by the caring gesture he’s given her.

“Well, it’s either a piggyback ride, or I carry you like a sack of potatoes, your choice.” Bill further prompted when Leyla made no move. Leyla couldn’t help but pout at the suggestion.

“But you’ll get tired.” she protested, making Bill chuckle.

“Just how old do you think I am? I’m not that old, girl.” he reminded, “I’m only still a middle-aged man, I can carry loads twice as much as you with no problem.” he boasted. Sighing deeply, Leyla gave in and climbed on his back.


Bill hoisted them both up, Leyla grabbing him by the shoulders, as he supported her from under her knees and resumed their trek back to their house. Bill strode down the forest path with ease, and Leyla couldn’t help but smile as she felt like a child once again.

It didn’t take long for her teeth to begin chattering, as short, white puffs of air began to escape her. Bill noticed this, and couldn’t help but laugh at Leyla once more, who lightly thumped his back in indignation. Bill only laughed harder, and Leyla pressed her body to her uncle’s back looking at the pair of footprints turning into one behind them.


Chapter 65.

Suitable Groom.


“Thank you for walking me all this way, I can take it from here.” Leyla smiled awkwardly at the man with her, trying her best to be polite. However, he seemed to be unwilling to part with her just yet.

“Oh please it’s no problem, it’s just a little more distance.” he insisted.

“Oh no, there’s no need,” Leyla politely declined once more, “My uncle’s very strict you see.” she told him, discreetly looking around, hoping no one has seen them yet.

It didn’t matter what Leyla would say as soon as rumours of her being seen around with a man would spread like wildfire in Arvis. She hated having to throw her uncle’s name under the bus, but it wasn’t as though it was untrue.

“Oh, I understand.” he finally complied, looking a bit dejected, before smiling at her once again, “Well, I guess I better go then. I had fun today, how about we do this again through lunch on Sunday?” he asked hopefully, making Leyla smile apologetically at him.

“I’m sorry, I can’t…”


“Or if this week’s not available, perhaps sometime next week? I don’t mind.” he quickly retracted, “I’m just hoping we could do this again.” he finished, flushing slightly under her gaze, but sounded quite sincere for her.

“I feel terrible having to spend such a short time with you over tea.” he reasoned out, “I’d love for us to have a proper chance to get to know each other more, that is, if you feel the same.” he admitted, “If not well, I promise not to trouble you any longer.”

Leyla could see he was being very truthful to her, and that no matter what her answer would be, he would respect her wishes. But until then, he was not leaving without a proper answer from her.




Leyla and the grocery store owner’s son were not well acquainted with each other before this. As far as she knew, he was the one in charge of the school’s delivery of their weekly supplies. She never expected to get to know him beyond that.

So when she had been called to the headmistress’ office just this afternoon, she was shocked to see him there with her. She soon found out he was the headmistress’ distant relative, looking for a relationship leading to marriage.

Leyla’s mind blanked out at that information.

Again, she couldn’t help but give another once over around them. Immediately, she heard the familiar sound of a car rolling down the pavement, and turned towards its general vicinity. She felt panic beginning to seize her chest, as she hoped for a miracle she was mistaken, but she was never that lucky.

Bright lights flashed them both on the pavement, the car having slowed down as it neared them before speeding up as it passed them by…

Leyla recognized that car anywhere. It was Duke Herhardt’s vehicle.

“Miss Lewellin?” His gentle voice shook Leyla out of her thoughts before she remembered she remained unresponsive with him for some time now, having been locked in her thoughts.

“I, I’m sorry.” she apologised, bowing before him, “I’m not ready yet for that kind of relationship.” she admitted to him, looking apologetic.

Though the headmistress might have set them up to have tea together, she found him to be amicable to be with. It’s not that she’s against marrying, she was sure she wants to someday. But just not right now, for now, it was enough for her to have a stable job and live a normal life.

“Oh, well, I completely understand.” he replied, sounding dejected. He stepped back, smiling back at her reassuringly he was not angry at all, and apologised for the trouble she went through.


They parted ways, and Leyla watched as he left in a sullen manner. It made Leyla uncomfortable knowing she had to turn down such a kind man, but it was for the better. If she had accepted him sooner than she should, she would have hurt him in the end.

Just as she did with Kyle.

Leyla’s gaze turned dark as the name entered her thoughts.

There had been many times, since their separation, that she’d wonder how he was. However in the end she found it enough for her to pray for his well being for now. She missed him dearly, but she couldn’t go back to the times when it was so easy to be with him.

She can’t go back to the moments when she could still laugh, chat and walk freely with Kyle.



The skies have turned dark, the street lamps now lit up. Anxiety bubbled up in her as soon as she shook her fond memories of him away out of mind. This anxiousness in her felt just like she did with the first autumn she had spent with the duke.

She breathed in, and closed her eyes, imagining the distant spring time to come. She’d be in a new place by then, planning to start a new chapter in her life. She hoped when she moved she could find a lodging room with a huge window, allowing the sun to seep in and fill her space.

It would also be ideal if there were some trees nearby, or a park she could see through. That way she only needs to open the window to breathe in the fresh smell of cut grass or the wet forest floor after a rain. That’s what she would miss most in Arvis after all.

She soon found herself calming down the more she thought about her successful move away from Arvis. Composed and confident everything would be fine, she gripped the handle of her bicycle tightly, and began to move, turning carefully around the corner.

Her eyes were only set in front of her, on the empty asphalt road, framed by the trees on either side, moonlight guiding her way home. She breathed in deeply, relaxed in her assumed solitude, pedalling briskly as she continued in her way.

She was completely oblivious to the Duke Herhardt that had been nearby, waiting for her quietly by the shadowed side of the pavement.






Kyle was overcome by a familiar trepidation whenever he approached his mailbox. It’s become a habit now, whenever he’d retrieve his mails, for him to search for a particular letter. He always arrived with that faint hope that this time, he’d get a reply.

However, when he sifted through his mail, none of them were from Leyla. His smile fell, as he turned sullen. Week after week he’d write to her, hoping for word of how she was, a response to his letters to her. But she’d never written back, not once.

With a dejected sigh, he closed his mailbox once more, and went back up to his dormitories. His room was located on the east wing, third floor. With vacation just right around the corner, students were busying themselves in packing for home. But Kyle was yet to be struck with the need to do the same.

His room was just as usual. He opened up his dorm room, greeted by nothing but the darkened room, and tossed his meagre pile of letters by the console table, right beside the doorway. There were only a couple of them today, an invitation to an upcoming social gathering, and one from home.

He plopped himself on his bed, not having the energy to read through their contents. He watched the moonlight filter through his window, slipping through the gaps between his curtains as it shone on his sulking form.

‘Why don’t you go on a trip during your first break?’

Those were his father’s words just a few days ago when he phoned home. While it was true that nowadays, most of the wealthier students tend to go off on trips across the continent during breaks, he was certain his father had some other reason in mind.

He glossed over a proper response to his suggestion, telling him he’d think about it. No matter what he’d decide on, he knew it was pointless to go back and seek Leyla out by now. So what point was there for him to travel?

‘Should I just lay here then, all miserable without her?’ he pondered, shifting to lie on his back instead of his stomach. ‘To stay until I become insane from staring at concrete while drowning myself in studies?’

‘There’s no place in this world where only the two of us can be happy.’

He tossed his arm over his eyes, chuckling dryly to himself as he recalled Leyla’s words to him. He couldn’t even answer her, couldn’t find his voice to speak back at that time. And now, all that’s left of him is a deep sense of self-loathing.

He hated how weak he had been, how he was nothing if not for his parents. But most of all, he hated how he couldn’t even protect the woman he loved most in the world.

‘Leyla, I wanted to be a doctor so that I could find a place where we could both be happy.’ he thought wistfully, feeling the pinprick of tears in his eyes, ‘But that’s still in the distant future, could I survive that long to be parted from you?’


He pressed his palms over his eyes before sighing. He pulled his hands away as he opened his eyes, before trying to catch the light of the moon in his hands.

‘Even a few months away from you is torture.’

Kyle was almost of age by now, which meant he could finally claim the inheritance his grandfather left him. He regretted having not thought about it sooner.

He sat up on his bed, and ran his fingers through his dishevelled hair, staring at nothing but the blank walls of his dorm. Making up his mind, he immediately got up, flipped the light by his desk on, and grabbed some pen and paper.

He was nervous when he wrote it down, but this was an urgent matter he needed to do.








“Why, all of a sudden, is everyone trying to find you a groom?” Bill suddenly piped up as he watched Leyla set the table for dinner. When he’d asked her about her day, he hadn’t expected her to have been out with the grocery store owner’s son, a meeting set up by the headmistress.

Leyla looked up at him, frowning as she tilted her head in confusion.

““What do you mean by everyone?” she asked curiously. Bill scratched the back of his head as he recalled earlier events.

“You know, Mrs. Mona, the chatty chef?” Leyla nodded to indicate she knew who he was talking about, “Well she approached me a while ago, telling me she overheard Madam Norma asking Hessen around for a suitable groom for you.” he informed her. Leyla couldn’t help but grow more confused, and more curious.

“Why would Madam Norma do that?”

“I don’t know,” Bill shrugged, “Perhaps she took a liking to you.” he added offhandedly as he placed their food on the dinner table. Leyla couldn’t help but scoff.

“No way.” she added preposterously, smiling as she sat across Bill from the table as he fetched the bread out of the stove.

“Well, I don’t see any other reason why she’d find you a groom.” Bill pointed out and sat down on his seat, “So why do you think she would?” he asked her this time, looking at her inquiringly.

“Uncle, you’re not getting tired of being around me, are you?” Leyla teased, making Bill puff out a scoff and waved the accusations away.

“What kind of nonsense is that?”

“If that’s not the case, then you won’t mind if I’m going to live with you forever?” she further said, grinning as they gathered food into their plates and began to dig in.

The conversation died down a little, the only sound coming was the scraping of their utensils against the plates as they ate. Bill leaned back in his chair, deep in thought as he chewed carefully, eyeing Leyla, before swallowing the food.

“So, if ever Madam Norma introduces you to a strapping young man,” Bill began, breaking the silence between them, “You’d refuse him?”

Leyla only smiled sadly at him, seeing the concern reflected through her uncle’s eyes for her.

“Well, I’d certainly love to meet someone who’s just like you Uncle,” she admitted, “Unfortunately, I think no one is like you.” she smiled, hoping to reassure him, but Bill could only ache for her.

Once more he couldn’t help but feel like it was Kyle why she was like this. He was certain she was so hurt by their failed engagement, she found herself no longer wanting marriage, hence continuously turning down marriage offers.

Though that’s not stopping Kyle from wanting to reconnect with her. As much as it pained him to lie to her, Bill had to take Kyle’s letters away from her pile every time he saw one from the man. He knew that they had a good relationship in the past, but for him it was beyond a point of repair.

“Should, uh, Leyla…” he trailed off, making Leyla hum as she listened to what he had to say…

‘If Leyla still has feelings for Kyle, would it help if Kyle cuts ties with the Etman household?’ Bill couldn’t help but wonder, ‘It might be a rough start, but I’d help them settle down, even if they move to the capital city.’

Should that happen, Bill has resolved himself to move with them. It might be difficult for him to get a job as a gardener from Arvis there, but he’s willing to quit for Leyla. And should the time come to pass, and Leyla gives birth to their child, then perhaps that wicked Mrs. Etman would come around to accepting their relationship.

“Uncle?” Leyla called out, having heard nothing from him for sometime now.

“Hm?” He looked up at her in confusion.

“You were saying?” she prompted gently, making him remember they were still in the middle of a conversation.

“Ah right, um, chicken!” he declared, “Yes, yes, chickens.” he murmured, tapping his fingers thoughtfully against the tabletop. Leyla’s face twisted into confusion.

“Chickens?”


“Yes! Should we catch chickens tomorrow?” Bill asked rather jovially, before seeing the concern in her eyes, “It slipped my mind for a while there, must be my age getting to me. I’m fine Leyla.” he excused rather sheepishly, smiling brightly at her.

Next time, he’d think twice before opening his mouth to speak. He was fortunate that Leyla hadn’t doubted him yet, so she only smiled and nodded brightly back at him.

“Sure uncle, let’s have some chickens tomorrow.” She readily agreed and they both began finishing their meals.








Slender fingers grabbed the knob for the phonograph’s volume, turning it up. The figure turned around, heading towards his wing chair, the firelight illuminating his face, revealing Matthias.

He sat quietly in his darkened room, staring into the fire, the only light source he had right now.

Suddenly, there was a fluttering of wings, as the cage rattled, and a bird landed by his perched fingers.

He regarded it slowly, gently turning his fingers, whistling the same tune of the music that was playing. It didn’t take long for his bird to follow in suit, chirping along with the tunes. Matthias couldn’t help the smug grin on his lips.

His bird was clever. Despite having never trained it, it followed him wordlessly, chirping along naturally to the music. It was thanks to his beautiful canary he enjoyed listening to the music as it followed along.

The music he mostly played was waltz, though sometimes he liked to mix it up with either the orchestra symphonies, or ballet bagatelles. As far as he could tell, his canary would sing beautifully whenever it was a waltz it was copying.

Finally the music stopped, soft melodies fading out as the piece ended, leaving only the crackling of firewood to fill the quiet room. Matthias lightly caressed his bird with the pads of his fingers, wordlessly praising its natural talent.

Familiar with its master’s touch, the canary nuzzled towards his fingers, lightly tapping its beak as though it was trying to kiss his hand. Matthias smirked, slowly getting up as he approached his bird’s cage.

He lowered his hand, hovering right in front of the cage’s entrance, before it fluttered back in to settle inside it’s plush and cosy nest. Matthias quietly locked the golden cage close, before turning towards the phonograph to cut the beginnings of the next song off.


He breathed in deeply, before letting out an exhausted sigh as he languidly rested on top of his bed, looking up at the ceiling. He then turned his head, to look at his bird with a smile, in his mind, imagining a different one instead…

“Good night.” he said to it, seeing his canary settle down into sweet slumber. As soon as the bird was asleep, the smile faded on Matthias’ lips as he kept staring at the bird.


Chapter 66.


Ruined Heaven.

When the mailman came to deliver their letters, Bill came out to receive it. He sifted through the letters before spotting another one from Kyle. The only difference was, this one’s thicker than the previous ones that came.

“What are you going to do about that, Mr. Remmer?” the mailman asked, his voice dropped in a whisper. Through the past fall and winter seasons, he had been an accomplice of Bill from keeping Kyle’s letters to reaching her. Making him just as guilty as Bill.

“You can’t keep hiding them forever.” the mailman couldn’t help but point out. Bill sighed, placing the letter between his pile of mail, nodding to the mailman.

“I’m well aware of that.” he looked out to the road, breathing deeply as he stared at the direction towards Leyla’s school, “I’ll tell her soon.” he admitted, the mailman appeared relieved with the news.

“Yes, it should come from you. I promise I won’t say anything.”

“Much appreciated,” Bill thanked, “I’m sorry for dragging you into this.”

“Hey, it’s alright, I know you’re only looking out for Leyla.” the mailman assured him, “Though it must be troubling you greatly.” he smiled sadly at the gardener, as though he understood how he felt.

He loved to think he knew Bill better than anyone in Arvis. After all, he was the one responsible for bringing Leyla Lewellin to Arvis as a child. He watched Bill change with Leyla in his life. It was that love for the child that made Bill happier than he was before.

They bid each other goodbye, leaving Bill as he returned back to their cabin. Leyla had gone to work earlier, which made him alone right now.

Bill tossed the letter onto the table, looking at it strongly, before impulsively pulling out all of Kyle’s letters, tied into a bundle. There were so many he prevented from reaching Leyla, he suspected she’d be rather angry and distrustful of him once the truth came out…



But it didn’t matter how scared he was of how she’d respond. What mattered was he couldn’t keep doing this to her. The guilt of lying and keeping such a huge thing as this was getting too much for him.

And so he sat down, untied the current bundle, arranging them properly by date, before adding in the latest one. He wrapped the string back around to keep them secure, before placing them down to the edge of the table.

There. Maybe if he’d see it as he returned, he would be reminded of the guilt, and be unable to talk himself out of coming clean to Leyla.

He had thought about it before, trying to ease his guilt by saying what he was doing was best for Leyla, but really, the only choice that mattered in that department was Leyla. She was the only one who could choose what was best for her, and whatever her choice, he’d support her fully.

With his mind made up, Bill got up from his seat and exited his cabin, locking it as he left. He neared the chicken coop, scoping out his target. Once he chose which among them would be their dinner tonight, he went towards the greenhouse, owned by the Duke. As soon as he entered, a familiar voice greeted him.

“Good day Bill!” the zookeeper called out to him as he crouched down on a nearby flower bed to get started with his work.

They’d been colleagues for a long time now. Bill liked to think they were friends by now. He waved back, giving the flowers a once over, before getting up and headed to the warehouse to chop up some firewood.

The zookeeper approached him not soon after he did so.


“By the way Bill, the butler made a request not to stack the firewood right next to the generators.” he informed him, making Bill frown at the new instructions. Bill grumbled about how the new machines were dictating his job.

The generators were a new instalment, which supposedly provided the mansion with this thing called an electricity, which they apparently produced. Bill had no idea what the fuss was all about, all he knew is it was a massive headache to learn.

“Thank you for telling me.” Bill replied, sighing as he looked around, “I think I can manage this one on my own, no need to worry.” he assured, letting the zookeeper leave to do their own job.

He walked back towards the warehouse, and pulled the doors open, before being greeted with loud whirring sounds. He winced as he strode in, the sound making the ground vibrate whenever he neared the operating machine.

He cursed under his breath, complaining about how loud it was every time he had to be in the warehouse. He shot the machine a glare as he passed by. Things were so much easier before, and a lot less hassle than these infernal devices!

His distaste for modern technology was something he shared with the Herhardt matriarch, Madam Norma.

He mourned the days where he once worked silently in the warehouse, without the fuss of technology. He looked up, and was surprised to see Madam Norma, who was probably taking a stroll around the greenhouse. He greeted her respectfully as she asked him how work was.



“Nothing much, madam,” he replied, “It’s just this thing is making more of a fuss today.” he observed, and began stacking some firewood right next to them.

Perhaps making a physical barrier between him and the generator would make it quieter. It would certainly help his sanity. He shook his head and brought more of the firewood he collected inside to pile right next to the machine.

“Things were much easier back in the day.” Madam Norma hummed thoughtfully as she watched Bill work. Of that statement, he couldn’t agree more.






There was a loud cacophony in Leyla’s class, as the children portrayed mixed reactions. Some had broken off into their respective groups, others opted to stay in their seats. There was a mixture of children laughing, while there were those who were despairing.

Among the latter, was little Monica.

Leyla had just informed the students of her decision to transfer away from school, and thus was saying goodbye to them. She was most concerned for Monica, who might have taken the news too hard. Still, it was better to prepare them for their parting ways this early despite the remaining few months she still had with them.

After making sure each of her students were alright, and understood she was only moving away and not abandoning them, she deemed her job finished and dismissed them. School was done for the day, so all she had to do was go back to her desk by the classroom to gather up her things.

She still has dinner to prepare for after all. Perhaps she could cook them some roasted chicken tonight.

As she was getting ready to leave school, and back to their cabin, she found herself busy with whether she should buy Uncle Bill either some new socks, a sweater, or a nice bottle of wine to share. She pedalled absentmindedly, wondering how he’ll take the news of her moving to another city by the next semester.

‘He’ll be heartbroken for sure,’ she thought to herself, ‘Perhaps a nice drink will be a better consolation gift after all.’ She slipped out of her school slippers, before putting back on her shoes, tucking the slippers into the lockers properly, before smiling to herself in satisfaction.

“You really think that’s going to stop me?”

Matthias’ words to her during that night at the charity event echoed through her mind as she put on her shoes. The more she recalled his words, the more she found it incredulous he would say such a thing. He wasn’t the type of man to be throwing around such empty threats. Leyla always thought he would remain the ever serious duke, even to his grave.

‘Is it because of winter that he’s like this?’ she couldn’t help but wonder, ‘Is the cold getting to him after all?’

She hadn’t had much interaction with him at all since the season started. At first she had been so anxious by his absence, but eventually grew relieved with her newfound peace. She really hoped it would stay that way…

That one day, his interest in her would fade into nothing, and she could go back to the way her life was before she even met him.

She grabbed her coat by the entrance of the school, tucking it around herself and closing all it’s buttons. She pushed the doors open with her free hand, carrying a box of her belongings with the other as she


went to where her bike was. She secured her things first on her bike’s basket, before finally pedalling back home.

She went through her usual route, passing by downtown to buy some additional groceries. Once she was done, she tied it to the back of her bike instead as her basket was already full of her belongings.

“Give my regards to Mr. Remmer!” the owner called out just as she was about to leave, to which she only nodded back with a smile.

“I will! Thank you!” She replied.

“Oh, and be careful on your way back! Bill might cry if the wine breaks once you get home.”

“I’ll be careful,” Leyla laughed, “Good bye!” She bid him goodbye and went on her way.

Despite the cold air, the sun provided her with enough warmth for the clear day still left. She sped up as the skies turned orange, giving the afternoon a golden glow as the sun began to set. It has been a good day so far. Nothing was amiss.

At least, nothing until she entered the streets leading to Arvis.

“Leyla! Leyla!” a shrill voice called out to her, making Leyla halt in alarm, just in time for a fire brigade to pass her by, and straight towards the Duke’s mansion. “Leyla!”

She looked around, before seeing a frantic Mrs. Mona, who was practically in tears, held onto her hands as though she was holding on to dear life! Leyla grew alarmed.

“M-Mrs. Mona, what is it? What’s wrong?” she quickly inquired, “Why did I just see the fire brigade?!” she frantically looked around, before spotting the smoke trail…

Leyla couldn’t help but feel her heart constrict on her chest when she realised the smoke was coming directly from the Duke’s greenhouse.

“No! It can’t be!” Leyla exclaimed, turning back to ask Mrs. Mona, “The greenhouse is on fire?!”

“Oh it wasn’t just a fire Leyla!” Mrs. Mona wailed, tears streaming down her face, “I heard the electric generator practically exploded, taking half of the greenhouse with it in the process!” Leyla gasped in alarm, “But the worst part of it, they say it’s Bill Remmer who was to blame!”

“What?!” she asked incredulously, “Why uncle?! What happened?”

And so Mrs. Mona talked.

She told her how she couldn’t understand fully what they had been saying, but from what she could piece together was that Bill had done something to the generators which was why it exploded. But the worst part of it all was not the explosion itself…

It was the fact that Madam Norma had been there during the explosion.


“She’s only gotten injured thankfully, but practically the whole mansion is in a disarray!” Mrs. Mona paused, catching her breath, “Right now the police had been combing through the vicinity looking for-”

“Uncle!” Leyla called out, cutting off Mrs. Mona as she saw her uncle being escorted by policemen. She quickly ran towards him. Bill looked up at the sound of her voice, surprised to see her. “Uncle are you alright?!” she quickly asked but was halted by the other police from going near him.

She took in his appearance. He was covered in soot, parts of his clothes were singed, and he had some cuts and bruises all over him. Leyla felt her heart breaking.

“Uncle what’s happening?! Why are they saying it’s your fault!?” She called out to him as the police held her back as they dragged him away from her, “Uncle, it’s not true right?! It can’t be! It’s just a misunderstanding!”

Bill tried to smile comfortingly at her, but it was difficult to look back when the police were adamant he had to go.

“I’ll be alright Leyla, I’m sure this will all be over soon.” he told her comfortingly, but it wasn’t enough to ease the cold chill in Leyla’s chest. “I’ll be back shortly. Okay Leyla, I’ll be back-”

“Start moving.” the police grunted as they pushed Bill to keep moving, Leyla tried to get away from the police holding her back, but she was pushed away, and right into Mrs. Mona’s embrace who quickly held back Leyla in a comforting hug.

“Uncle!” she called out, tears now streaming down her cheeks as she watched the police load Bill harshly into their car, slamming the door on his face, cutting off whatever it was he wanted to tell her. He only looked back at her silently, smiling comfortingly all this time.

Leyla crumpled to the ground when the police left with their cars, and Uncle Bill with them before disappearing from the streets of Arvis.

People rushed about to Leyla’s side, trying to help her stand, when she stumbled and collapsed in their arms. Leyla’s resounding cry echoes throughout Arvis’ winter night, before being drowned by the surrounding sounds of worry by the servants.

But right before she passed out, she could have sworn the duke was there, standing right on the mansion’s front porch, atop the staircase.

And then her world turned black.






Leyla arrived in Arvis with a sunken face as she stared blankly at the road in front of her. When she regained consciousness, she immediately went to the police station and demanded to know what happened to her uncle, and what she could do.

Unfortunately, there was nothing, the police informed her.

The explosion had happened because of the many firewood that had been stacked beside it, which ultimately collapsed about half of the greenhouse. The glass around it cracked and shot out to everyone nearby, including Madam Norma, who was admiring the flowerbeds by the greenhouse at that moment.

It was fortunate enough that the maid with her shielded her from the explosion, but the Herhardt matriarch still sustained broken bones from the impact of the explosion when the debris struck her. Add to the fact that the greenhouse, which was hailed as the most beautiful one around and home to various rare plants, was irrevocably irreparable.

The police knew it was all an accident, but even if her uncle Bill hadn’t intended to do so, the accident took place, and someone must be held responsible. Especially a prominent figure in the community as Madam Norma had been injured in the accident.

The police did take pity on her, allowing her to speak with Bill on her visit, but it only led to more despairing words before she had to say goodbye.

“Perhaps if the Duke were to lessen the charges against him, he could get out sooner,” the police told her just as she was about to leave, “However, as of now, there’s nothing else for him to do but to serve time for his current charges.”

They helped Leyla up, who had been begging on her knees for anything she could do for them to release him. She had failed in getting her uncle out. None of the police in the station were able to look her in the eyes after that. That’s when she knew there was really no other way they could show her.

‘Should his sentence be final, would uncle really go to jail?!’ she thought in despair as she walked the lonely road in Arvis.

She’s not certain what exactly the procedure was for such incidents, but she knew it would need a lot of time and money for a lawsuit to be filed. She can’t even pay the bail for her uncle right now.

She was unsure as to how she managed to reach Arvis, but she knew the only way she could help Uncle Bill was to beg mercy from the Herhardt household. All she could do was cry in the dark, her body moving in autopilot for her. But how could she do that?

Madam Norma had gotten hurt during that explosion, not to mention their precious greenhouse was in shambles. Should she present herself in front of Madam Elysee, all crying and begging, she might make the problem worse for her uncle…

And then she caught sight of the mansion, the only source of light in the dark neighbourhood. And then a thought struck her!


‘Duke Herhardt! If it’s him, then surely…’ her thoughts trailed off as she began to pick up her pace despite her staggering steps.

The Duke was ultimately the owner of the household. Sure he made her uncomfortable, terrified and bullied her relentlessly, made her confused with his actions over the past autumn season, but perhaps he would help her.

She clasped her hands together in prayer as she passed by the still rose garden, and through the forest path. The river streamed restlessly once she passed through the riverbank, her breath quickening as she drew closer to the mansion.

She could see the annex up ahead despite her white puffs of breath. The lights were still on!

And so Leyla broke out into a run, heading towards her light at the end of the tunnel.

‘Start from next episode, there will be many scenes of non-consensual sexual acts, that some reader may find disturbing. So if you get triggered easily, please be careful when reading it’


Chapter 67.



The Owner of Arvis.


Norma watched as Elysee von Herhardt, Matthias’ mother, kept walking back and forth all over her room. She fluffed up her pillows, tucked her in securely in bed, before checking over some last minute details to ensure she was comfortable.

“I can’t help but feel sorry for Bill.” Norma piped up, making Elysee turn around in shock at the matriarch’s words.

“Sorry?” she asked incredulously, before sitting down at the edge of Norma’s bed, “How could you say your sorry for him? You’re the one injured by his negligence and destroyed the greenhouse!” she exclaimed in an outrage.

Normally Elysee wouldn’t dare raise her tone at Norma, she respected the Herhardt matriarch too much. However, in this case she couldn’t help herself.

“I didn’t get hurt that badly.” Norma softly explained, making Elysee scoff in disbelief at her words.

“I can’t believe how forgiving you are of this!” she exclaimed, “You have broken bones! You almost died! The only reason it wasn’t worse than that was because the maid took most of the brunt of the explosion.” she pointed out.

She got up and began to fix the medicine by Norma’s vanity, posture tense and angry as she tried to calm her tone as she reasoned with Norma.

“Also, Hessen had already given them warnings about not stacking firewood too close to the generators, and yet he deliberately did the opposite!”

“He’s not some rookie employee Elysee, we’ve known him for years.” Norma added, “You and I both know this was all an accident.”


“Well, that accident of his cost me my birds, and around half of your rare plants! We were fortunate that no person was involved in the casualties, but you could have been one too. Even the year end party at Arvis is ruined now because the generator is gone.” Elysee ended her argument.



The rest of the banquet hall and dining room were now stuck with old fashioned lamps just to light them up. The mansion’s electricity was practically non-existent at this point because most of the lamps had been replaced to use the electricity, and now they were completely useless.

“I did tell you we didn’t need that crude electricity.” Norma huffed out. It was no secret from the start that the elder matriarch had been against changing the ways of the house. She was practically happy having lost the generators.

There was no need for useless things. Things worked perfectly fine as they were before.

“And I understand how you feel, Elysee,” Norma continued, “But what good will punishing a gardener for things we can’t undo? It won’t bring back this electricity, nor rebuild the greenhouse. Better let him go now, especially since I’m certain he can’t afford to pay us back.”

“It’s not about the money!” Elysee pointed out exasperatedly, “It’s about responsibility, and making the rest of our servants vigilant in following orders.”

There was a tense silence between the two of them now. Elysee was trying to even her breathing while Norma remained contemplative.

“So you’re going to send Bill Remmer to jail then?” Norma finally asked, and Elysee let out a deep breath, shrugging.

“If the court deems him guilty, then he will be.” Elysee replied diplomatically.

“Elysee,” Norma softly called out, “Bill has been with us for years, been there since before Matthias was born. He’s a friend by now. Also think about Leyla. What would happen to her now he’s gone.” she pleaded, Elysee could only shake her head in disbelief.

“Leyla’s an adult now, she could very well take care of herself.” she stated, “Besides, we all know she couldn’t stay forever in Arvis as a guest.” It seemed as though Elysee’s mind was already made up, and nothing would change it.

“Also, I can’t help but think about how Claudine feels right now about the explosion,” Elysee continued, “You know she loved the greenhouse, she even wanted to hold the wedding there.”

“That’s true…” Norma trailed off. She couldn’t help but wince at the mention of her grandson’s fiance. She knew by now Elysee had given instructions for the diligent repair of the greenhouse, but it would be impossible to finish it before the wedding.

Claudine did love the once majestic greenhouse of Arvis.


“So you see, he inconvenienced not only himself, but also plenty more people.” Elysee continued, “And that is why we simply cannot let him be after the accident.” she sternly finished.

“I understand,” Norma finally conceded, “But it still doesn’t feel right.”




With a deep sigh, Norma shifted in her seated position to lie down on her bed properly. Elysee immediately nodded to the maids at the side to assist her. They rushed and aided her carefully as she lay down, rearranging her pillows to be more comfortable for her before going back to their previous post.

“Either way, the final decision lies with Matthias.” Norma finally said, looking at Elysee in the eyes with a meaningful stare. Elysee’s jaw clenched as she knew what Norma was silently telling her.

Matthias was the current head of the Herhardt household after all. Ultimately, he held the fate of Bill Remmer.

“Yes, I agree.” Elysee replied back, nodding in agreement, “Whatever he says will be final, I won’t disagree. I just hope he makes a wise decision.” and with that she bid Norma good night, and left the older matriarch to rest.










Leyla had just managed to arrive inside the annex and immediately headed towards the reception hall. Minutes later, Mark Evers went to Matthias, who was still in a phone call. Matthias turned to him, after excusing himself for a while, before he was informed of Leyla’s arrival.

After checking Leyla was indeed there to see him, he nodded to the attendant, signaling him to leave before continuing the phone call. Mark gestured for her to come closer, to which Leyla did, and remained standing across Matthias, in front of his desk. And with that, Mark left them alone.

Leyla fidgeted as she caught snippets of Matthias’ conversation on the phone, growing more anxious by the second. Matthias was calling about the impending repairs that needed to be done in the greenhouse, as well as the generators, both of which got destroyed in the recent explosion.

When the phone call was done, Matthias put it down, before turning to look at Leyla, his hands clasped in front of him as he rested his chin on his fingers. Leyla squirmed beneath his gaze…

“I see you got busy.” she softly started, licking her lips nervously.


“No thanks to Mr. Remmer.” Matthias replied, devoid of any emotion, making Leyla nervous. Was he angry? Was he pitiful of her uncle? “Sit.” he commanded, gesturing to the sofa across from him. Leyla hastily shook her head in denial.

Not in the mood to push her, Matthias only leaned back in his seat, and crossed his legs together.

Immediately, Leyla went beside him, and took a deep bow.

“I’m deeply sorry for the accident today, Duke.” she apologized, Matthias only stared at her, unsure why she was apologizing for the accident.

“Why are you apologizing?” he asked her.

“I’m apologizing on behalf of Uncle Bill.” she immediately replied, bowing lower as she could, “Please forgive him, just this once.” she pleaded, desperately hoping he would accept her apology.

“You know my uncle, Duke, what kind of a person he is.” she proceeded when Matthias remained silent, “This was all just an accident! He’s still so confused about electricity and generators, he misjudged it completely!” she knelt down this time. She proceeded to give him excuses, about how his head always aches whenever he went in the warehouse due to the loud noises it produced, which was probably why he tried to shut it down.

“He would never wish to harm Madam Norma, or destroy the greenhouse or anyone in it. You know that.” she finished.

Leyla stuttered through her explanation, but that was only because she tried her best not to act hysterical in front of him. All that time Matthias let her talk, not interjecting even once.

“Please forgive him, please.” she begged. She was as white as a sheet of paper, her hands shaking as she waited for the verdict, refusing to look up at him as she kowtowed beside him.

“Leyla.” the Duke called out for her softly in a low and gentle voice. Leyla’s head shot up immediately, looking up at him with red-rimmed eyes. “How would you suggest I show him forgiveness then? Just let him go?” Matthias asked rhetorically, and Leyla frantically nodded, swallowing back her tears. Matthias took a deep breath…

“Forgiveness, huh?” he murmured to himself, calmly observing her quivering form. Leyla immediately stood up, and stepped back at a respectable distance. Matthias’ gaze went to her shoes, all covered in dust and dirt, probably from all the running she did to the police station and back.

His gaze trailed up, glancing at her stocking clad calves, emphasizing it’s slenderness. He tilted his head, leisurely moving his eyes up her form, seeing her clutch at her dark gray skirt, ending just above her knees. His eyes went further up, watching her checkered coat envelop her, with a red sweater hiding beneath.

The two top buttons of her shirt were open, revealing her slender neck, before he met her teary eyes once more. She looked so desperate.

He had been certain he’d given her loads of pretty clothes, yet she always manages to dress like a nun.

“Why should I?” He finally asked her, his brows furrowing as Leyla found herself at a loss for words, “Why should I forgive Bill? Show him mercy?”

Matthias then stood up from his seat and brushed up against her casually, heading straight for the fireplace, stopping right in front of it. He stared into its flames, a frown marring his features.

“Pl-please Duke-” Leyla stammered, but was immediately cut off.

“The generator exploded because of a warning he ignored,” Matthias began, “Resulting in my grandmother almost dying, and the destruction of expensive property.” He listed off all of the cases against Bill Remmer, making Leyla face the harsh truth.

With every item, he took one step closer to her, looking all the more imposing. He only stopped when he was only a step away from her quivering form…

“And you want me to just show him mercy?” he finished, looking down at her, “Tell me why I would do that?”

“Please Duke-”

“So you wish for me to just dismiss all his wrongdoings then? To just let him go?” he asked her, eyes shifting to caress Leyla on her collar with the tip of his fingers.

She looked rather cute with the way the shirt hung loosely on her shoulders, though it did look rather familiar to him. It wasn’t long until he realized it was the same shirt she wore during that picnic in autumn. The exact blouse he’d taken off when she had the accident as well.

He couldn’t help but wonder if perhaps this was also the same shirt she wore when she asked to be transferred away from Arvis and work at a different school?

His grip on her collar tightened, as he stared at her coldly.

“Who do you think you are to ask for such a thing?” he practically snarled at her. Leyla felt as though he slapped her in the face with his response. His hands moved up, and grasped her chin tightly. “Huh, tell me Leyla.” he demanded.

Tears welled up in Leyla’s eyes as he forced her to keep eye contact. Tears flowed down her cheeks in streams, drowning the fingers around her chin. His voice softened up as he straightened up, her face still in his hand.

“Truly, who do you think you are?” he asked calmly, his voice back to being indifferent. Leyla couldn’t help but wonder if their last interactions together were all just something she conjured up in her mind…


How he kept his word to not harm Phoebe, to not harm her as he healed her injuries. Even the jokes and light hearted smiles they secretly shared in the latest autumn season. All those times he intrigued her with every new side she discovered from him…

She could still see them as clear as day, and yet, looking now into his dull and cold eyes, she couldn’t help but wonder if they all meant nothing to him after all.

Her voice was caught in her throat, unable to speak as her body was wracked in terror. Images of her precious uncle trapped behind iron bars, shattering her safe haven in Arvis, and his cold imposing figure muddled her brain.

She couldn’t think clearly.

“How bold of you to demand such a thing from me without an equal exchange.” he informed her. Leyla bit her lower lip to stifle back her sobs, but wasn’t successful to do so as she openly cried in front of him.

Matthias continued to act as though her world wasn’t falling apart in front of him.

“I don’t like entering an exchange that will bring me nothing.” he finished, and Leyla couldn’t help but try once more.

“D-Duke..Please-” she sobbed, but he cut her off once more.

“Sadly your tears are not enough to buy Bill Remmer’s freedom.”

“I-I have nothing to offer you but my apologies, please! We don’t have money-” She kept begging. But his grip on her tightened as he forced her to keep quiet.

“I wasn’t talking about a monetary exchange Leyla.” He explained to her, “A deal can be made with whatever one party wishes to have that the other can only offer to gain the favor they want.” he pulled her closer, until their faces were only a hair’s breadth away. “And I’m willing to enter such a trade with you.”

“A-a trade?” Leyla’s sobs have quieted as she grew curious as to what he wanted from her.

“Yes, a trade.” He slowly nodded, glancing up and down at her before meeting her gaze once more. Her eyes widened in realization and began to pull away from him, shaking her head widely in refusal.

He released her from his grip, letting her stumble back as he returned to his position and sat unbothered on his wing chair. The fear in Leyla’s eyes was now replaced with a silent fury as she glared at him intently.

“I-I won’t do that!” she exclaimed, locks of her hair coming undone due to her struggling, making her neck all the more enticing to him, “You’re engaged to Lady Claudine! You’re about to get married!” she pointed out in an outrage.


Matthias only shrugged as he looked at her inquiringly, “And that’s relevant how?” he asked her, casually pulling out a handkerchief as he looked back at her defiant figure. He looked rather bored to be in this conversation.

Suddenly, the phone rang once more, making Leyla jump in surprise as she stumbled away from his desk. Matthias only sighed softly, before brushing up against her again as he walked back towards the phone.

“The final decision is up to you, think about it.” He told her as he placed his hand on the ringing phone. “You can refuse if you want, and that’ll be the end of it.”

Just as Leyla was going to ask him what would happen should she refuse, he picked up the phone. She watched as the perverse man in front of her transformed into a respectable Duke so seamlessly.

He was talking about his grandmother this time, asking about updates on her health. Leyla couldn’t dream of being anything of value to this man.

She found it difficult to breathe as she stood still. She walked out of the room, and was greeted by a nicely lit part of the annex, a complete opposite of the darkness threatening to overwhelm her.

She kept walking until she stopped by the stairwell outside, leading up to the second floor of the annex, and crumpled down to the floor in a daze. She could feel her chest constricting as she pulled her knees to her chest. She watched the currents of the outside river reflect the moonlight, getting lost in its shine.

She felt as though she had just woken up from a long sleep, dreaming of a beautiful nightmare.


Chapter 68.




You Have No Choice.




It’s been a few days since Bill Remmer had been taken in by the police. Leyla had gone earlier to meet with the lawyer at the law office. And now, she was heading home with a dejected spirit.

“Oh Leyla, you’re back!” Mrs. Mona greeted her as soon as she arrived. She had been pacing worriedly in front of their cabin for quite a while before Leyla arrived. “How was the meeting? Did you meet the lawyer yet? What did he say?” she quickly inquired of the young woman.

But Leyla couldn’t speak coherently, too stuck in the endless reminder that there was nothing she could do for Bill. She only shook her head, which made the small glimmer of hope in Mrs. Mona’s eyes disappear.

The servants up in Arvis had helped raise some funds to free Bill, giving her the money they’ve gathered from time to time to help her pay for the lawyer without her knowledge. Leyla could do nothing but receive them with gratitude, feeling her heart about to burst with their show of care and concern for both of them.

But what good was the money when even the lawyer told her the evidence gathered was stacked against Bill?

“Oh dear.” Mrs. Mona gasped, “You know I heard that Madam Norma was ready to drop the charges, but Madam Elysee felt different and wanted him to suffer for what he’s done. But it was only an accident, she could have afforded to forgive him.” Mrs. Mona informed her.

Leyla gulped down her infocus, before turning towards the missus.

“Should I, perhaps, speak with Madam Elysee then?” she asked softly, but Mrs. Mona only smiled sadly at the suggestion.

“I think the better course of action is to see the Duke instead.” Mrs. Mona suggested, “You see I heard Madams Norma and Elysee couldn’t agree on what to do, so they left the final decision to the young duke.” she explained.

At the news Leyla felt herself grow dizzy. Mrs. Mona immediately reached out to steady her back onto her feet, gently escorting her back inside their cabin to get her to sit.


“Don’t worry Leyla, I’m certain the Duke will be more gracious than his mother.” Mrs. Mona comforted her, “There’s still hope yet.” She patted her petite shoulders softly, rubbing her palms up and down the frail woman to warm her up a little before walking around the fireplace to light some fire.



“I’m worried for you Leyla dear,” Mrs. Mona voiced out, “You look so thin these days, and have gone pallor. Mr. Remmer would not like for you to ignore your wellbeing for his sake. Here, I brought some stuff I think you might like.” Mrs. Mona immediately brought over her package she had set aside earlier.

Leyla could only watch as Mrs. Mona placed some food before her, alongside some water. She politely smiled up at the missus.

“Thank you for these Mrs. Mona,” she finally said, “However I think I’ll eat them later.” she admitted softly. Mrs. Mona only sighed at Leyla’s dispirited state, before wishing her well and finally took some leave.

As soon as she was alone, Leyla buried her face in her hands and began to cry.

The lawyer she met with earlier had given her no solution, and more explanations as to why defending Bill from his crimes was a fruitless endeavor. Should he be lucky, he might not serve time in prison, instead, the litigation would only take more time and effort for them to accomplish.

Given that compensation for the damages inflicted would be unavoidable, going up against the Herhardt in a legal battle was largely inadvisable.

“At times like this, it’s best for both parties to compromise before going to court.”

That was the last advice the lawyer had given her, which only served to fill her with more dread. She knew that the Herhardt household was devoid of mercy. Perhaps not the entire household, but the Duke certainly was.

She’d already gone to see him after all, three days ago to be specific. The last few days she struggled with the decision and tried to take whatever alternative road was presented to her. She couldn’t find it in herself to eat, drink or sleep regularly due to the stress her current predicament landed her in.

Her dignity refused to enter such a perverse deal. It was against everything she stood for. She didn’t want to fall into another one of the Duke’s traps.

She bit her lip, a nervous tic she can’t seem to get rid of. She stood up from her seat and began to pace around the kitchen, before she returned to the desk to take small sips from the glass of water Mrs. Mona prepared earlier.

‘If I’m suffering this much, think about the pain Uncle Bill is experiencing right now!’


Leyla scolded herself as she recalled the hollow face her dear uncle sported within the past few days. Seeing him like that was like a knife to her heart, being twisted deeper, embedding the blade within the depths of her chest.

She can’t continue to act like this. She needed to do something to free her uncle. And she was presented with the only way she could do so successfully.

It didn’t matter how much she tried to swerve away from making a deal with them, she always ended up with the same anwer. And that was to accept the Duke’s offer.




Her jaw clenched at the thought, remembering the way the Duke gazed at her with unbridled lust, making her feel so disgusted and ashamed of even entertaining the thought. He was so calm back then, and even had the audacity to look so amused with her.

She knew that expression well. He wore it enough times whenever he went out hunting just for the fun of it, or whenever he tormented her to the point of crying. No matter what she did to rise up against him, despite her many falls in his presence, she was unable to escape him.

She collapsed back onto her chair, but no tears left her eyes. They were too dried up, and her heart too numb to produce them. She could hear her ragged breaths in the still night, much like a soundless cry for help.

Compared to the others, her life may seem so insignificant, but the way she lived was oh so important to her. She tried to do right all her life; earn a living through honest, good work and to do nothing she would be ashamed about. That nothing, much less a man’s petty desires, could trample upon her hard earned life…

But she’s made up her mind.

‘What would Uncle Bill think of me, if he knew what I did?’ she couldn’t help but wonder. Just thinking about him brought up a new surge of worry.

And thus in the dead of the night, Leyla embraced the darkness around her, not finding any will in her to move for a long while.



It was already late into the night when Matthias finally managed to sign the last of the documents for the day after thoroughly reviewing it. He leaned back in his chair, before turning to his attendant nearby.

“You are done for the day, you may go now.” he ordered bluntly. The attendant only bowed in acquiesce, retrieving the signed documents in his arms, before swiftly leaving him on his own.


Despite the time Matthias spent on his own in the annex, he had lately been spending more time in the building now that he had no access to electricity back in the mansion. Though that wasn’t the only reason why.

He felt as though tonight was the night.

‘Leyla should be coming to visit soon enough.’

He thought to himself. He knew she’d been exhausting her resources, trying to find a way out of her situation without having to deal with him. But she should have known by now that he always got what he wanted in the end, no matter how long it took.

Matthias knew, on that day of Bill’s accident, that he finally found an undisputable leverage over Leyla. To clip her wings, and have her stay by his side. He’d been making a plan with it in his mind when he heard…

And seeing her so desperate in front of him just made him go through with it. And thus here he was, awaiting for an answer he was certain of.

He knew her current predicament wasn’t the most proper, or the most correct way of gaining her favor for him; he had been in a hurry to bind her to him. Though he had to throw away his initial plans regarding her, he believed he would eventually be presented with an opportunity to seize that happiness he so desired from her.

He reached out to the end of his desk, his fingers opening the cigarette box, grabbing a stick. He brought it up to his lips, the other hand already reaching for the lighter, when a knock disrupted him.

KNOCK. KNOCK. KNOCK.

Something shifted in his dull eyes when he heard it. It was so soft, so hesitant. A glint returned to his eyes, and despite having not used it, he quickly discarded his cigarette to a nearby trash bin before slowly rising from his seat with barely contained excitement.

He took slow, steady steps towards the door, wanting to make her squirm, before he swung the door, slowly revealing Leyla in front of him. It was just as he expected. She did manage to make her decision.

A cold breeze rushed through him as he saw her, creating tension between them as they stared at each other wordlessly. He would have thought the time had frozen between them, but the way their clothes rustled and her hair swayed with the wind told him otherwise.

Eventually, he moved, stepping aside in a wordless order for her to come in.

Leyla turned paler at the sight of him, and despite the growing chill in her bones, she crossed the threshold into his office.

The door slowly swung shut, the sound of a lock turning echoing through the silent halls, and the occupants hidden from any outsiders.








Leyla found herself in the exact same spot she had been a few days ago when she had come to beg the Duke for mercy for Uncle Bill’s sake. She stood in front of him, just as she did before as well, but the expression on her face was no longer filled with that glimmer of hope.

No, instead, there was only resignation and fear.

Matthias sat cross-legged on the sofa across from her, as if to show he was willing to give her space, allowing her more time to gather her thoughts. She fidgeted with her fingers as she took a deep breath before finally breaking the silence.

“I am nothing, right next to you, Duke.” she began softly, head held up high as she looked him in the eye. Matthias snorted at her words, tilting his head at her inquiringly.

“And what of it?”

“You are a respectable member of this community.” she pointed out, “If you were to risk that all for a slight fancy with a lesser woman, your reputation would be destroyed.” a slight defiant glint echoed in her eyes at that statement. “So I implore you, Duke, I would do anything, please, but not this.”

Leyla thought he would reconsider, but it seemed even for this argument, he had prepared for a counter-statement. He only smirked at her, a triumphant look on his face.

“Leyla,” he began, “Did you know my family actually owns a castle by the resort, south of Berg?” he asked her, filling Leyla with a sense of dread with what he was to say.

“Because of its beauty, it became a pretty reputable castle in this empire. My grandfather eventually purchased it for the sake of his mistress. She lived in the castle receiving my grandfather’s affection and soon passed away.”

“D-duke…”

“You see, my father was a music enthusiast.” he interrupted, “And oftentimes he’d bring many women there, who played fanciful music to him, but the longest he had with him was a famous singer. My mother quite liked her too.”

He gazed up at Leyla, watching the way her face slowly turned pale.

“Oh she was a very talented singer.” Matthias continued, “Would you like me to tell you how their relationship was? What fate did their reputations end with?”


His voice was sweet, as though he was just telling her an old wive’s tale, it made Leyla speechless how crass he was at implying what he meant. She knew exactly how his predecessors’ reputations ended. There was no way she couldn’t know.

Even to this day, even if they’ve long since passed, they are still widely respected and highly regarded by the people of Carlsbar.

It seemed after all, there was really no way out of the deal he had given her. She knew that when she came here, but she wanted to try one last time. A different angle to revise the deal set out for her.

“So, so for just one night then?” she clarified, finally looking back into his eyes. Perhaps she was more worthless than she initially thought, she wasn’t even good enough to tarnish his reputation.

Leyla thought to herself numbly, that it would be just as though she had fallen from a very tall tree, and got deep wounds from it. She would be unlucky, and it would hurt for a long time, might even leave a scar, but eventually she will recover from it, sooner or later.

“Such an unfair deal that would be, don’t you think, Leyla?” the Duke hummed, “I refuse to enter deals where I couldn’t get the maximum amount of benefits I could take.” he eyed her up and down, “Do you really think yourself so impressive that one night with you would be enough for the price of Bill Remmer’s freedom?” he prodded at her, making her squirm.

She couldn’t bear to look at him any longer, swiftly turning her back towards him, but was rooted in place.

Should she leave now, she would forever surrender her only hope of helping her uncle. And even if he were to be released after he’s served his sentence, her uncle would never be the same again…

Bill’s hollow face in her latest visit flashed through her mind. Her jaw clenched, knuckles turning white as she balled her hands into a fist. Matthias leaned back on his seat, and watched as Leyla fought with herself over what decision she would make.

Leyla couldn’t help but think just how despicable he truly was. But how could she expect any different? He really was the type of person who would willfully destroy a person’s life just to get what he wanted, with no regards as to how the other person would feel when it’s done.

When he gets bored of her, he’d no sooner throw her away as trash in his pocket. Just as he did with those poor birds he shot and killed whenever he hunted them down for a little bit of fun.

Matthias could only smirk at the glare Leyla stared at him with. This time, she turned around to face him fully. Unable to run or turn away from him any longer, Leyla immediately fell to the floor as her knees buckled beneath her. Matthias wasted no time in kneeling in front of her, a smug grin on his face as though he expected her to do so.

Deft fingers traveled up her arms, popping one button open at the top of her blouse. Leyla shied away instinctively, but he held her in place…


“Leyla,” he whispered, a warm breath hitting her cheeks as he brushed his lips against her ear. “You have no choice but to do as I wish, that was the deal.” he reminded her. “You said so yourself, didn’t you? You’d do anything?”

He chuckled as he held open her blouse, his other hand coming up to grab her chin, forcing her to look up at him.

“However, if you did change your mind, well,” he gestured to the entrance of his office, “The door’s right there.” he pointed out, forcing her to look at the locked door, before slowly letting her go, and pulling away from her.

He was reminding her she was the one making a choice to be with him, and not the other way around. Oh how she despised him!

He practically cornered her between a rock and a hard place. She was completely desperate by now, how could he make it seem as if she even had a choice in the matter!? She never had one in the first place!

Her body trembled as she looked down on the ground, refusing to give him the satisfaction of her looking up at him like a weak woman.

“I will never forgive you!” she hissed in a whisper.“Do as you wish!” she finally declared, and Matthias wasted no time in closing the distance between them once again, watching as she shed her blouse, popping the buttons away one by one.

Impatient, he grabbed her hands, and ripped her blouse open, the buttons scattering all over the floor as he slid it down her shoulders and threw it aside. Leyla felt herself sink onto the floor, back pressed onto the cold tiles as he nosed her neck, before his lips stopped right next to her ears…

“Don’t worry Leyla, I certainly will.” he responded.

She wanted nothing more than to hurl curses and insults at him in that instant! However she could only bite her lips in response, feeling the way his eyes roamed all over her. She refused to participate in such an act, turning her head away from him.

But, his hand grabbed her by the chin once more, and before she knew it, his lips were upon hers.

Leyla moaned in protest at the way he was shoving his tongue down her throat. She wanted to avoid kissing in the activity, but he wouldn’t even allow her that kind of dignity. He covered her with his body, hovering above her half naked form, making her feel more suffocated.

He pulled away, a strand of saliva connecting both their lips as he moved down, trailing wet kisses and suckling on her unblemished skin, nipping and biting her wherever he wanted to. She couldn’t help but wince with every action, resolutely looking up at the ceiling instead.


She felt his hands shift, calloused palms rubbing at her thighs, slowly going higher and higher. He was rubbing circles at her inner thighs, making heat pool uncomfortably in her stomach with every touch. His hands went up under her skirt, hooking nimble fingers by the edge of her stockings before pulling them all the way down her legs.

She choked back a sob as the cool air hit her bare legs, feeling the goosebumps begin to form. The mixed sounds of labored breathing, and moaning echoed in the room, filling the silence between them as he pried her legs open for him.

Next he swiftly discarded the rest of her skirt and underwear, tossing them onto the growing pile of her discarded clothes. He settled down between her legs and looked down in all her bare glory…

“Beautiful…”

He couldn’t help but whisper with such adoration as he gazed down at the perfection beneath him.


Chapter 69.




Saviour.



Her thoughts were muddled throughout the entire ordeal, blocking out the majority of the ordeal in her mind. She knew only one thing could bring her peace once this was all over…

“You promised…” she couldn’t help but whisper in between her moans as she felt him thrusting deep into her. Leyla arched her back as he kept going, hands grasping at his biceps, fingernails digging into his skin at the reluctant pleasure coursing through her veins…

Matthias looked up at her, lust-filled eyes looking at her in a prodding manner to voice out her thoughts. He was too drunk in euphoria at that moment, feeling her warmth engulfing him, squeezing him tightly inside her. He let go of his grasp in her hair, and used it to cup her flushed cheeks…

“You promised to show mercy…” she continued, letting out a breathy moan when he hit her deep in her sweet spot, hands hastily grabbing purchase on his broad shoulders, “Please…” she begged, unable to voice further coherent words.

Despite being too preoccupied with the feeling of being sheathed inside her, Matthias still had his wits about him, and understood her completely. He couldn’t help but release a dry chuckle as he picked up his pace, grunting whenever she tightened around him.

How could he despise her?

She looked so delectable, begging for her dear Uncle Bill’s freedom as she writhed in pleasure beneath him. It didn’t matter to him why she agreed to tangle with him at this moment, her eyes still shone prettily like jewels to him.

He watched as she struggled to support her weight in her arms, grabbing blindly onto him as she hooked her arms from behind his neck, bringing their faces closer. He could clearly see the tears in the corner of her eyes and he couldn’t help but begin to chase his pleasure at the sight of it.

She could burst into tears any minute now, should he delay answering her. She threw her head back with a wanton moan, her eyelids fluttering closed as she lost strength when she felt warmth pool into her. Her body limply lay still on the floor, leaving Matthias panting with sweat on his brows as he hovered above her.

He couldn’t help but admire her. Leyla still stubbornly refused to look at him, but that didn’t matter.

Nothing changed in the desire he felt for her, in fact it seemed to grow stronger.




One more, just one more time, he couldn’t help but think as he pulled her towards him, hands grasping onto her tousled hair firmly, but gently. He saw a glimpse of fear in her as he did so, before she finally turned to look at him.

And he ravished her lips once more as they began their intimate dance anew.

Truly, this was a fair deal, Matthias thought to himself.



When Leyla awoke from her deep sleep, the whole room was filled with a bright light.

She winced when the sunlight hit her eyes, blinking as it adjusted at the flood of light. She could feel her body sore, parts she didn’t know would hurt making themselves known as she gingerly sat up on her bed, before leaning against her headboard.

She had half a wish that everything that happened last night was just a cruel nightmare, but the stiffness in her body proved it otherwise. She blinked back remnants of sleep as she turned to look at her reflection in her mirror by the vanity.

Last night she had dragged herself half-awake back home. When she finally reached her cabin, Leyla had just barely locked the doors before collapsing in a dreamless sleep on her own bed.

She would have liked to wash away last night’s traces on her body, but she was so exhausted she couldn’t even lift a finger after hitting her mattress. The best she could do last night was to get home without driving herself to insanity because of last night’s events.

Absentmindedly, her eyes trailed down her body, watching the hickeys he’d left on her skin, the dried body fluids making her feel unkempt and sticky all over. Seeing them once more made the shame run deep inside her as tears welled up in the memory of being violated in the most humiliating way.

‘It’s nothing,’

Leyla told herself as she tried to even her breathing. She dragged herself to her bath, and began to scrub her body.

‘It’s not that big of a deal, not when you know why you have to do it…’ she kept telling herself.

She only kept scrubbing, rubbing her skin raw until it turned red and her shame was replaced with a numbness as she watched the dirty water flow down the drain. Leyla slowly walked out, robotically putting on some clothes before trudging towards their dining area and sat by the table, staring at nothing…


Belatedly she thought she should get something to eat before heading out to visit her Uncle Bill. She needed to gather her strength after all, she couldn’t afford to show signs of her fatigue.




Immediately she moved to grab the food Mrs. Mona had brought to her yesterday, setting some out on a plate and placing it on the table. She only chose some of the lighter options. While she knew she needed to eat more, for now she couldn’t find the strength in her to even swallow.

Despite not feeling hungry, she dutifully shoved some of the food down her throat, forcing herself to swallow with the aid of some water running down her throat. Once she finished off the last piece of the sliced bread, she caught an odd stack in the corner of her eyes.

She had been so out of it in the last few days, she hadn’t noticed it. It took her a while to realize it’s been lying in wait for several days now, considering the light dust gathering on its surface.

Curiously, Leyla approached the stack of letters, untying the string around them and picking up the topmost envelope to see who it was from. Her eyes widened and hands shook as she recognized the penmanship written across the sheet…

‘Kyle!’ she thought in shock, her heart skipping a beat at seeing his penmanship on it. Immediately she checked the other letters, flipping one after the next with a renewed urgency. Leyla dropped the letters haphazardly on the desk, checking until the last…

All of them were from Kyle.

She braced herself on the edge of the table, steadying her breathing as she glanced at the multitude of letters addressed solely to her. Where did these come from?! Leyla stared at them in shock for a while, before tearing open the earliest letter she should have received.

Tears welled up in her eyes and her hands shook as she began reading the first of many letters Kyle had sent to her. It had been dated back since the beginning of the latest fall season.

Her eyes went to the first line of the letter, choking back a sob…

[My beloved Leyla,]



“Thank you, Duke. I sincerely don’t know what else to say. Thank you so much.”

Bill thanked profusely as he bowed deeply to the Duke in front of him with a flushed face out of shame. He looked a little worse for wear, his last few days difficult, but still held so much hope that everything would be fine. And he was proven right when the Duke dropped the charges against him with no compensation needed.

He was looking much brighter than ever.


“I can never repay you for this mercy you’ve shown me…” he trailed off, tears welling up in his eyes in his ecstatic disbelief over the miracle he was shown. Just then, he saw Leyla entering through the entrance of the police station…

He couldn’t help but beam happily at her arrival.

“Leyla!” He greeted excitedly towards her. Multiple pairs of eyes around them were drawn to the commotion, looking back and forth from Bill and Leyla, including the Duke and the lawyer he was with.

Leyla froze as she momentarily met the Duke’s gaze before looking back at her uncle. Trepidation filled her as she hurriedly went to her uncle’s side.

“Uncle!” she greeted back, grasping onto his arm tightly as though she was afraid to let go. “What’s happening here?” she hurriedly asked.

“It seems congratulations are in order Leyla,” the police officer with them began, with a beaming smile, “The Duke has just dropped all charges against your uncle.” he explained.

Leyla tried to act as though it was a surprise, but the smile on her face was stiff as she now turned to face the Duke.

“I-is that so?” she asked slowly, her head turning jerkily before she fully faced the Duke to give him a respectable bow of her head in thanks despite the deep rage filling her in seeing him, “M-my sin-sincerest gratitude for you, Duke.” She thanked him reluctantly.

There was a rush of emotions circling inside her mind as both she and her uncle bowed in thanks in front of him. Her hands grew clammy on her grip on her uncle’s arms, feeling her body grow colder every second passing with him nearby…

At a distance, nothing seemed amiss to the others despite how awkward Leyla was acting. The people only chalked it up to her innate shyness. No one else noticed her warring emotions, at least, no one else but Duke Herhardt did.

Matthias and Leyla’s eyes met once again, as his lawyer spoke with the police for some last minute details per his instructions. Leyla’s eyes stared at him with deep contempt, to which he stared back challengingly, glancing discretely towards her uncle in a subtle threat.

If she wanted to keep their little affair a secret, she should know better to hide her emotions, starting with stopping her hands from shaking so much.

There was a small upturn on the corner of his lips as he watched her dainty little hands. He could just have easily left it all up to his lawyer to smoothen out the details of Bill’s release alone, but he wanted to come.

He wanted to see his impertinent mistress, Leyla Lewellin.

Memories from last night flooded the back of his mind.


After their coupling had stopped, the annex had gone silent, leaving only their heavy breathing in the air. Bloodstained shirt, torn cuff buttons, their clothes were scattered all over the floor, their figures all disheveled. Matthias only took one look at his messy form, before forcing himself to stand up.

Leyla then remained curled up on the floor, hugging herself. The firelight nearby illuminated her hunched form, casting a soft orange glow on her pale skin, littered with marks, courtesy of him. Her shaky breaths echoing against the cackling fire.

Matthias picked up his discarded trousers, pulling them up smoothly and wore back his dress shirt before plopping down on the sofa nearby to continue adoring Leyla’s naked form. He liked the dark contrast of his marks left on her. It fed the hungry beast inside him with deep satisfaction.

Shame he couldn’t see her face from where he was because she still refused to look at him.

Her long golden locks were pasted on her back with the sweat she accumulated. Prints of his hands, from the rough way he’d gripped her hips and thighs reminded him of how soft she felt in his hands. He thought of calling out her name to make her look at him, but shook the thought away, replacing it with a cigarette…

Still, he couldn’t find it in himself to light it up.

He couldn’t help but watch how she stubbornly refused to move from her fetal position, still turned away from him. It grated on his nerves, he had half a mind to grab her form and force her to do as he wished…

But that wasn’t what he wanted from her.

Losing the desire to smoke, he only discarded the unlit cigarette once more, before he stood back up. He walked towards his adjoined bedroom, brows furrowed with the slight regret of not taking a few extra minutes of taking her on his bed instead.

Matthias felt a slight guilt on having her experience their coupling on a cold hard floor instead of on his plush, and soft mattress. He went back to check on her, and watched as she stiffened up at the sound of his return.

He only scoffed at her childishness, grabbing his hung coat by the rack and tossed it haphazardly over her prone form. She winced at the sudden contact, but still did not move. It was starting to become difficult who was being insulted between them in his mind.

Trying to reign in his emotions, Matthias could only retreat momentarily to his bathroom to get his emotions in order. She annoyed him as much as she satisfied him, which made him at a loss of what to do next.

He took a short shower, resolving to soothe the lingering ache on Leyla, but when he was done, and went back out to gather her in his arms, he found himself alone and bewildered. Leyla was nowhere in sight anymore.

She had run away from him.

He frantically searched around the annex, before he finally came to terms she was gone and left with no goodbye. He saw her discarded blouse, destroyed with the buttons ripped and scattered all over the marble flooring. If he were to look closely, he could also see a few strands of her golden hair left behind.

He also saw his jacket hung carelessly by the rack and couldn’t help but chuckle in amusement. Did she hate the thought of being with him so much she’d rather risk being seen in such a scandalous state of undress to return home?

He was partially thankful he hadn’t gone after her then, for he knew his patience was reaching its limit. Should he have encountered her one more time last night, he believed he could have treated her a lot rougher than before.

And thus he only stared down at Leyla in front of him now, convincing himself he made a wise decision last night. It had just been a few hours since he buried himself in her, and already he could feel the same stirrings he felt for her last night when he found himself bereft of his mistress.

“You made such a noble decision Duke,” the police praised him, bringing Matthias back to the present moment. “Truly you are deserving of the respect and praise as the head of Herhardt House.”

Matthias only briefly thanked him, ending the conversation effectively before leaving the police station in a swift manner. It didn’t take long enough before Leyla, Bill and the other police officers to start moving once more.

Bill went after as Matthias’ chauffeur opened up his door for him.

“Duke, I will never forget this kindness until I die!” Bill thanked him profusely, “Truly I won’t.” He declared earnestly, bowing one last time at him. Matthias only stared at the gardener’s niece, a dark glint in his eye.

“It was nothing, Mr. Remmer.” he replied, watching the way Leyla looked sick at the thought of her uncle thanking him and singing his praises. “I expect to see you in Arvis again.” he concluded, before finally getting in his car.

Leyla all that time refused to smile once more. He couldn’t help the small grin he sent to her as the car door closed between them. Truly he’ll see her once more in a similar state soon.

He’d make sure of it.



When the Duke had finally left the police station, Leyla felt relief flood her body at his disappearance. They both did some last minute checks on the charges that were dropped before they finally left. Leyla hooked arms with her uncle, resting her head on his shoulder. They talked for a while, Leyla asking what she missed before finally speaking up.

“What do you mean we’re still staying in Arvis?” she asked with a slight frown, “Why are we staying?”

Bill could hardly contain his joy as he squeezed an arm around her comfortingly. She found herself deeply confused as they walked back to their quaint cabin in Arvis.

“Oh it’s all the Duke’s doing really,” he replied bashfully, still sporting a wide grin in his relief, “He told me I could still work in Arvis, and continue living in the cabin.”

“What?” Leyla couldn’t help but ask dumbly. She had hoped they could take this as a chance to move away. “But uncle-” Bill softly held up a hand, wordlessly imploring her to let him continue.

“At first I wanted to refuse my dear, really. I felt so guilty about my neglect that I couldn’t bear to go back to work there.” He admitted, “However, the Duke only told me to take this as a penance for my misdeeds, and work harder in restoring the greenhouse back to its former glory.”

Leyla could only feel the growing pit of dread in her stomach.

“He also proceeded to tell me that my skills and expertise were a crucial part in the restoration, and I thought about it and agreed. I am a gardener, and have worked on the greenhouse for many years. Who better to fix my mistakes than myself after all?” he turned to Leyla, looking for some sort of approval.

“Would the madams allow you to return to work?” Leyla asked him worriedly, to which Bill only smiled softly at her fretting.

“The Duke tells me that Madam Norma welcomes me gladly, and Madam Elysee has conceded to their wishes.” he answered her, “Ah what a godsend the Duke really is Leyla! Our savior he truly is!” he praised.

Leyla could only numbly agree.

Saviour…

Uncle Bill sang him praises and called him their saviour. Leyla wanted nothing more than to shout her contradictions and ruin their image of him. He was a vile and cruel man, and everyone deserved to see him as she saw him…

But at the same time, she wanted to spare her uncle the unbearable guilt he would feel if he knew what she had to do just so he could walk free once more. She couldn’t do that to him.

Thus she kept her mouth shut, doing her best to reign in her indignation until she could calm down.

Uncle Bill proceeded to tell her about how he felt so guilty for destroying such a masterpiece over the last few days. And that perhaps, should he help it be restored to its former glory, he would feel a faint sense of peace in seeing it through.

“Truly it’s the only way I could ever repay the kindness he’s shown us.” Bill finished.


“I understand, uncle.” Leyla softly replied. If only he knew their debt was already being paid, but she’ll take that secret to the grave if she could.

“Truly Leyla, you needn’t worry too much anymore.” Bill tried placating her, “I promise to be careful from now on, I’ll do better in following precautions.” he sighed, stopping in front of the gates of Arvis before pulling her into a tender hug.

Leyla could only watch how her uncle’s vibrancy was slowly returning to him, and hugged him back. Despite her shame, she was happy he was out. She never wanted to see him as hollow as he did ever again.

Suddenly there was a cacophony nearby, growing loudly by the second. They both pulled away and looked to see what the commotion was all about, and Bill could only laugh jovially, at the sight of the servants rushing to greet them.

“Bill! You really are back!”

“Oh thank goodness!”

“We missed you Bill!”

They gathered around Bill, reaching out and hugging and touching him in any way they could. Leyla only stepped back, giving them a wide berth to be sufficiently reunited with her uncle. She watched as they excitedly welcomed him back.

Their joy was infectious that Leyla couldn’t help but smile serenely at the sight in front of her. She turned away, eyes glancing at the beautiful and elaborate gates that seemed to close in on her.

The smile she had slipped, eyes returning to a dull state as the golden emblem was reflected in her eyes.


Chapter 70.




You Mean Nothing to Me.


“Well, I’m pleasantly surprised you decided to stay Miss Lewellin.” the headmistress told her after she explained she wouldn’t be going away after all, “There really is no better school around than the one in your hometown.” she laughed heartily in delight.

Leyla only faintly smiled in reply, doing her best to be cordial as she sat from across the headmistress.

Her eyes lowered to the ground, looking quite embarrassed at her changing her decision.

“I’m truly sorry for giving you trouble over my transfer.” Leyla apologized, bowing her head in remorse.

The headmistress only brushed off her apology.

“Nonsense,” the headmistress said, “As long as you’re staying in our school there’s no trouble to be had.” she pointed out before clearing her throat, and looking a bit sheepish this time. “By the way Miss Lewellin, may I inquire if you changed your mind about Theo?”

“Hm?” Leyla looked up, “Theo?” she softly wondered to herself, before memories of the grocery store owner’s son popped up in her mind, “Oh! Theo?” she looked back at the headmistress who nodded eagerly.

Fortunately, the headmistress’ spouse neared them, carrying a tray with tea, effectively cutting off their conversation.

“Come now dear, let’s not force her.” interjected her husband, “Look at how embarrassed Miss Lewellin is. Let the young people be.”

“I’m just saying that Theo is a perfectly good young man.” the headmistress haughtily shot back at him before looking pointedly at Leyla, who only smiled awkwardly at the two of them.

She really wanted them to get together, and couldn’t help but wonder if Leyla thought Theo was not up to her standards. She knew Leyla had been engaged to Dr. Etman’s son, but broke it off.

The headmistress couldn’t help but think Leyla should know by now that looking for better prospects won’t look too good for her. It could even backfire on her, making her look greedy when she knew Leyla was anything but.



Deeming a change of subject was in order, the headmistress cleared her throat before straightening up, shaking further thoughts off her mind. She then gave a cheerful smile to the young teacher.

“Well then, now that you’re staying with us, how about we place you as the star of our play next year?” she suggested jovially, “I think we’ll be able to garner huge amounts of donations once more if we do that.”

Leyla only smiled at the sudden change of subject. She knew it was a poor joke on the headmistress’ part, but this felt much easier to laugh about now after the harrowing events she had experienced lately.

Soon enough they wrapped up their conversation about the school, their students, and the plans for the next semester. Leyla bid the couple goodbye, before exiting the headmistress’ house.

The temperature outside was freezing, the cold chilling her through the bone, making her walk at a sluggish pace. However, Leyla found herself wanting to prolong the time it took her to reach Arvis.

She found herself stopping right by the central station’s square, looking around aimlessly. She began to move once more, drawing closer to the display windows by the mall, gazing at the items with no particular thought, vaguely looking at her translucent reflection…

‘What would happen if I just suddenly disappeared from here?’ she couldn’t help but wonder.

Huh, even wishful thinking proved to be depressing. Leyla knew deep down there was no way she could ever go through with escaping the Duke. She couldn’t leave her uncle behind, not when it’s his life on the line.

‘Even if I managed to convince my uncle to move and leave Arvis with me, the duke would stop at nothing to find him.’

It would also be counterproductive of her if she were to summon the duke’s ire in her defiance. It could make things worse than it already is.

With a deep sigh, Leyla closed her eyes, leaning her head against the cold glass, the helplessness overwhelming her once again.

It was rather obvious to her the duke was keeping her on a leash by giving her uncle sweet opportunities to stay in Arvis. She couldn’t believe he would go to such lengths just to satisfy his carnal desires. She was sure now that once he was through with her, and thoroughly sated, he would dispose of her just as quickly.

That cursed night said it so plainly and loudly just how little the duke thought of her.


She began to walk once more, finding no relief in prolonging her stay in the biting cold. She turned down a familiar platanus road, feet moving through the snow. She never prayed for a miracle as hard as she did now, when Kyle’s letter echoed in the back of her mind, halting her steps once more…

[My beloved Leyla]



He started every one of his letters that way. She knew this because she spent that morning reading the dozen letters he’d sent her way. As much as she wanted to be crossed with her uncle for such deceit, she could understand why he withheld them from her.

When they returned to the police station later that day, and he saw the letters spread all over the dining table, Uncle Bill began to stammer and beg for her forgiveness. Leyla could only smile mournfully towards him.

“I’m so ashamed to have done such a horrible thing to you.” he’d told her that day, his hair looking an unusual gray in the light of the winter’s pale sun. “But I want you to know that I’m with you every step of the way, Leyla, even if it means you want to go back to Kyle.”

He sounded so sure, Leyla recalled, his eyes shining determinedly. He kept apologizing again, explaining how foolish it was of him to do such a thing and wanted to come clean the day of the explosion. Leyla couldn’t find it in herself to mind…

“I’m fine uncle.” she replied then, before swiftly inviting him to some breakfast she had prepared before leaving their cabin to fetch him. Uncle Bill could only nod in reply, both of them barely managing to finish half their plates.

It didn’t take long for Leyla to spot the gates of Arvis. She arrived quicker than she’d like. Her fists instinctively clench at the sight of them, inciting a deep rage at the memory of its master…

‘Just as I am nothing to you, you are nothing to me.’ Leyla thought rebelliously as she crossed the threshold. Memories of that night still plagued her dreams, giving her restless sleep. ‘I won’t let the likes of you have the power to hurt me.’

Her entire body was freezing, but her hands were clammy. She quickened up her pace, boldly marching through the pavement when she finally arrived in their cabin. She quickly locked up the door before releasing a sigh of relief.

The cabin was empty for now, with her uncle largely occupied with the repairs of the greenhouse since early morning. She suspected it won’t be until later tonight that she’ll be seeing him. He really was so eager to pay back the duke for his kindness.

Leyla plopped herself on top of her bed haphazardly, looking at the ceiling in thought.

[My beloved Leyla]


She closed her eyes shut, bringing up an arm to cover her eyes, wiping the memories of his letters off her mind. But whenever she would, horrid memories of her night with the duke would resurface. She wanted to do nothing more than cry that instant, but the light tapping on her window distracted her.

There was a sudden lurch in her heart when hearing the sound. Slowly, she turned her head to her window. Once upon a time she had been eager to hear the sound of her precious Phoebe arriving to visit her.

Now she could only fear dread, for when she drew her windows open, and Phoebe flew in, she had a note tied to her ankle.

A note written by the Duke.







“You don’t plan to keep the gardener in Arvis forever, do you?”

Claudine immediately asked, cutting straight to the point. She had a polite smile on her face as she looked at her fiance inquiringly. Upon her question, multiple pairs of eyes snapped in her direction, darting back and forth between her and the Duke.

“Claudine!” the Countess Brandt hissed, scolding her softly as she sat nearest to her. But Claudine cared not for everyday theatrics at the moment. She wanted clear-cut answers, and she would get them from the Duke himself.

“Truly your decision to drop the charges against the gardener baffled so many of us, and while commendable, it doesn’t explain why he’s still here in Arvis, working and living for you.” Claudine pointed out. “Are you confident that he won’t make the same mistake again? What if it causes another mayhem for you with worse consequences?”

“That is quite true my Lady,” Matthias replied, looking charmingly at her with a smile on his lips, “However I also believe that he could better handle the restoration of the greenhouse you so dearly loved. After all, he was the one mostly in charge of its design and arrangement since its conception.” He explained calmly to her in front of their audience.

Claudine knew by then that whatever argument she would make, there was no changing his decision.

“Well, I won’t argue that I did love the greenhouse as it was, and would like to see it restored to its former glory,” she began, “But I also fear that having someone, who’d once been careless in his work, handling such a delicate project, no matter his expertise.” she calmly finished, sending a demure smile to everyone present.


When she made no further argument, indicating she would retreat from such a discussion any longer, the Countess Brandt looked more relieved sitting beside her.

There had been an uproar in the community when word had spread of Madam Norma being involved with an accident caused by one of their seasoned employees. An even greater praise the Herhardt House garnered when the duke dropped all charges against him. Her line of questioning could have been interpreted as worry and fear about their upcoming wedding, but it couldn’t have been further from the truth.

For beneath each word she masked in concern for their health and safety, was her concern of one Leyla Lewellin.

She wasn’t worried about Leyla’s state of mind, or her uncle’s. No, she was concerned about whether or not the duke used this opportunity to get Leyla to cave in to his advances.

Her eyes darted towards her fiance, and narrowed at his posture. He did seem a little laid back. She was assured he did manage to have her already. It was just in his nature. She knew he would have milked every opportunity he was presented with to the very last drop.

There was no way Leyla was disappearing from him any time soon.

Initially she had been worried at the news of the explosion in Arvis. Images darting to the worst case scenarios when she heard Madam Norma had been within the vicinity of the explosion by the greenhouse. She also rejoiced along with the others when she heard she only retained minor injuries, but was saddened at the loss of the greenhouse.

She took it with grace, and allowed herself to act accordingly, but in the back of her mind she couldn’t help but silently cheer at the fact this would be a great opportunity for Leyla and her uncle to move away in Arvis. She was absolutely positive Leyla would have taken the chance.

But then she heard about the Duke pardoning Bill Remmer, and she grew suspicious and critical. Worry surged through her at the thought of Matthias taking Leyla for himself, and she grew anxious at the possibility of a relationship forming between the two of them.

How scandalous it would be for both his wife and mistress to be living under the same roof! She knew that whether or not Leyla left Arvis, there would be no changing her status with Matthias. In fact, if word of their affair were to get out, it would be their reputations on the line, not hers.

It was just a personal preference of hers that Leyla was out of the image by the time she ascended to the title as Duchess Herhardt.

She seemed to recall as well of Riette warning her to not provoke Matthias, just recently even. He advised her to leave them alone, and not butt in on their relationship. He looked absolutely serious in telling her, hoping she would see the sense in his words.


But Claudine was a little stubborn, and she couldn’t see or understand Riette’s warnings. Despite that, she would heed his advice as she saw fit. After all, she knew that the only reason the gardener was able to retain his place in Arvis was because of Leyla.

Still for the life of her, she couldn’t understand how Leyla managed to wrap her finger around the Duke so securely. Perhaps she did know how to work her charms against men after all. They do say it’s always the quiet ones, the ones who seemed innocent.

But the thought of their affair would only further sour her mood further, and the day was just getting started. She needed a different subject, and thus resolved to act more cordially in front of everyone, appearing more pleasant than how she actually felt.

By the end of dinner, Claudine found herself absolutely parched. Her endless engagement in polite conversation taxing her greatly. Fortunately, it was easy for both her and the Countess Brandt to excuse themselves earlier, enabling them to retire back to their beds.

On their way out, the Countess immediately broke the silence between them.

“I might have scolded you earlier for questioning the duke, but I do agree with your sentiments.” she began, “I don’t understand how he could just drop all the charges against the gardener. I can’t help but think the Herhardt House has turned soft.” the Countess scoffed irritably.

Claudine was escorted by her mother to the guest bedroom, and continued to air out her grievances. Claudine glanced by the room’s window, where she had a perfect view of the wrecked greenhouse. She only hummed agreeably with her mother’s words, when a smirk found its way on her lips the more she stared at the greenhouse.

“Fret not, dear mother,” Claudine replied once her mother quieted, “I can assure you, come next summer, the gardener won’t be a problem anymore.” At her words, the Countess was startled and came up to stand beside her.

“What are you saying Claudine? That you’d fire him?” her mother asked incredulously, “You’d go against Matthias’ and Madam Norma’s wishes?”

Claudine only hummed for a moment, before turning to face the countess and smiling brightly back at her mother.

“I’m just saying that the new Duchess of Herhardt would be in need of a new gardener.” she calmly replied.






“I’ve finished preparing it just as you ordered, master.” Hessen dutifully informed him with a bow. Matthias, who had been staying in the reception room of the annex, glanced at him briefly before looking down at the large silver domed dish on his desk.

“Well done.” he briefly said, before taking the slew of mail Hessen handed out to him. He dismissed his butler, who left him alone to his devices.

Matthias leaned back on the sofa, flipping through his mail. Most of them were invitations for various upcoming year-end parties and social events. He even saw some of them containing news of the Crown Prince visiting with his wife. They were scheduled to tour the northern part of the empire early next year after all.

Once he was done skimming through them, he grabbed his fountain pen by the inner pocket of his jacket to begin writing his replies. The sight of the pen brought a forlorn smile on his lips, it had been with him since last fall.

He clicked the pen closed, and on its lid was engraved a name in golden letters.

Leyla Lewellin.

Her name glistened in the firelight. He couldn’t help but feel some sense of amusement in using something of hers for the most menial tasks he does everyday.

“Why do you keep stealing my stuff?”

She had complained about it once, the frustration clear on her face when she realized he was the one who took it. He couldn’t help but let out a fond chuckle when she likened him to a crow. He could say the same for her.

He turned the pen between his slender fingers, before he glanced down in his wristwatch. He counted down the seconds, until finally the clock’s hands struck at a certain time, when a familiar knock echoed inside his office.

He put the pen back in his breast pocket, and languidly rose to his feet. His footsteps clicked through his polished office floor, and swung the door open as he neared it.

On the other side of the door was just the very person he expected to see.

His dearest mistress, Leyla.


Chapter 71.


Throw Me Away.




Matthias allowed himself to step aside for her to enter, just as he did that night. And Leyla entered without pause, but unlike that night, she did not stop at the reception room.

No, she headed straight to his bedroom. Matthias couldn’t help the smug upturn on his lips, but chose not to question her, and simply followed suit. He was looking forward to what she was planning for him today.

She never failed him before, he doubted she would start now.

When Leyla reached the door of his room, her nerves gripped her once more, causing her to hesitate. However, she also wanted this done as quickly as possible. She held onto the knob but had yet to open the door.

[I’ve done my part. You should do yours.]

Those were his words, sent to her by her bird.

Matthias paused a few steps behind her, watching her for any further movement. Just as he was to question her on her actions, Leyla swiftly turned the knob, walking in with a determined look on her face. Silently he continued to walk a few paces behind her, observing her actions as to what she was just planning to do tonight.

He leaned back against the closed door, crossing his arms across his chest as he continued to appraise her. She stood stock still in the middle of his bedroom, fiddling with her fingers for a moment before resolutely advancing to his bed.

Leyla immediately set her belongings: glasses, scarf, gloves and coat, by the bedside table, neatly arranging them.

[I’ve done my part. You should do yours.]

How crude of him, she couldn’t help but think, to demand she fulfill their deal. What a role she had to play indeed. Recalling his note only served to root her in place, she didn’t want this. He might have as well told her outright to start acting like his mistress!


She felt so cornered, stuck between a wall with a cat in front of her, while she was the mouse! Her legs gave in, causing her to drop to the floor, unable to move any longer.

She thought she had made her peace already, but the memories of that night came flooding back in full force, rendering her paralyzed. For a moment she thought she had blacked out, but she was only numb with the hurt and shame she felt in the face of her weakness.

What she did with the Duke was the furthest thing from an act of love. Despite the sweet nothings he whispered to her ear, his actions only proved him to be a brute. And what’s worse, it wasn’t just a simple carnal desire to bed a woman…

No…

“You’re so beautiful Leyla, especially when you cry and beg.” he whispered to her in the midst of his throes of passion.

She didn’t know how long it’s been, only that she had sat too long on the cold floors when the winter breeze finally seeped into her frame, through the room’s open windows. And then a different memory came to mind, to a much earlier, and much pleasant time.

Back when the duke was still someone she could find redeeming qualities to.

“So Leyla, cry,” he smiled so sweetly at her, “Even better if you beg.” he finished off. And despite his cruel words, she couldn’t help but think of him as beautiful that summer night last year.

Truly, he enjoyed seeing her cry so much, and that was the reason he could stand to make her suffer! She chuckled hysterically to herself, sobbing through the memories. She hated how she kept trying to find reason, to give him excuses as to why he’d do horrid things to her!

“Leyla!”

Suddenly, Leyla awoke at the sound of her uncle Bill calling out to her. Groggily she sat up, and saw she was back in the Duke’s room. Ah, she couldn’t help but realize with such depreciation, she still had a role to fulfill.

She nervously got up from her spot, and headed towards the windows, drawing the curtains to a close as she rubbed the tears away with the sleeves of her shirt. If he wanted to see her cry and beg, then she wouldn’t give him the satisfaction.

Not anymore.

He’d taken something from her in the worst possible way. And while she can’t escape him anymore, she resolved not to give him any satisfaction as he took more and more from her. Then perhaps he’d grow bored faster, and thus discard her sooner.


She turned around, hands immediately coming to the buttons of her blouse and deftly opened it one button at a time. Leyla expertly undressed herself, fixing her clothes along the way until she was only in her undergarments.



Her breath hitched as she went to remove it, but she managed to do so quickly and swiftly. Considering he’d already seen her in a much more pathetic state before, there would be no point in delaying their coupling due to her embarrassment.

Matthias could only stare at her in a baffled manner. He had been content to watch her cry and struggle, but he hadn’t been expecting her to be so willing in baring herself whole to him. She even took her clothes off herself.

He couldn’t help but wonder if she’d gone insane over the last few days. It’s his only plausible explanation as to why she’s acting not like herself at all.

He watched as Leyla picked up her clothes, setting them down to the chair nearby in a neat pile. Her hands then went up, and pulled loose the pin, keeping her hair in place, letting golden locks cascade down her pale neck, and slender shoulders, falling up until the small on her back.

He felt himself being mesmerized by the sight of her in front of him. He was intoxicated by her, he was beginning to lose his inhibitions. His breathing grew ragged the more he kept staring. She then gingerly sat by the edge of his bed, waiting for him…

And oh, what a sight that was. She doesn’t know just what she was doing to him. He ran a palm through his dark locks. Seated like that, with her body shaking in anticipation, it was almost like she was looking forward to being with him.

And he stalked slowly over to her, watching as her flush spread from her cheeks down to her chest as she looked down, struggling to avert her eyes from him.

“What do you think you’re doing?” Matthias growled under his breath, grasping her chin in his hand, forcing her to look up at him. Leyla kept quiet as she stared at him, her throat bobbing up and down as she swallowed back an insult.

“My part.” she hissed at him in a whisper, but the shakiness in her voice failed to make it threatening.

He hummed, tilting his head at her, “And what is your part?”

He wanted to hear it straight from her. But Leyla clenched her jaw, refusing to take part in his satisfaction.

“You know what.” she boldly replied, willingly looking up at him in defiance despite flinching at the way his gaze narrowed at her. “Your deal laid it out so clearly.”


Matthias only gave her a once over, giving her body shivers as he glanced at her. He hummed as he watched the way she acted like a prim and proper lady despite her state of undress.

When he finally met her eyes, he couldn’t help but let out a self-deprecating laugh. At the back of his mind, he couldn’t help but wonder if paying a random whore to sleep with him could make him feel as dirty as he did now?

When his laughter died down, he turned back to Leyla with a glare.

He stroked her golden locks, humming indifferently at her, as though to praise her for being so obedient to him. He started out slow, and soft, just as he does when it comes to her, smiling comfortingly at her.

When it seemed like she was relaxed enough, he poised to strike!

His hand came down to her neck, clasping it firmly, making her gasp in terror. He ignored the fear in her eyes as she clasped onto his wrist with both hands, as he pushed her into the mattress, climbing over her.

Matthias wanted to see what she would do if he tightened his hand on her pressure points, making her gasp for precious air as he hovered above her. He only chuckled manically for a while, his reflection catching on the mirror hanging over the mantelpiece by the marble-white fireplace.

No longer could he see the revered Duke Matthias von Herhardt. No, the man he could see was now tainted. He could see it plain as day now, how ruined he’d become simply because for once in his life, he couldn’t just have what he wanted.



When Leyla’s erratic breathing finally quieted down, Matthias roused from the bed, leaving Leyla to lie on her stomach. She was exhausted, but not enough to miss his movements. She felt some relief in seeing him leave.

‘It’s over now.’

She couldn’t help but quietly cheer in her mind. She stayed still, afraid to draw attention to herself. She was faintly aware of the blanket tossed over her form in a poor attempt to give her some form of decency. She only wished he’d leave her alone like he did that previous night so she could finally leave.

She heard his footsteps drifting away, before she finally let out a sigh. Until she heard the footsteps growing louder. Did she rejoice too soon?

The tension seeped through her body. She felt as though she was at a breaking point.Her fists slowly clenched onto the rumpled sheets. It was a simple task, to look up to see what he was up to, but she was determined not to move.

She won’t make it easy for him.


The Duke, she assumed by the way the bed dipped somewhere behind her, was back. In the corner of her eyes, she could tell he was already dressed.

Matthias looked down, a smirk curling up his lips as he gazed down upon her. He reached out, gently caressing her tousled hair, patting her like he would a pet. He brushed her hair aside, to reveal her flushed face, looking as defiant as ever.

He dipped his head down, breath brushing up against her earlobes. Leyla couldn’t repress the shiver that ran through her spine. ‘Don’t start crying now!’ she scolded herself, feeling the tears threatening to form.

She repeated it like a mantra. She had reached this far without crying, she wouldn’t dare start now.

“Good job Leyla.” Matthias praised her with a sultry whisper. There was a ghost of a kiss in his words, before he finally pulled away from her.

She felt his weight disappear on the mattress and listened to the sound of his footsteps fading out. When she heard the door swing and click to a close, and heard no other movement, she finally rose herself.

She was finally, truly alone once more.

Leyla could feel the pain in her swollen lips, she faintly tasted a metallic tongue as she licked her lips. She had been cut, but it wasn’t as though it was a big wound. She then found herself sinking to the floor, her reflection catching sight, making her wince and avert her view of it.

After a moment, she found herself looking back at her reflection. She saw the way her eyes looked back at her dully. This night was just another meaningless tumble beneath the sheets. But no amount of excuses could make her brush away the pain she could feel so easily.

She could hardly find the strength in her to move, she would likely be unable to dress herself at this rate.

It was almost like Matthias made sure she would be exhausted to do so once they were done.

So instead, Leyla crawled poorly towards her clothes, reaching into her coat’s pocket to get some handkerchief, and began to wipe her body down with any bodily and sticky fluids she had on. Her breath kept hitching with every stroke of the handkerchief.

‘Don’t cry, don’t cry dont cry dontcrydontcrydontcrydontcry…’ she kept repeating like a mantra over her head, growing more frantic with every second she spent longer trying to clean herself.

Finally done, she finally managed to stand up, and dressed herself once more, before moving out of the annex and walked back home. She took great care to hide from the light of the moon, ducking beneath the trees to stay in the shadows, kicking every random acorn or pebble in her path away from her numbly.

[My beloved Leyla]


Kyle’s voice echoed in her thoughts as she recalled his letters. She managed to arrive back in her cabin, undisturbed and quickly went inside her room quietly. She still had one last letter to read from him.

She’d burned them all, and now only one remained.

She waited for the fire to burn brighter, before she carried over the last letter closer, and broke the seal. She flipped the papers open, and began to read it, his voice echoing in her mind as though he was reading it to her…

[My beloved Leyla,

Will you marry me once more?

I can’t believe I’ve reached a point of proposing to you once more, and through a piece of paper at that. It sounds less sincere this way, I know, but I’ve never been more sincere in my life than at this moment to you.

This might sound a bit of consolation, but my grandfather has promised to me a share of inheritance. Come next spring, after my birthday, I would have the sole claim to it. It’s not a lot of money I’m afraid, but I am certain it would be enough for us to start over.

We could move closer to the college district, find a small house to make into a home, and continue our studies and fulfill our dreams. If you fear we’re going too fast, then I don’t mind slowing down. We can go entirely at your own pace, even if it takes until graduation before we can be wed. I could do it, I will do anything so long as I can stay beside you.

So my beloved, please, won’t you come to Ratz with me? You can take the test again, and I’m certain you would pass because you’re the most intelligent person I know. That way we could study together, and we can work on our dreams side by side.

Do you remember those stories we used to share with each other Leyla? We promised that one day, I shall become a doctor, and you the greatest ornithologist. We would lead the most wondrous life! I still wish for that day to come. Whenever I dream of a future, you are the one constant I can always see in it.

You are my dearest friend, my sole lover. You are my future, and I hope one day to be your husband, and father of your children. For you are forever my dearest Leyla.

I won’t deny the love I carry for my parents, for I know they love me just the same. That’s an irrefutable fact, but Leyla, I will admit I cannot bear to walk down a path that makes me so unhappy. Their idea of my happiness is not my happiness. It is merely my mother’s vanity winning.

But I know where my happiness lies. So Leyla, would you accept me back? Would you allow yourself to be my happiness once more?

I cannot promise you a life of grandeur, I’m afraid. Not right now when I still can’t break free of my parents’ shadows. As I am, I am a nobody in society and the world at large. But I can assure you this.


I will love and cherish you for as long as you will allow it. I swear that no harm shall come to you again, whether by another’s hand or mine. I only ask that you reconsider us once more. Do not think about what will be just yet, or what was.

I only implore you to think with your heart. Do our hearts still beat the same Leyla? If you say yes, then I’ll hesitate no more. I’ll come to you at once! We can leave Arvis together, and find our happy place in this world!

With love always,

Kyle]

Leyla lost track of how many times she’s read, and re-read the letter until the embers of the flame in front of her died down. Dawn had arrived once more, the rooster croaking as the sun peaked out the clouds.

She won’t deny that once upon a time, she dreamt of a future with Kyle. It had been within her grasp once, but was then cruelly replaced by a nightmarish future with the Duke. Only it was no nightmare anymore. Just her reality.

She could hear her uncle waking up, the way he groaned as he stretched his limbs to start an early morning. She rose quietly from her bed, and headed straight out to their stove. She grasped tightly onto Kyle’s last letter, staring quietly into the flame, before tossing it over fire.

She quickly moved away, standing at the other side of the room, and watched as the letter turned into ashes before her eyes. As the fire consumed his love for her, she allowed a single tear to slide down her cheek, and no more.



When Hessen had come back to check on his master back in the annex, he immediately noticed the untouched cake he had prepared earlier by the reception table.

He had been initially surprised to receive an order from his master to buy some cake. And not just a random cake, one made by Arvis’ finests bakers. But the thing was, Hessen knew the Duke was not fond of sweets. He does not eat such food pleasantly. So he had been certain it wasn’t for the Duke himself, but for someone else.

He took a deep breath, glancing one last time at the cake before knocking lightly on the duke’s bedroom door. He heard a faint order, telling him he could come inside, before he entered the room. He was greeted with the sight of Matthias reading the morning paper.

Hessen came to stand a few paces to his side.

“Master, shall I set out the cake for you again?” he asked politely, Matthias looked up through his brows, before looking back down to read the newspaper.


“There will be no need for that.” he replied coolly. When Hessen looked questioningly back at the table, Matthias flipped a page as he straightened out, “Get rid of it at once.” he commanded.

Hessen knew that questioning him further would be deemed impolite, thus he bowed to his master, quietly dismissing himself and took the cake with him, leaving Matthias to his own devices.


Chapter 72.


How Dare You Make Me Feel This Way.



They were already a few weeks in on their arrangement, when Matthias finally saw Leyla through his car window.

For the past few weeks, he had gotten acquainted with the sight of her lethargic state, always so expressionless and forlorn whenever it was just the two of them in the annex.

Whenever she arrived, she would dutifully undress herself for him, and wait patiently until they began. She always looked too exhausted, but so afraid of him whenever he would approach her. But the woman he saw now was different.

Outside from the confines of his room, she looked livelier than she’d been. She dressed respectably, and had an amicable smile on her face as she walked with a group of women roughly among her age. Among them was the same woman she came with during their picnic in Arvis. Mrs. Grever, if he remembered correctly.


Matthias couldn’t help but narrow his eyes at her as he observed them. She looked thinner than she had been, but she no longer wore that haunted expression. She didn’t carry a sullen and gloomy air around her peers, but rather a warm and sunny disposition. He could almost mistake her for a different woman.

He found himself torn whether he should rejoice she wasn’t acting so helplessly outside of their meetings, or insulted by how well she was hiding their affair. Nonetheless, Matthias could respect her boundaries. If she wants to act like his mistress, he’ll let her. Same as if she wanted to act as though she’s a commonplace whore, he’d treat her as such too.

She has no one to blame for it but herself.

But despite that fact, he couldn’t help but feel more affected whenever he would be forced to be rougher than usual with her. She took every insult, and every hurt he made her feel when they’d be together quietly and resolutely indifferent. And it made him feel strange whenever the night would be over, and he’d be left alone to his thoughts.

Lately, he found himself at a loss on how to deal with her. Matthias still felt the deep satisfaction of seeing her wince in pain and flush in embarrassment, that much hadn’t changed between them. In fact, it gave him a sense of pride that she wasn’t entirely indifferent to him.

What left him baffled was that whenever she would be on the verge of breaking down, as he’d learned to read by the way her lips quivered and eyes began to water, she’d take a deep breath, and no tears would come. It was as though she finally learned to calm herself down, cutting short the amusement she usually brought to him, leaving him with a bereft feeling.

The audacity she has on making him feel so terrible. It brought him back to the time when he’d nearly gone on a berserk streak, during spring last year. It was the first moment in his life he really felt that strong urge to kill. And that happened when he heard from his mother’s lips that Leyla, his Leyla, was planning on tying the knot with Kyle Etman.



A feeling that was often called upon whenever he’d see her turn away from him. Not for the first time since they started their arrangement, did he wonder if that urge to kill was not directed at the poor doctor’s son, but instead at Leyla herself?

Despite how much she’d irritate him these days though, Matthias can’t deny he was still and utterly entertained by her. She drove him positively mad, invoking emotions he didn’t even know he possessed.

Never in his life did the sight of a quivering body give him such desire to give in to baser instincts he once brushed off as of no mere importance, until he saw her.

“Uh, master?” an attendant had carefully called out to him. Matthias glanced to his side, to see the car door already opened, only waiting for him to make his exit. It seemed like he had arrived.


With a sigh, Matthias gracefully got out of his car, and headed to the lobby. When he arrived, he was suddenly greeted by a slew of company executives, rushing to welcome him.

Just before he would fully enter the magnificent building lined with enormous rows of corinthian columns, Matthias subtly stopped in an angle that let him freely gaze on the sunlit streets outside.

He glanced down at the streets, watching each person that walked by it, fully knowing Leyla wouldn’t take that road. Once his lingering thoughts were appeased, he resumed his walk, schooling his expression back to a polite and calm one.



Everyday, Leyla would see her uncle off with a smile, watching solemnly at the heavy way he carried himself whenever he’d go to work at the Arvis greenhouse. Carrying his large duffel bag down through their steps, and through the Platanus road, walking with his fellow gardeners looking equally serious made them look like soldiers heading off for war.

Most of the greenhouse’s structure has been restored to the way it was before the explosion, but the variety of plants that had been replanted had mostly died during the winter frost. Many of them were of the rare sorts, and couldn’t be easily replaced due to the limited sources.

And Leyla knew that her uncle would be the last to complain, for he’d taken it as his duty to repair the greenhouse as payment for what the Herhardts had done for him.

Leyla couldn’t help the worry she had for him. Uncle Bill would work from dawn until dusk just so he could atone for the accident. It was taking its toll on him, she could tell, but she could also tell he was determined to see this through.

“Leyla! What are you doing out here?!” Uncle Bill exclaimed as soon as he saw her when he’d passed by the street’s corner, “It’s cold outside, you should head back!” he implored her.

Leyla only nodded at him, but still found herself unable to move to the warmth of their cabin as she watched him go. He’d taken it as his responsibility to visit every known horticulturist, renowned botanical gardens, and aristocrats with a good number of plant collections to look for replacement of the plants they’ve lost.

But that could take weeks before he’d return, and Leyla found herself wondering if she should take this opportunity to also leave and accompany him in his travels? She couldn’t bear it if she must stay in Arvis for weeks on end alone in their cabin.



But she feared if she were to request to do so, the Duke would tighten his grip on her, which would make it even more suspicious that something was going on between them.


One by one, each family member that bid good bye to their respective gardener went back home, leaving Leyla as the last one to stay in the cold. She didn’t know how long she stayed standing out there with nothing but the bitter chill as company, until the sound of an approaching car shook her out of reverie.

Knowing that the Duke was in it, she hastily made her escape, wanting no contact from him aside from what was necessary. Unfortunately, a car would always prove to be faster than a human.

It passed her by, creating a strong gust of wind in its rush. Leyla clasped her hands together, hoping it would not stop until it reached Arvis. Her chest pounded with anxiety as she remembered she cannot hide behind her uncle in his absence.

But it wasn’t a big deal, it wasn’t like the Duke was responsible as to why he left after all.

When she could no longer see the vehicle, Leyla immediately hurried back to her cabin, her thoughts growing frantic the longer she stayed outside. She locked the door behind her and double checked her windows, before removing her clothes and warmed herself thoroughly.

She cleaned the house and ironed out her drying clothes, finding great comfort in her mundane tasks everyday she spent alone. It was the only reprieve she had, making her believe that soon enough Matthias would be nothing more than a stain in her memory.

‘He would probably abandon me right before his marriage.’

She thought gratefully. She had just seen the Duke and his lady standing side by side with each other, looking like the most perfect pair to ever exist.

Leyla’s cheeks flushed as she went by unnoticed by the two of them, managing to arrive home unbothered. There was a strange feeling in her chest when she recalled the two of them together, but she mostly chalked it up to the cold weather back there.

Just as she was about to sit by her desk, Phoebe fluttered by her window, earlier than she usually arrived. Once more, she carried with her a summon to the Duke. A deep rage erupted in her as she ripped into the note, and tossed it into the fire.

Leyla proceeded to finish her duties, pushing his summons to the back of her mind. She went and fed their livestock, and washed the dishes she used. Once she found that all her chores were finished, she reluctantly got ready to leave, and locked her cabin before heading out to the annex, using the shadows once more as a cover of her leaving.

One day, she hoped to be free of the Duke. She’d move to the farthest city from him, bringing Uncle Bill with her. Maybe they’d settle somewhere south, by the borders of Lovita, she heard it was nice there. Then she’d take her uncle out on a trip, just the two of them. They’d eat and laugh to their heart’s content, watching birds as they lounged on a tropical island. Or perhaps they’d vacation in snowy mountain peaks with majestic views.


Then they’d return, to their quaint little house, owned only by them, and not by the grace of their betters. She’d decorate it just the way she’d like, while her uncle would grow his own garden in their backyard and…

Her thoughts were abruptly cut off when the view of the annex came around, replacing her daydreams with dread as she drew closer to the looming building. She was already counting down the days she’d be forced to spend with the man.

She’d lived long enough beneath the thumbs of her cruel relatives in her formative years, she could manage a few months with him. And thus, her pleasant disposition disappeared, casting a shadow over her features as she walked dutifully up the steps to meet with the duke.



The sun was yet to fully set when she’d managed to arrive, making it difficult for her to move unnoticed. Yet even in the light of the fading sun, the annex didn’t change much. She still stood in a massive bedroom, with a lit fireplace in preparation for the incoming darkness. The elegant furniture still looked the same, and Leyla was still waiting for him in complete nakedness.

Matthias took his sweet time in reading through his papers, treating the sight of her naked body as one of his ornaments by now. He had grown busier these days, with the family business expanding their influence. That was largely thanks to the improved company system his grandfather, and by extension father, had made when they were still alive.

He remembered them telling him that no head of the business could handle everything in the company, and thus ironed out every detail in delegating the tasks to their subordinates. It hadn’t been implemented when they were still alive, but now Matthias was reaping it’s benefits. Thus, he only needed to make the final decisions of major projects and developments that could make or break their company.

Ever since he could read and write, he had been instilled with the sense of the best decision making. But the world around him was churning and turning rapidly every day, creating new problems and new circumstances that leave much to be determined.

So he would meticulously analyze every report handed to him. The one he was currently reading was pertaining to mining rights, and oil fields located overseas. When he found himself reading too much, he would only look up, and appreciate her bare beauty presented to him, before going back to his task.

If it were any other night, these walls would’ve been filled with moans and pleasures from both him and Leyla. But for now, he was content in listening to the rhythmic cackling of the fire as he sifted through the reports.

Leyla, on the other hand, grew irritable the longer she stared on the floor, waiting for him to have his way with her. She finally looked up, and saw that the night had fully settled in, replacing the orange hues of the setting sun.


She didn’t understand why he was ignoring her as though she was invisible today. Normally he’d begin when she finished undressing for him, chasing after his pleasure. Now, she sat uselessly, and humiliated at how naked she was.

She crossed her arms over her chest, now feeling the vestiges of shame return to her the longer the Duke would do nothing but give her a side glance before returning back to his papers. He was doing nothing but work the entire time she’d been with him.

Finally, he put down the thick document he’d been reading, and both their eyes met briefly.

She found herself shuddering when they locked eyes, and quickly averted her gaze away from him, looking resolutely on back on her toes. She heard him abruptly get up, a sense of relief washing over her, thinking it was time to start…

But then his steps grew fainter, and not louder, indicating he was leaving her in his room. Puzzled, Leyla looked up once more and stared at the door once it clicked shut. She could hear the muffled sounds of him speaking from behind the door. It sounded like he was talking business.

From his tone, she could tell he was using his polite, and resolute, persona of a respectable Duke. She heard him quiet down, and him returning back into the room. When his door swung open, she found herself freezing in place as they met eyes once again.

Leyla forgot she had been waiting for him to come back. But from what she’d seen, he was hardly bothered by her. Matthias only gave her a once over, eyeing her with the look of an art curator admiring a masterpiece, before casually returning to his work.

He casually leaned back in his chair, stretching his long legs to rest on top of his ottoman, before picking up the papers by the side of the table. Once more, the room was filled with the sound of ruffling papers, before the sound of a waltz seeped through the air.

The music was coming from the phonograph in the reception room. Leyla couldn’t help but grow more puzzled the more he kept his distance from her.

Quietly, she reached out for her glasses, and put them back on. She glanced at him with a frown, eyeing the way he twirled his pen absentmindedly as he read through more of his work documents.

As though sensing her eyes on him, Matthias looked up, curling up an eyebrow inquiringly at her. Even with her glasses, she couldn’t read what his intentions for her were today.

Feeling flustered, she quickly got up and grabbed her undergarments. If he wanted to watch her as he worked, well, she wouldn’t let herself be more humiliated by participating in his perverse fancies. She hurriedly put them back on, sparing him glances from time to time, growing more flush by the second.

She found herself more humiliated tonight! She had been calm the entire time she was naked, but she could only grow more frustrated with every clothing she put back on.


By the time she was wholly dressed, Leyla was completely flushed and red in the face, looking at him with unbridled anger. Matthias only met her gaze calmly, the pen stopping from twirling was the only indication she had that he was paying attention to her.

As the moonlight filtered through the half-opened curtain in the room, Leyla found herself unable to stay silent any longer. And so with a quivering voice, her words rang loudly throughout the stillness in the room as she asked…

“What do you think you’re doing?!”


Chapter 73.


Canary Song.



“Sit.” Matthias said to her in reply in a calm manner as he sat himself down on the table where food had been prepared for them. He gestured for her to take a seat at the remaining chair available, as the others had been conveniently taken away.

Leyla remained standing in front of him, shooting him a scathing glare. She eyed the various food arranged in front of her, while Matthias sat at the head of the long table, the table that brought forth painful memories for her.

“I don’t think we’re close enough to share meals.” she angrily said to him. Matthias only hummed as he unfolded the table napkin with a flick of his wrist.

“I thought you said you agreed to fulfill your role in our deal.”

“I am!” she protested, “I’m giving you everything you want from me!”

Matthias only sighed forlornly at her.


“Yes, that I can’t deny, but your skinny body makes it so painful to thrust into. I can hardly enjoy our time together.” he told her nonchalantly. Leyla’s breath hitched in response to his criticism, hot shame filled her as she listened to him.

Matthias looked at her in a challenging manner, and Leyla couldn’t help but wonder just how low does he see her? How can he just sit there, and spit those words at her!? He might as well just slap her in the face because that’s what it felt like to her, hearing those words.

Matthias picked up his wine-filled glass, cradling it between his fingers as he swirled the liquid around the clear glass. He always held himself in a graceful manner, which was a shame because his personality was equally repulsive.

“Do eat Leyla, you look starved to death.” he pointed out, but Leyla remained standing. Matthias put his goblet down, and leaned back in his seat. “Do you wish to die then?” Still, she refused to answer.




“Well then, do as you please.” Matthias shrugged, smiling brightly at her before clasping his hands together in a thinking pose, “Hmm, I wonder what I should put in your tombstone? Let’s see…” he unclasped his hands, drumming one set of fingers onto the polished tabletop in deep thought.

“Ah, I know! It should be something to commemorate our intimate moments together!” he declared, “Here lies Leyla Lewellin! The beloved mistress of Duke Herhardt!” he announced with a flourish, looking at her with a twinkle in his eye, “I quite like the thought of it, don’t you?”

Leyla could only feel appalled.

“I’ll have it carved into the most exquisite marble in existence, with big and clear letters, so that everyone can see you for what you really are…” he proceeded, “So don’t worry, live or die, you’ll always be with me.”

He sounded so relaxed, so amused by the thought of toying with her even beyond the grave. Leyla’s fists clenched so tightly, her knuckles turned white with rage towards the man, no beast, in front of her.

She tried to forget the first night she ever laid with him, tried to scrub it from her memory, but it just kept coming back, over and over and over again. There was no escaping him wherever she went. No matter how much he’d try to clean and redecorate the space, she’d always find her mind trapped forever in that moment.

The marks he’d left her with had faded and healed over the course of time, but the wound she felt in her spirit remained salted and open.

“I’m not going to die.” Leyla finally responded, making a point to drag the chair across the floor loudly, and sat primly across from him, “In fact, I’m planning to live well.” They now sat across from each other.


She won’t let him bully her as easily as before anymore. She won’t get scared, or flustered in front of him any longer. She won’t allow herself to be affected by him anymore.

“I won’t allow anyone by the likes of you to destroy my life.” she declared, glaring at him hatefully as she reached out for the piece of bread nearby, She tore into the loaf, breaking it into pieces, lathering it with smooth butter before biting into it.

She ate messily, hardly caring how she looked in front of him. He didn’t deserve to see her in her best behavior. In fact, he might grow disgusted by her even, which was definitely something she wanted him to do.

“Hmm, is that so?” he asked her, as he ate at a moderate pace, slicing properly into his food as he chewed carefully on the piece of food he brought to his lips. He quirked up a smile, loving the way she fell for his goading. “What a good girl for me.”

He put his utensils down, and stood up. He carefully grabbed a spare goblet, and the wine bottle, pouring it’s contents into the glass as he made his way gracefully to Leyla’s side. He offered her the poured drink, to which she greedily gobbled up in one gulp. Matthias chuckled when the glass was emptied.

“Well, you’ve certainly got quite the appetite today.” he hummed with amusement, quickly refilling it, when Leyla just quickly downed it in one go once more. She was clearly acting out, Matthias knew that, which did manage to make her seem like the lowlife she was, but he could only be amused as he continued to watch her.

She wiped the stray wine drops on the corner of her mouth with the back of her hand, before angrily stabbing into the food, shoveling in mouthfuls into her mouth as she chewed loudly. She didn’t look that terrible to him, in fact, he rather preferred seeing her acting uncouth than the way she walked like a dead man.











Soon the wine bottle had emptied, and Leyla felt inebriated. She winced at the ringing in her ears, the sound of the music grating at her.

“Turn the music off,” she slurred, glaring at the device blasting its sound at her. She could hear him humming right next to her…

“Just listen,” he said in a whisper, but it also sounded too loud. His voice echoed in her head. “It’s beautiful.” he finished, his voice bouncing back and forth.


Leyla could only frown. She could make up the sounds, guessing it was a waltz, but the current section she was listening too was complicated and hit way too many notes for her to follow, it made her dizzier by the second…

Matthias slightly swayed along with the music. It was his and his canary’s favorite part. Leyla seemed to be doing her best to follow the music but she only groaned in pain, complaining all the way how annoying it was.

She grabbed a fork, sloppily stabbing through her last chunk of meat before stuffing it in her mouth, mangling the meat through her teeth. Matthias laughed out loud as he watched her eating through chubby cheeks.

“Then you have a worse taste of music compared to a bird!”

“Bird?” she asked in a slurred voice, looking so confused why they were talking about a bird. Matthias wondered if she could finish her last bite, she’d been chewing on it for some time now. Eventually, Leyla did manage to swallow it down, washing the meat down her throat with her last sip of wine as she shakily brought the goblet to her lips, some drops escaping and sliding down the corner of her lips in her haste.

She was practically plastered, having drank more wine than she usually does, face all flushed red as a testament to her drunken state. Leyla regarded him seriously, eyes squinting in his direction before she hummed and turned to look at her empty plate as she slapped her lips together in search for more food.

“So, when do you plan to get rid of me?” she asked him in a brazen manner, resting both elbows on the table loudly, making some plates and utensils shake. Matthias only met her gaze, before smoothly setting down his own empty goblet.

But his eyes held a serious look, despite the ease of his actions.

“Well?” she prodded, “I mean, you’ve already had me, many ways in fact,” she grumbled into her goblet, before finding it was empty. She frowned at it, turning it upside down as though it would produce more than just a drop. “It must be coming soon right?” she asked with a smug smile.

“I suppose you’re right.” Matthias finally answered. He was practical enough, after all, he couldn’t be expected to forever keep her as his mistress. He wasn’t that foolish.

“Well, do it quickly then!” she demanded, and Matthias chuckled dryly.

“And what would you do the moment you’re free of me?”

“I already told you!” she reminded him, frowning when her goblet was still empty. “I’ll live well!” she placed her glass down, grabbing the table napkin to wipe her greasy fingers and saucy lips clean. “Yes, I’ll definitely live well and free away from you!”

“You make it sound as though you’re miserable with me.”

Leyla snorted as she chortled in amusement.

“Well, it’s true.” she told him, “You’re the bane of my existence!”

“Right, of course.” Matthias replied in a steely manner as he watched her examine her sticky fingers with great interest. The firelight casted shadows on her face, and though he knew they were golden, her lashes casted a dark shadow over her eyes.

Matthias kept watching Leyla as he leaned back in his chair. No matter how insatiable his current lust was towards Leyla, he knew it was bound to die down eventually once he’s had his fill. And when that time came, it would be most prudent if she were to move away and live on with her life.

But why does the thought of her leaving him fill him with such emptiness? It was an unfathomable feeling to him.

He knew she was only stating facts, but it left him with a bitter taste. Suddenly, Leyla rose from her seat, wobbling as she struggled to stand upright.

“Where do you think you’re going?” he hissed at her, also rising from his seat.

“I’m leaving.” she replied haughtily, and Matthias scowled in her reply. He charged at her within just a few long strides and grabbed her tightly by the wrists, making her cry out in pain as he pulled her closer to him.

She squirmed in his grasps as he trapped her within her arms. She was spewing profanities, but Matthias only ignored her in favor of relishing the feel of her body writhing against his. Eventually, she grew tired and leaned against him without further resistance.

He repositioned her in his arms, pressing her back flush to his chest as he buried his face on the nape of her neck. Instinctively, she leaned further to the side, granting him easy access as he greedily breathed in her soft, sweet scent. A fragrance he’d known to only belong to her.

He licked a strip up her neck, making Leyla hiss at the sudden contact. She could feel her pulse throbbing erratically as he continued with his ministrations. He proceeded to taste her skin, licking away the sheen of sweat that formed on her neck.

Her body shook and shuddered as his warm breath hit her. She couldn’t avoid him any longer. Heat was pooling in her gut, her blood rushing to warm her cheeks, spreading to her ears as her clothes rustled as he gripped onto them, hiking the hem of her blouse up before his hand sneaked right into it.

Leyla let out a breathy moan, throwing her head back unconsciously to allow him more access when her eyes caught sight of the night outside the window. Not for the first time she wondered how late the night had gotten.


His calloused palms moved all over her stomach, kneading them in that familiar manner, before they trailed up, cupping her bountiful breasts, and began to massage them roughly. She whined as he continued to fondle her, her eyes opening and looked down to watch him groping her breasts.

It was a strange view to her, but so erotic in her drunken haze. She leaned her head back, eyes shutting as she basked in the sensation of his warm palms on her chest, his moist lips nibbling on her earlobes, his ragged breathing beside her ears.

She vaguely remembered wishing it would all be over soon, but was snuffed out rather quickly by the flooding sensations around her. The music was still playing, still grating at her ears as Matthias thoroughly ravished her with his wandering hands and suckling lips.

How she wanted to believe that her enjoyment of this was all because she was drunk. Her sanity slowly faded when his tongue was dancing gracefully on her body in a lustful waltz.

“Mu-music,” she gasped as he suckled on her neck, “T-turn it off!” she stuttered, wincing when the waltz played a sharp tune, “My head hurts!” she hissed at him. But Matthias only sunk down, grabbing her by her small waist before he hefted her skirt up.

He mouthed at her thighs, turning her to face him, before he looked up with sultry eyes.

“The music is so beautiful, Leyla.” he murmured against her skin, bunching her skirt up to her hips, “It’s your fault for drinking too much tonight.” and how could Leyla refute that fact? She could only grow angry at herself for letting herself go.

He nosed against her clothed nether region, sucking against her sensitive nub. She threw her head back as the rough fabric rubbed against it, his warm tongue making her feel wet. Two warm and gentle fingers sneaked past the borders of her underwear, swiftly burying themselves to the hilt, making squelching sounds as they thrusted into her wetness.

Leyla cried out, half in pleasure and half in shame, hazily pushing his hand out of her, but he was persistent, her legs buckling into his fingers as he curled them inside her, rubbing inside her with practiced ease.

She brought her hands up to muffle her wanton sounds, but Matthias immediately grabbed them, pulling them away, encouraging her to make more sounds. Even the music couldn’t drown out the way she let out breathy moans, gasping whenever he’d rub against her sensitive nub.

Her body convulsed, struggling to hold herself up on the table. Eventually, Matthias pulled his fingers out, leaving her with a bereft feeling of emptiness as she whined in protest. He cupped her cheek, smearing her face with her juices…

“You said you can live well without me,” he whispered against her lips, “Yet you spread your legs so eagerly for me.” He wiped her juices against her cheeks, making her sober up slightly as she tried to pull away from him, “Feel how wet you are for me, Leyla.” Leyla only shot him a glare…


“Since you were so gracious as to give me what I want, let me give you what you truly desire.” he teased her, carrying her to the closest sofa, easily trapping her beneath him. Leyla glared up at him.

“What I desire is to be away from you!”

“You don’t really mean that, do you?” he murmured, deft fingers swiftly unbuttoning her one by one, the fire slowly returning to Leyla’s eyes, mirroring the shame and anger she was currently feeling.

“If you were just going to sleep with me eventually, you should have started earlier!”

“Ah, but where’s the fun in that?” he asked her, and Leyla couldn’t help but scold herself for being so foolish as to hope he called for her to terminate their arrangement. He pulled her blouse off, tossing it to the sides, before he moved to undress her skirt…

“After all, I want to see your distressed face.” he admitted, carefully removing her glasses and setting them aside. He leaned down, spreading short kisses on her cheeks, showering her with them in every crevice he could reach. Their intimate kisses looked similar to birds rubbing their beaks against one another. “After all, that’s what I most desire from you.” he whispered against her ear.

Leyla couldn’t help the choked up sob that managed to escape her. She watched helplessly as his grin grew wider at the sight of her tears, and all she could feel in the end was the stabbing pain in her heart as she once again gave in to him so easily.


Chapter 74.


I’ll Pick You Up.



Leyla vaguely remembered the rest of the events as she lay exhausted on the bed, all she knew was that they had been in the reception room when it started, and now they were back in the bedroom.

Her breathing was ragged as she tried her best to catch more air. She didn’t know what they were doing now, but she was vaguely aware that right now her wrists were bound together above her head. She hardly had any strength left in her to participate further in their activity, but she had enough left to shoot glares at the duke.

Matthias on the other hand, only gave her a lethargic grin as he pulled tight the knot on his tie. Leyla gasped as she felt her bounds tighten, making her arch her back in a feeble attempt to get some blood circulation in her hands.

“Un-untie me this instant!” she hissed, struggling to loosen up the tie. Matthias only hummed, hovering over her as he ran his fingers through her golden locks.

“Shh, hold still, Leyla,” he whispered next to her ear, “Try to keep still for me.” he murmured, breathing in the scent of her mixing with that musky scent of sex. He straightened up once more, one hand hefting her up the pillows as the other adjusted her wrists to a more comfortable position. “Keep struggling and the knots will go tighter around you.”

Matthias got up from the bed, fetching the blanket that made its way to the floor, draping it all over her naked body, when she twisted away from him, causing it to fall once more on the floor. He frowned momentarily, before deciding that the warmth from the fireplace would be sufficient enough to keep Leyla warm on his bed, and thus smiled to himself in satisfaction.

He climbed back on the bed, situating himself beside her, brushing back the locks that stuck to her face. She kept glaring up at him defiantly, and knew he wouldn’t be able to get her to willingly take a bath with him. Which was a shame because he really wanted to bathe with her. But he had expected she wouldn’t stay inebriated for long, the alcohol’s effect having burned through her system by their strenuous activity.

Eventually, he stood up once more, and headed straight for his bathroom. He was confident Leyla wouldn’t be able to leave before he was through with her.


He took his sweet time in savoring the hot water running down his skin, lathering his body up with soap as the water pelted his skin continuously. He then got out and dried himself off, before heading back to bed, where he found Leyla dropping off to sleep as she let herself rest against the soft sheets beneath her. Though his eyes narrowed when he saw the pillow he propped her back against had joined the blanket on the floor.

With a sigh he came closer to her, swinging the towel over his shoulder as he loosened up the tie around her wrists, revealing reddened skin underneath, making him sigh in disappointment at her continued resistance.

“I told you to keep still.” he admonished her. Through her sleep addled brain, Leyla only glared in response.



“Why would I take the advice of a crazy person?” she asked him incredulously, as Matthias proceeded to rub smoothing circles around her sore wrists. She felt disgusted by his touch, but she couldn’t find it in herself to pull away from the delicate way he was touching her.

Matthias repositioned her, hooking his arms underneath her back and under the knees. Leyla let herself surrender to his whims, closing her eyes in defense as she felt her body was no longer in her control.

Once she was positioned in the middle of the bed, Matthias grabbed the wet cloth he had prepared beforehand at the bedside table and began using it to wipe the dried body fluids and sweat off of her.

Leyla could feel the warm, moist roughness of towel scrubbing her all over. His hands trailed from her face, down to her chest, through the valley between her breasts, and then further downward past her lower abdomen.

As much as she wanted to continue lying on the bed, and drift off to sleep, she fought to open her eyes to watch Matthias.

He looked so calm as he was wiping her clean, but Leyla could see in his eyes how numb he was currently. He looked so different from when he had been busy thrusting into her a while ago. His hands were different before too. Gone was the lust he had when he’d wrapped himself around her, which further embarrassed Leyla deep inside.

Every time she thought she knew him, he’d break character all of a sudden, confusing her as to who he really was. It was like he had a switch in his mind, letting him act differently from time to time, a switch he could control when he wanted to.

Her eyes drifted close once more as her breathing calmed down to a gentle rhythm once more. Matthias’ eyes drifted towards her, thinking to himself how much she resembled a marble sculpture with how pale she was.


Matthias could see a trail of goosebumps up her arms and he pulled away, setting the wetted cloth down on the basin. He immediately took his robe off, draping in on top of her body. He then climbed behind her, pulling Leyla flush to his body, making her turn towards him in surprise.

He thought she would squirm once more, but after holding her gaze, she eventually gave in, and let him pull her closer to him. He held her in his arms, watching, and waiting for the time her breathing evened out to soft, gentle breaths.

Thinking her asleep, he pulled away from her, before taking a spot once more on his desk and reviewed the remaining documents for the rest of the evening. He had been at it for a while, when Leyla spoke up once more.

“I hate you.”

she hissed softly towards him, her voice just above a whisper, but he could hear her words clearly as though she was shouting it right next to his ear. Matthias set the papers down, staring at the woman in his bed. Eventually, he got up and went back to his previous spot, gathering her in his arms once again.

Drops of water from his hair tips cascaded down on to her pale cheeks as he stared her down. Her lips quivered as he continued to hold her gently.

“I really… hate you… so much!” she gritted teeth as she tried to stifle her tears. Matthias began to rub circles against the small of her back, while wiping the drops of water off with his free hand.



Leyla never felt so much hate for one person until recently. She never hated anyone before.

Not the mother who abandoned her, nor the relatives who beat and abused her. Not even Mrs. Etman, who made it her life’s goal to remind Leyla just how insignificant she was. Yes, she held and let go of her hate of them because holding it in her heart only felt like lead…

It kept weighing her down, and would soon poison her.

Because all her life, she wanted to live as free as a bird. And she worked hard to forgive them for what they did to her, but with Matthias, she found it very difficult to forgive him for the hurt he put her through. She can’t help but hate him to her core.

And suddenly, she wasn’t so confident in living that proud and free life she once dreamed of. Her hatred of him weighed heavier than just a fist-full of lead. He felt like a boulder propped over her shoulders, and she feared she would hate him for the rest of her life…

And she wasn’t willing to let go so easily.

‘I hate you. I hate you! I HATE YOU!’ She repeated like a mantra all over in her head, until she finally succumbed to sleep.


Matthias, unaware of her hateful thoughts, only smiled down at her sleeping form, finally satisfied she was fully asleep. With a sigh, he got up from the bed, grabbed the documents and his pen as he went back to bed, opting to work on the bed instead of his usual desk.

He regathered Leyla in his arms once again, who seemed to snuggle instinctively closer to his warm body. Matthias couldn’t help but think that if Leyla wanted to continue living well, she need only stop wanting to live far from him.

The reminder of how badly she wanted to be free of him left a sour taste in his mouth before he let out a dejected huff. His arms unconsciously tightened around her, and Leyla continued to rest snuggly against him.

He had a myriad of things he wanted to give his beautiful mistress, things like a suitable house for her to comfortably live in, an opportunity to study in her dream university. He could even give her the life she dreamed about as she studied her favorite birds.

All these were things he, Matthias von Herhardt, could give her and not that poor excuse of a doctor’s son!

‘And yet you continue to think you could live well without me?’ he couldn’t help but scoff at the thought. He gazed down at her, caressing her parted lips as she breathed in and out, softly snoring against him.

These were the lips that slandered him, and yet despite the cold words she spewed at him, they remained warm and tender against the pad of his thumb.

But Matthias had work remaining, and thus reluctantly pulled away, immersing himself back in the word of documents and business. Just having her near him, her smooth, rhythmic breathing as music, was enough for now.

He found a different kind of contentment at feeling her warmth next to him, the way her scent flooded his nose. She was absolutely perfect for him, and he loved it! He knew by now, his desire for her would not wane easily.

Finally, he got through the last of the documents, and set it on top of the growing pile by the bedside table next to him. When he glanced up, he caught sight of the snow, flickering against the dark as it fell against the windows.

He took a trip down memory lane, his thoughts leading him back to when he first saw the snow this year. It was just after the first half of the charity ball, right when Leyla’s chaotic play had just ended. They stood close by the frozen river, as the landscape began to be blanketed by white frost.

And Leyla stood, so angelically in front of him beneath a lighted street lamp, haloing her golden locks. He remembered how she looked up in awe as she witnessed the first snow of the season too. The way


her lips curved up sweetly at the sight of it falling gently on her face, kissing her skin the way he wanted to.

“Leyla,” he whispered out in longing. There was a certain stillness in the air, much like it did that first snow, but Leyla’s tossing and turning eventually broke the placid atmosphere between them. The blanket slowly slid down her shoulders, revealing her naked torso as it pooled on her waist.

He couldn’t help but think of how prettily she’d smile this time around too if she were awake to witness the snow fall once more.

He couldn’t find it in himself to wake her up, and ended up caressing her cheeks instead. Leyla nuzzled into his warm hand, sighing contentedly. Such small gesture, yet it filled Matthias with a different sense of satisfaction as he saw her willingly lean into him.

He opted to stay still, deciding not to do anything about his robe sliding off her. She trembled as the cold began to seep into her body, seeking the warmest source she could find; which was him of course, and buried herself further into his embrace.

Matthias breath hitched as she moved, not daring to make a move in fear of rousing her from her listless sleep. He could feel something blooming in his chest, something far different, yet closely the same from the lust he’d grown accustomed to around her.

It was a flutter, something fragile and miniscule. Much like a snowflake falling down from the skies, resting beautifully as it sticks against the window’s glass.

He quickly, yet gently wrapped both his arms around her as her body shivered, giving her more warmth as he pulled her impossibly closer. He ran a soothing palm up and down her back, rubbing some much needed warmth as she burrowed further into him in response.

He could only lie awake next to her, holding her as though he was afraid she’d pull away, and leaned into the plush cushion behind him, gently bringing her along with him. His eyes stared out at the swirling snowflakes, watching as they swayed with the wind and felt his eyes grow heavy by the second…

He leaned down, planting a ghost of a kiss on each of Leyla’s shut eyelids, while his heart echoed her name over and over like a velvety mellow tune.

Leyla….

Leyla….

My Leyla….




There was a screeching in the station, and the sound of pressure being relieved as the night train entered the Carlsbar Central Station. It was just before the breaking of dawn, the day’s winter sun not yet up in the skies.

There was a certain muteness in the air as people hurriedly rushed out of the train, equipped with their belongings as they huddled in on themselves, wearing fatigue in their expressions as they rubbed the sleep from their eyes. The platform grew more lively as more and more people piled out, while the sparse people that already were in the station met to greet their returning loved ones.

Amongst the passengers was Kyle Etman, right in the middle of the bustling crowd. He had come without any notice he was arriving, and thus had no one to greet him. Even Mr. and Mrs. Etman was unaware of his plans of returning instead of traveling to the southern countries of the continent.

He still received no reply from Leyla, even after his last heartfelt letter to her. He poured all his heart and soul into every word, and so when he received no letters from her in response, his initial thought was it was time to give up.

Which was why he had accepted his father’s suggestion of traveling south. And yet, he changed his mind at the last minute, changing his tickets to take him back home instead of further away.

Kyle didn’t know why he wanted to return at first, but the moment he caught sight of them entering Ratz’s borders, something clicked inside him, making everything make sense.

He knew now why he wanted to return.

He knew where he wanted to go.

There was a sense of foreboding building in him as he grew closer and closer to home. It wasn’t like Leyla to reject him without a proper goodbye. He knew her that much at least, and so he worried something must have happened to her.

It might just be his desperation blowing everything out of proportion, and maybe she was just fine, but he needed to see her.

He wanted to see her.

As the crowd slowly died down around him, Kyle found himself moving once more, hauling his enormous trunk behind him as he walked out of the station alone with a determined look in his eye.

As he stepped out of the station, he was met with the sight of his hometown covered in snow, everywhere he looked, he could see blankets of white surrounding him. Snow continued to fall, piling on his shoulders the longer he stood still, dancing around him.

He was a different man from when he left. He’d grown over the time he parted with Leyla.

“Leyla…” he whispered like a prayer, her name flowing desperately out of him as wisps of white puffs flitted around him.


Just the thought of her gave a twisted feeling over his heart, a trepidation washing over him at the thought of seeing her for the first time since they broke it off. His knuckles turned white, as his grip on his trunk tightened.

[ I will love and cherish you for as long as you will allow it. I swear that no harm shall come to you again, whether by another’s hand or mine.]

Those were his words for her. A sincere confession as he wrote out to her, hoping his words would reach her heart as well. He swore if Leyla even gave an inch of a chance, he’d take it as a mile, giving her everything he’d ever promised.

[I’ll come to you at once! We can leave Arvis together, and find our happy place in this world!]

With that final thought, he found the strength to move forward once more and braved the frosty path on the way to his happiness.


Chapter 75.



Right Choice.



Matthias was awoken by the sound of his canary’s song. His eyes fluttered open, wincing at the bright light before it landed on the sight of his bird, merrily fluttering inside it’s elaborate cage as it sang merrily.

It seemed to be happy today, Matthias noted to himself, and continued watching it for sometime, content on laying on his stomach for the time being. It flew down, landing by its water bowl, dipping it’s beak on to the water slightly, before dipping down once more, submerging and reemerging it’s entire body this time.

It shook as it perched back on the bowl’s ledge, scattering rivlets of water. Matthias felt himself smirk, sitting up before leaning his back against the headboard. Once it was done bathing itself, the canary began to groom itself, spreading its little wings, nosing at its feathers with its beak.

He can’t help but be reminded of his woman.

Soon, the bird was done, and fluttered back up to its flush nest, when Matthias decided it was time for him to get up. He picked up the bell from his bedside table, ringing it to summon Hessen inside.

Not a moment later, his butler came in, carrying a silver tray with coffee, and the day’s mail. Matthias sat on his desk, waiting for Hessen to finish setting the coffee down. The butler then proceeded to inform him of the progress in their preparations for the crown prince’s visit with his wife, along with the list of guests they expect to host.

“I was also informed that Lady Brandt would be arriving this afternoon, master.” Hessen added, the empty tray tucked neatly at his side. Matthias took a sip of his coffee, nodding along with the new piece of information.

“I see,” he hummed.

“Also, the Marquis Lindman sent word he’d arrive no sooner than tomorrow afternoon. Since I know the master would be absent in the next few days, I took the initiative of informing both families in advance that you’d be unable to greet them personally.” Hessen helpfully supplied.


Matthias gave him an appreciative smile to be polite as he opened up the morning’s newspaper. Him, the crown prince, and even Riette were of the same age, Matthias idly thought, it wouldn’t be strange to know that they were closer compared to the other dukes and lords in the country.

Subsequently, Claudine was also one of the few ladies who grew close with the crowned princess. Which also meant she would be spending more time in Arvis during the royal couple’s visit.



“Master, shall I start preparing for your departure? If you leave around ten o’ clock, you’ll be on time to board your train.” Hessen suggested, and Matthias nodded.

“We shall,” Matthias replied, giving him another polite smile. Hessen bowed his head respectfully at his master, backing out a few steps before moving aside to let Matthias walk ahead of him.

With the crowned prince’s upcoming visit, Matthias would have to quickly settle his business affairs in the capital city, which in turn made his schedule all the more hectic before the royal couple’s arrival.

After bathing, Matthias was quickly aided by Hessen, and was suited up promptly as he continued on with his usual calm demeanor.

News of Kyle Etman’s return spread like wildfire in Arvis, reaching him in less than a day of the doctor’s son’s arrival. It wasn’t even through a formal relaying of information, but through the murmurs of his servants he discovered Kyle had returned.

He couldn’t help but scoff to himself at the thought, Kyle’s return leaving a nasty taste in him. He didn’t know, nor cared why Kyle chose to return to Arvis now. It didn’t bother him even if Kyle and Leyla had lingering feelings for one another.

After all, Leyla was undeniably his already. And it was because of that, he knew Leyla would never accept Kyle back, even if he groveled and poured his heart out to his mistress. He was confident in leaving Leyla behind.

Just as the last of his buttons clicked to a close, Matthias’ mouth curled upwards in a subtle smirk. Hessen assisted him in buttoning up his sleeves, pinning an elaborate cufflink on them, making him look all the more regal.

As for Leyla, well, he did admire her chivalrous morals, no matter how foolish they were in his opinion.

Which was why he trusted that having laid claim on her was the wisest action he could take.

And so as he left his room, he reached a single conclusion. There was no further need for him to think about Kyle Etman, in fact, he would sooner wipe his existence off his mind, and planned to enjoy the rest of his trip away.




There was an onslaught of conversation amongst the servants in Arvis as they gathered around the reception room. Despite the hectic schedule they incurred from the royal couple’s pending visit, they couldn’t help but dilly-dally as they gossiped about Kyle and Leyla’s reunion.

“But is it really because of Leyla?”

“Do you think they’re together again?”

“Surely there must be another reason he’s back in Arvis.”



“I heard he was supposed to be traveling the southern continent.”

“So it really must be Leyla! Oh I knew they wouldn’t split so easily!”

“Yes, especially since they’ve been together so long! They got along splendidly since their childhood after all.”

“Ah, what a match-made in heaven!”

There were more swooning and sighing as they all fantasized about what would happen between the past lovebirds. Most were gunning for the fact they’d be back together as soon as they saw one another again.

After all, they’ve watched both of them grow, and seen how the two grew closer through many years. At this point it wasn’t just a simple gossip, but well-wishes and hopeful thinking among the servants.

“Hmm, perhaps it’s time I visit Leyla once more later.” Mrs. Mona, one of the kitchen’s chefs, said to herself softly as she stirred a simmering soup. Her ability to cook was only rivaled by her ability to sniff out a gossip or two and spread it, she should hardly be behind the news!

Yes, with Mr. Remmer not home, it was only expected she’d be a little worried for Leyla, and how she’s faring on her own. Perhaps she should bring along some food as well for the girl.

“Yes, it’ll also give me a piece of mind to see her with my own eyes.” she further hummed to herself, and began to continue her chores for the day.



Leyla spent the rest of her day in her cabin, doing nothing and staring into space. The sky grew darker, but Leyla couldn’t find it in herself to continue being productive as the sun began to sink in the clouds.

“Leyla!” a familiar voice called out for her, suddenly breaking the silence. Leyla jolted in surprise, and blinked back into focus, “Leyla are you home?!”

It was Mrs. Mona. She was right in front of their yard, bellowing out her name.


“Y-yes I am, Mrs. Mona!” she hastily replied. Leyla hurriedly fixed her appearance, before swinging open the door to greet her nosy neighbor. Mrs. Mona beamed at the sight of her, and they exchanged pleasantries before Leyla invited her inside.

“Oh thank you dear!”

“Shall I get you some tea?”

“Oh that would be lovely, thank you.” Leyla nodded, letting Mrs. Mona sit by one of the kitchen stools as she busied herself in heating water for some tea. Just as she finished, Mrs. Mona began to speak up.

“Are you alright dear? You look rather pale.” she worried as she carefully looked over Leyla’s general appearance. Leyla only laughed embarrassingly, nodding in a placating manner.

“I’m just alright Mrs. Mona.” she replied, smiling politely at her, but Mrs. Mona hardly looked convinced. “I just haven’t been sleeping well.” she added, knowing she had to give Mrs. Mona a little something to leave her be. It was just in her neighbor’s nature to meddle in things after all.

“Couldn’t sleep?” Mrs. Mona frowned, “Ah, have you been up studying again? While it’s good to learn, it’s also good to know when to rest.” she gently admonished, sounding so sure she was right.

Leyla felt no need to correct her.

“Ah, yes, I brought you some cake!” Mrs. Mona announced, and made to prepare some slices from them. Leyla got up along with her, and began to fix both of them with some tea when the kettle began to whistle.

Mrs. Mona cut the cake into equal slices, bringing out two plates and forks as she set one slice on them a piece, and placed them beside their cups of brewed tea.

“You should really learn to take better care of yourself Leyla, just think of how terrible Mr. Remmer would feel if he finds you neglecting yourself.” she continued to admonish her. “By the way, when will he be returning?”

“Ah, I just had a word from him saying he won’t be back in fifteen days.”

“Oh well, I guess that makes sense,” Mrs. Mona hummed, taking a dainty sip of her tea, before setting it back down, “It must be difficult for him to find all those rare and precious plants in need of replacing. Still, it was so kind for the duke to have dropped the charges, and let him work in Arvis again.” she praised.

“Y-yes…” Leyla smiled stiffly, “How kind indeed.”

“He truly is one of a kind you know,” Mrs. Mona proceeded, completely oblivious to the discomfort of Leyla, “If it were any other aristocrat, they would have left Mr. Remmer to rot in jail!”


Leyla opted to take a bite out of the cake instead, not wanting to contribute such false praise for the duke. The cake tasted like nothing in her mouth as she continued to listen to Mrs. Mona speak.

And so Mrs. Mona spoke, with Leyla occasionally making agreeing sounds and hums as though she was listening attentively to her. She mentioned something about the crowned prince and his wife arriving sometime next week, and the grand party Arvis would be celebrating in their honor!

It was really a life of luxury that Leyla hardly knew anything, nor cared about.

“Oh yes,” Mrs. Mona paused, clearing her throat as she looked nervously over Leyla, “Did you hear about Kyle? He’s just returned to Arvis.”

“Ah,” Leyla piped up softly, feeling a little more at ease with the change of subject, “Yes, I did hear about that.” she replied, smiling at Mrs. Mona, yet it did not reach her eyes.

“Well, I suppose that is a given, what with the whole place talking about it!” Mrs. Mona chuckled nervously, drumming her fingers against her cooled cup of tea, “Have you had the chance to welcome him back?” she asked curiously, finally getting to the point of her current visit.

“No, not yet.” Leyla answered with an air of finality, but Mrs. Mona wasn’t known as a nosy person because she respected boundaries…

“Well, personally, if I were you, I’d have eloped with Kyle by now.” Mrs. Mona carelessly remarked, and Leyla stared at her with a foreign look on her face. “Sure Mrs. Etman will be humiliated if that were to happen, but it’s clear the boy can’t be without you, so wouldn’t it be in both of your best interests to just run away from here?”

Leyla pressed her lips into a thin line before giving her another stiffened smile.

“Mrs. Mona, Kyle and I no longer have that kind of relationship.” she calmly reminded, but Mrs. Mona only scoffed.

“Of course I know that! But my point is, that he most likely returned here for you. The least you could do is actually consider still being with him.” she insisted, “If it were any other man I would be advising against it, but…” she trailed off, looking at Leyla who was intently staring at her own cup of cold tea.

Mrs. Mona reached out, and grasped her hand, squeezing it in a comforting manner.

“It’s Kyle, Leyla, and we both know that Kyle is different from the rest of the men in this world.” It was the best she could do, because how could she really describe Kyle? He just is, wholly himself, and that was his best description.

Mrs. Mona finally let her hand go, but still did not move to leave her alone.

“Anyway, I’ve talked it over with Mr. Remmer before,” she continued, “I asked him whether it was the right thing to do, both of you breaking up the way you did.”


Leyla wanted to move on from this topic already, but Mrs. Mona was relentless. And so she resolved to just sit across from her in silence, plastering a fake smile on her face. After all, she had nothing more to say in this matter.

She’s made her bed, and she’d lie in it.

She’d broken it off with Kyle, and now he’s returned for her, or so everyone says. She suspects it has an ounce of truth, after all, she’s read his letters. But how could she just go back to the way they were?

Even if she wanted to, there was no way she would ever drag Kyle into the mess she found herself in. She had already agreed to be the Duke’s mistress. And there was no place for a woman like her on Kyle’s side.

There was a sudden pang in her heart as though it was being ripped apart in two! Her fists clenched in her lap, hidden from Mrs. Mona’s view, as it’s knuckles turned white. It wasn’t long before the growing pain in her heart was replaced by her deep hatred in one Matthias von Herhardt.

“Oh silly me, look at the time!” Mrs. Mona gasped in surprise, “All I did was talk and talk and talk, I’m so sorry.” she apologized, “Well, I better be going now.”

Both women stood up as Leyla escorted Mrs. Mona out the cabin, thanking her for both her visit and the cake. Suddenly Mrs. Mona paused, and turned back towards her once more.

“Oh I almost forgot, I heard Lady Brandt would be coming, so everything’s just getting busier by the second!” she sighed in complaint, “Anyway, she’s going to be staying in Arvis this entire time, just until the crowned prince and his wife leaves.”

She proceeded to complain how she couldn’t see the relationship between the Duke and Lady Brandy working out long-term, if the way they kept delaying their wedding was of any indication.

Leyla only politely nodded along, waiting for her to finally leave. With one last goodbye, Mrs. Mona finally walked away, leaving Leyla alone in the frosty white forest, and silence enveloped her once again.

There was a strange sensation coming over her at the mention of Claudine. It made her throat feel dry, as she struggled to keep her calm composure. And so, she numbly went back inside her cabin, and tried to finish the cake she had begun eating.

Truthfully, she had no appetite, but she hadn’t been eating enough either. She didn’t want to worry her uncle by the time he arrived back home, he’d be so exhausted by then. She couldn’t, mustn’t add up to his worries.

Oh how she really loathed that man. Who did he think he was?! Making her lose her faculties at the mere thought of him?!

She swallowed down the rest of the cake, washing it down her throat with the cold tea, before piling more of the food Mrs. Mona brought onto her plate.


She just kept eating, and drinking; one bite, swallow, drink and then repeat until all that’s left was an empty plate. Memories of how the duke insulted how skinny she was made feelings of shame and humiliation resurface.

She’d bear it anyway. She wanted to live a normal life after this, and she’d make sure of it. She needed only to endure for a little while.

She washed the dishes, did her chores, and then continued to read her book, slowly clearing her mind of all the negativity piling over her in the last few weeks.

On the bright side, the Duke was going away, leaving for the capital and wouldn’t be back until the weekend. It gave Leyla some room to breathe, though she was disappointed the only reason she was given such freedom was because he wouldn’t be around.

‘When will this nightmare end?’ she wondered. She snapped her book shut, and looked around. All she could see was nothing but loneliness…

She couldn’t help but feel as though the walls were closing in on her. Her breathing grew ragged, and echoes of flesh slapping and guttural moans circled in her mind…

She could feel Matthias’ hands all over her..,

She needed to get away! She couldn’t stand it anymore!

Hurriedly, she ran out of her cabin, grabbing the bare minimum to keep herself warm in the chilled weather. She grabbed her bicycle and began to pedal, aiming for nowhere, just as far away from the confines of her mind’s prison!

She sped through the streets, before pausing in front of the library. Thankfully she had the foresight to bring some books and other necessities, and went in to return them. Her next stop was by the grocery store, and went on to buy things she needed for cleaning like powdered soap and brushes.

She even made time to stop at a nearby cafe to drink some sweet hot chocolate, feeling the warmth seeping back into her body. She breathed in the cold winter air, smiling softly to herself as she began to relax…

Up until she met the eyes of the one person she wanted to avoid most, next to the Duke.

“Leyla…” his warm voice breathed out her name. It sounded so good to hear, yet equally mortifying as well.

Everything seemed to stand still as Leyla stared at him in shock and the world deafened to a silence around her. It was really him…

Right in front of her, stood no one else but Kyle Etman himself, who was smiling beaming brightly at her.


Chapter 76.




No Way Back.




For a moment, none of them said anything. Kyle was too happy to see her in front of him after a long time, while Leyla was too shocked and torn about how she should feel being confronted by him.

“I heard about what happened with Uncle Bill.” Kyle finally spoke, breaking the tense silence between them. Leyla gulped, and nodded hesitantly…

“I see.” she replied softly before averting her gaze back down on the table she sat at. Kyle stared at her for a moment, awkwardly standing in the cafe, before he took the seat across from her. He noticed how Leyla tried to subtly look away from him, but he knew her too well.

“I’m sorry.” he continued, finally managing to get her to look at him. Leyla stared at him inquiringly, asking what he was apologizing for behind the rim of her glasses. Somehow the sight of her looking like that gave him a sense of familiarity he didn’t know he missed so much in his time away.

“I should have been here sooner, perhaps I could have helped ease some of your burdens.” he elaborated, rubbing his palms on his lap in a nervous tic, “I didn’t know what had happened until recently, and like an idiot I just kept sending you letters, probably irritating you with how many they were.” he awkwardly laughed at himself, but Leyla could hardly manage a smile.

“It was no fault of yours Kyle, nor anyone.” Leyla pointed out to him, “Besides, I wouldn’t expect you to know what had happened since it wasn’t anything to do with you. It was mine and uncle’s problem after all.” she told him resolutely, “Besides, it’s all resolved now. So there’s no further need for you to worry.”

Kyle nodded mutely, nodding along as he wetted his lips, another nervous tic of his.

“So… so everything’s good now? You and Uncle Bill are fine?”

“Yes,” she smiled minutely, “In fact he’s working on restoring the greenhouse again, he’s been very ecstatic.” she tried to say, but she knew her uncle was also having a hard time repaying a debt that was already paid.

Leyla pulled on the sleeves of her sweater, eyes looking back down as she once more avoided his gaze.

Kyle observed her for a while, noting how sickly she looked right now. She wasn’t like this when he left.



“You can always ask me for help Leyla,” he softly reminded her, “I’d do everything I can to help you, I hope you know that.”

Leyla’s jaw clenched as she listened to him.

“Why do you keep saying that?” she asked, coming out harshly than she intended. Her eyes held a certain contempt as she stared back at him. Kyle only held her gaze.

“Because I know you’re not doing well Leyla.” he answered plainly. Leyla took some deep breaths as she tried to calm herself down. “You forget I know you Leyla,” he explained, “Just because we’re no longer together, doesn’t mean I care any less for you.”

Now that he’d seen her, he’s more assured now that something did, or was happening with Leyla. Every minute he’s spent with her today was proof she was acting less and less like how she was.

Leyla grew up in an unideal environment, but when she met Bill, the old gardener had showered her with the best love he could give. Though sometimes, he will fall short in identifying the subtlest of hints when it comes to Leyla’s thoughts and feelings. And Kyle knew that no matter how tired or hurt she was, her pride would never allow herself to seek out help.

The moment Kyle had gotten to know Leyla, how she really was, he’d formed the habit of looking out for these subtle hints. Anything that would help him understand Leyla better since they were children. But it didn’t mean he knew everything about her. After all, Leyla also got better over time hiding her feelings from everyone around her.

It didn’t mean his efforts were entirely in vain though, because he could sense something was wrong. He just couldn’t tell what it was.

“So why haven’t you been replying to my letters?” he finally asked, moving onto what he hoped was an easier question to answer for her. Leyla held her chin higher, even though she still refused to look directly at him.

“People change Kyle,” she said, “I didn’t know how to reply to your letters.”

“Yes, but why?” he insisted. “This isn’t like you!” Leyla only sighed out and shook her head.

“I just didn’t want to.” she said with an air of finality, “And just because it isn’t like me from before doesn’t mean I can’t be like that now. I’ve changed, Kyle, it’s time to accept that.”

“So that’s it?” Kyle asked with disbelief, “You’ve changed this much in such a short time?”

Silence reigned between them once more, before Leyla finally replied.

“It felt so much longer for me,” she admitted, “So I’m telling you now, we can never go back to how we were before.” She then moved to leave the cafe, finally done with this conversation.




“Leyla!” Kyle called out desperately, but she whirled around in anger, as she looked back at him.


“I didn’t answer you Kyle!” she exclaimed, “That should have been enough of an answer to you as to how I really feel. We’re done. Don’t expect anything from me anymore because I’m through with it, and I don’t want to go back.” she finished in a calmer voice.

She didn’t want to, but she had to do this.

“I just don’t feel the same as you anymore Kyle, our time apart has proven that to me.” she finally said, “Even if your mother were to miraculously agree to our union, I don’t want to. Not anymore. In fact, I can’t even bear the thought of moving away and marrying anyone.”

Every word was like a knife to his heart, and Leyla just kept adding to it.

“I kept quiet because I wanted you to hold on to the beautiful times we’ve had together, but you forced my hand here.” Leyla continued, “I loathe you, Kyle.”

Kyle shook his head in denial as he stared up at her, while only Leyla nodded to affirm her words to him.

“N-no, y-you don’t mean that…”

“I do. And that’s my only answer to you.” she finished, “So please, let this be the last time we see each other again. I don’t want to hear about your feelings for me, I don’t want to hear other people wishing we’re back together because I’m sick of it all!” she sighed desperately. “Give me peace Kyle.” she pleaded.

Kyle sat there stupefied. What had started out like a dream reunion ended up in a nightmare, only it wasn’t a nightmare. It was real. When he couldn’t form a reply, Leyla busied herself into gathering her belongings, eager to get away from him.

She then turned and left, pushing open the cafe’s doors as it chimed open, knocking Kyle out of his reverie…

“No, Leyla, wait!” he called out, hastily packing up his own things as he rushed after her. He might have tripped a couple of times to catch up to her, but he’d just managed to hold onto her shoulder right before she mounted her bike…

And when she turned to look back at him, Kyle found himself looking at her red rimmed eyes. She looked as though she was ready to cry any second. And Kyle found himself speechless once more…

How could he force her right now? She looked as if she was about to fall into a million pieces if he even dared push through her walls. He couldn’t do that to her. He respected her too much for that. And so he kept his mouth shut, and allowed Leyla to push him away, slapping his touch off of her.

He stood there in the middle of the road, watching as she hastily ran away from him, and stayed in his spot long after she’d disappeared.

Something really was wrong, and she was suffering for it. No matter what it was, he’d do everything in his power to save her.

Even if it’s the last thing he would do.


When Riette came with Claudine to look at the on-going reconstruction of the greenhouse, he couldn’t help but let out a low whistle at the sight of it. He looked around in awe, absolutely gobsmacked at just how much work needed to be done.

“Wow, it really is such a big mess!” he exclaimed, letting out an amazed chuckle or two as he continued to look around. Claudine shot him an unamused glare, but he only disregarded it, already used to her disappointment.

“Sure laugh it up, it’s not like it wasn’t a tragic accident… oh wait,” Claudine hummed, eyeing him dryly. “It actually was. Look at that, I didn’t know you could be so heartless.”

“It’s not that I’m heartless,” Riette protested, “I’m just so amazed at how much damage had been done!” he exclaimed, waving his arms towards the whole greenhouse as though to emphasize the scale of it, “I mean, I never expected anything like this to ever happen in Arvis, to be honest.”

Truly the glaring difference from his last visit was prominent. The last time he’d been in the greenhouse, it had been such splendor, filled with the most exquisite plants, all arranged perfectly to showcase their beauty. It had been a paradise on earth.

But now it was in ruins, much like the aftermath of a war. The plants were dug up, soil was scattered all over the ground, and a large pile of debris was just off to the side while there was continuing hammering and chopping sounds all over.

“I still can’t believe Matthias dropped all the charges.” Riette commented, “I mean the damage is massive! And he let him return back to work!” he added offhandedly, “Ah, what prestige it must be to be one of the country’s most influential men.”

“Hmm, I’m not sure if it’s the prestige or the mistress’ influence.” Claudine whispered to him, taking great care to lower her voice in case of any eavesdropper. She bit her lip, if only to prevent more words spilling out of her.

Riette gasped from beside her quietly, looking at her in shock.

“I didn’t know the great Lady Brandt thought of it that way. Why do you say such things?” Riette asked her worriedly, and Claudine felt some of the tension leave her as she sighed out in resignation.

“Nothing, there wasn’t any reason Riette, I’m so sorry,” she apologized, “It was just a slip of the mind.” she backtracked, and Riette lightly held onto her elbow, and gently steered her to face him.


“Hey, it’s alright,” he placated, “There’s no need for you to apologize, okay?” he smiled down at her gently, before it turned into a roguish grin, “Besides, I think the jealous look quite suits you, my Lady.” he teased, and Claudine scoffed, barking out a short laugh as she turned away from him.

“Me? Jealous? As if!”

They exchanged a few more laughs before a comfortable silence settled between them as they continued to walk within the greenhouse. This was why she wanted to be here with Riette, the reason why she invited him over.

She knew he could comfort her like no one else. She could whine and complain endlessly in front of him, and he’d distract her with a joke or two, which was just what she needed. There was a comfort in Riette’s mischievousness.

They headed towards the small space just a few spaces away from the greenhouse where served tea was awaiting them. Already they could hear the boisterous laughter and loud chatter from the gathering family of the Herhardt house, despite its current head being away on business.

And just like that, a switch was slipped, and they were back to acting like the Duke’s fiance and his cousin respectively, and nothing more.

Over the course of the gathering, Claudine found herself looking over at Riette, locking gazes from time to time. He even winked at her once in a teasing way when he had been sure no one was paying attention to him. And not for the first time she wondered if she should have chosen him instead of the Duke.

However she quickly brushed the thought aside, having already reached the logical answer many times in her solitude. Her parents’ decision on making her pursue the life of a Duchess Herhardt was better than choosing the life of a Marquise Lindman.

With how fast the world changed around them, it was no secret the social class where aristocrats belonged suffered the worst when it came to change. The Brandt Household, one of the empire’s main sources of finance, knew that better than anyone. She might not have been trained officially because she was no son, but she was a natural when it came to such analysis.

Which was why she went with Matthias.

She had poured over her list of suitors, weighing each and everyone of the nobles she had the chance to be with, the Herhardt house was the one she knew for certain would survive no matter what challenge the times would throw at them. And as they creeped into a new era, Claudine wanted to be part of that story.

It may not end up in history books, but the house’s glory would forever be etched into society.

“I just hope the greenhouse could be fully restored in time for Claudine’s wedding.” a lady on the table remarked, effectively steering the rest of the conversation on the topic of their upcoming nuptials.


They had decided to hold the ceremony by next summer, and neither of them seemed to be changing their minds any time soon, with or without the greenhouse.

Claudine occasionally joined in on the conversation, looking down from time to time to appear meek and polite while she smiled brightly and politely to those addressing her. When she caught sight of Riette’s soft brown eyes smiling at her.

She couldn’t help the warm feeling she had at the sight of him. Even when they were children, she liked seeing Riette…

But she chose Matthias already, and she didn’t want to change her mind, not now. Not when she reached this far.

Indeed, there was no room for regrets now, Claudine thought to herself. She couldn’t, not when everything was exactly as how she planned her life would be. A life filled with success, paid in full price with her happiness.

The topic of her wedding soon shifted towards the possibility of Riette marrying. Claudine knew that he would be expected to find a lady, just like her. A woman that hailed from a good, respectable family that could contribute to the Lindman House.

She excused herself from their company, opting to head back into her assigned room. When asked why she had to go, she feigned having a slight headache, nothing a good rest wouldn’t fix in time for dinner.

Once she was back in the room, her lady-in-waiting went to fetch some medicine she didn’t really need.

Claudine only sat in front of the fireplace, watching as the fire slowly ate away the firewood.

Leyla Lewellin.

She knew that Leyla was held in high-esteem around their society. She was intelligent as she was beautiful. But no matter how respected she was, it didn’t change the fact she was born of a low-status family. It was only a matter of time before Leyla would leave the life of a mistress behind.

There was no way she would allow herself to be in such a relationship too long…

But Claudine couldn’t entirely disregard that small possibility that Leyla would choose to stay with Matthias.

She had no intention in actually confronting the girl. There was far too much on Leyla’s plate right now, and she wasn’t that thoughtless. She actually decided to keep quiet and act as though Matthias was sleeping around with Leyla behind her back.

Suddenly, her lady-in-waiting came in with the medicine, and Claudine schooled her posture into a more appropriate way for one suffering a headache. Unfortunately, her servant tripped and fell, spilling the tray of medicine, and shattering the glass of water she carried with her.


Claudine shrieked in surprise, hastily moving out of the way before rushing to her side, carefully avoiding the shards of glass.

“Are you alright?!” she asked worriedly to her lady-in-waiting. The girl only hastily got up, bowing apologetically at her.

“Yes, thank you my lady!” she sputtered, completely red in the face, “I’m so sorry for the mess!”

“Oh dear,” Claudine gasped when she saw the blood drip down her servant’s hand, “Oh my, your hand!”

“I-it’s just a small prick my lady!” the girl insisted, “See? It’s not a big… deal…” wincing when her hand revealed a shard embedded into her palm. Claudine winced at the sight. It looked as though the shard got it a little too deep to be just a small prick.

“Oh hush now,” Claudine said, quickly fetching some handkerchief to stifle the flowing blood, and gently cupping the girl’s hand in hers. “It’ll be quite difficult for you to keep working with such a wound, why don’t you take some time to recover?” she suggested, making the girl shake her head.

“Oh, no, my lady, truly I’m fine!”

“I insist you take some time off.” Claudine said, looking at her sternly, and the girl’s protests died down.

“Alright, Mary?” she called out, prompting for a response.

“O-of course, my lady.” Mary weakly agreed, letting Claudine smile at her agreement. She bowed deeply towards her lady, and moved to get her hand fixed, but stopped for a moment, looking back at Claudine hesitantly.

“But my lady-”

“I will be fine Mary,” Claudine insisted once more, “Come on, let’s find someone else to help you.”

Claudine led them through the halls of the mansion, finding a few servants to clean up the mess in her room, while some headed off to fetch a first aid kit. She watched as they moved around her. She then looked at Mary’s injured hand, being cleaned and wrapped neatly with a bandage.

Mary had been a servant from her own house. Her most favored one, in fact. It was why Mary had volunteered to come with her to Arvis, to continue to serve her lady. Mary had also been with her since she was a child, and Claudine enjoyed being around her so much mostly because of her quick wits and occasional stutter.

Satisfied Mary was being well-taken care of, Claudine headed towards the lobby, where the other ladies were chatting. Among them was Elysee von Herhardt. Upon seeing her, the Herhardt matriarch stood up to meet her.

“Oh Claudine! I heard about your maid. Oh how inconvenient.” she said, “It would be difficult for you these next few days then, how about I lend you one of my servants to assist you as your attendant in the whole duration of your stay, hm?” she suggested, and Claudine shook her head.


“Oh, thank you for the offer, but I can assure you I would be fine.” She replied, “Besides, you’ll need every hand you could get to help prepare for the crown prince and his wife’s arrival. I couldn’t possibly add to their workload.”

“Oh nonsense! Please, I insist you take one of my servants! Otherwise I would just be beside myself if you continue without an attendant.” Elysee insisted back, urging her to accept.

Claudine smiled brightly, a thought popping up in her head. She really shouldn’t…

But the nagging in the back of her mind grew louder, making her give in.

“Well then, how about I have Leyla as my attendant?” she brightly requested. And Elysee blinked back in shock, her own smile stilling on her face at the mention of the gardener’s foster daughter.

“Leyla?” Elysee asked, “You want to have Leyla as an attendant?”

“Yes.” she said, smiling brightly at the matriarch, “I would be more comfortable with her as my attendant, and seeing as it is the school break, she’s most probably free during my stay. That way I wouldn’t be imposing on your servants.” she calmly explained, “That is, if you would allow it, my Lady.” she added respectfully.

There was a dangerous glint in Elysee’s eyes at the mere thought of that gardener’s foster daughter stepping foot in her home. She was still sore about the whole ordeal about the greenhouse too.

“Well, are you sure?” Elysee asked once more, “She probably couldn’t assist you as well as my current servants will.”

“Oh, I promise Leyla would do just fine as my attendant!” Claudine politely insisted back, ignoring the obvious glare her own mother was shooting at her. “She’ll only be assisting me, just for a few days tops.”

Elysee hummed, nodding along in agreement. Her jaw clenched as she smiled at Claudine. And so with a heavy heart, Elysee went to summon one of her maids with a ring of her bell.

One maid immediately came rushing in, politely standing a few paces beside her as she awaited for orders. And so, through gritted teeth, Elysee spoke.

“Please summon Leyla to the mansion as soon as possible.”


Chapter 77.


Be Pitiful.


When Leyla had been summoned into the Arvis mansion by none other than Elysee von Herhardt, she thought they’d been found out. She never expected it was because Claudine needed an attendant since hers had been injured not too long ago.

Elysee had immediately explained to her what she was going to do, and when she should do it, but to be honest, Leyla hadn’t really been paying attention. It was like the words entered one ear, and out the other as she nodded along without really understanding anything.

“Well, that’s it.” Elysee hummed, “All you really need to do is help Claudine with whatever things she needed doing. And don’t worry, it’s paid work.”

“Madam, I don’t really have the experience though…” Leyla weakly countered, but Elysee only looked at her sternly.

“Haven’t you assisted Claudine before?” she cut off harshly, “I know you probably did when you were still children. It won’t be hard work, I assure you. You’ll just assist her maid until her hand heals and she can do it herself.”

The distaste on the matriarch’s face was clear. She had been in a foul mood ever since she called for Leyla.

“Surely you won’t refuse such a favor?” Elysee prodded, raising a brow at the woman, “After all, Claudine had been so graceful to the fact your uncle destroyed the greenhouse which was supposed to be their wedding venue.” she said as though to add insult to injury, “Think of this as a way to repay her.”

The way the madam mentioned Bill was through gritted teeth. Leyla could tell Elysee wanted her to

know she hadn’t forgiven Bill for the accident he caused. A murmur amongst the other ladies with them broke out as they whispered to each other.

“You mean her uncle’s that gardener?”

“My, if I were her I wouldn’t want anyone related to him working under me.”


Claudine eyed the ladies through her peripheral, before walking beside Leyla, placing a comforting hand on her shoulder before pulling away to stand beside her future mother-in-law.

“Oh will you do this for me, Leyla please?” she said politely with a pleading smile, “I promise it won’t be too much of a hassle for you.” she swore. “I just need help with simple tasks every now and then, the rest of the time you’ll be free to roam the mansion even.”

Claudine took the time Leyla thought it through to observe her. She looked paler than she was the last time she saw the woman, but at least Leyla didn’t appear more conniving and ambitious. When Leyla still remained silent, Claudine decided to put her in a corner.

“It’s alright, isn’t it, Leyla?” Claudine asked, pushing her to agree. Somewhere across the room, Riette tried to catch her attention, but she resolutely ignored him as she stared intently at her fiance’s mistress.

After all, if Leyla were to decide to stay with Matthias, she’ll have to learn to live with her. She needed this time to get used to that fact, as well as to ensure Leyla wouldn’t get any ideas in the long run.

“Claudine expects an answer, girl!” one of the ladies snapped at Leyla, looking at her disapprovingly when she still refused to give an answer. Leyla, on her part, looked at Claudine with the eyes of a lost child. Quietly imploring Claudine to let her be.

As Claudine looked back at her, she wondered if it were those eyes who managed to snag such an emotionless man’s heart? She knew what she wanted Leyla to answer, and was content to wait as long as she could to get it.

It wasn’t long until Leyla realized she wasn’t allowed to leave.

“Of course, my Lady.” she finally replied, bowing her head to look resolutely on the floor. Her hands were clasped in front of her meekly, as she hoped for the upcoming days to be over soon.

“Oh how kind of you!” Claudine beamed at her, “Thank you so much, Leyla!” she added, Leyla finally looked up to give her a hesitant smile in return.


In his four-day stay in Ratz, Matthias’ work schedule was packed to the brim. He hardly had any time for a break.

As most businesses belonging to the Herhardt empire, they were based in Carlsbar. However, there was also a significant number of them in Ratz. All businesses were relevant in managing good relations between the royal family, their respective political circles, as well as social connections in the capital.



Which also meant that half the time, the Duke of Arvis stayed in the capital. And that fact wouldn’t change even if he were to get married soon, and would father an offspring.

Although, it made him think if perhaps he should make Leyla move with him to Ratz? It was a tempting thought. Matthias looked up at the office’ ceiling after the last group of visitors left.

It was no secret that the Herhardt’s mansion in Ratz housed the duke’s mistress for generations. Even his father’s longest mistress once lived here.

Back when he was young, Matthias always saw her whenever he’d stop by at the capital to visit his father. Both him and his mother acknowledged her presence, after all, his father still showed them the right courtesy as his wife and son despite his obvious affair.

As such, the mistress never dared cross his mother, nor him for that matter. It was the way things were in their household after all. The Herhardt house he grew up in.

It certainly would be good for him.

After all, he had no plans to get rid of her any time soon, he might as well join the club of his predecessors. It would make little sense for him to allow Leyla to live in Arvis after he got married. Though he wondered if Leyla would be amenable to his plan.

She’d been getting a little rebellious lately. Matthias could perfectly recall the way she would glare at him defiantly.

It was more likely she would deny the chance to move out of Arvis if that meant cementing her role as his mistress. Plus, she wasn’t the type of woman who’d keep quiet for long. She’ll blab soon enough to her uncle, Bill, who she would choose over him in a second every single time.

“Ah Leyla,” Matthias sighed out, clicking his tongue at the sound of her name. He swept his hand through his hair, before he rubbed his face in deep thought.

That ill-temper of hers had been amusing at first, but it was proving to be more and more of a nuisance as of late. He still didn’t understand her reluctance at being with him when he could give her so much and more.

And yet he knew she’d refuse every single one of them if it came from him.

He knew he had a strong hold over her, but most of the time it felt as though it was the other way around. He could hardly believe the times he had to reassess his plans because of what she wanted.

He thought about her for so long, Matthias finally realized it was becoming a habit for him to keep thinking about her every time he had the time to spare. And yet through all that thinking, he’d yet to reach a conclusion.

She filled his thoughts at every second of every moment of everyday.

A sudden knock came, and Mark Evers entered politely inside his office, bowing briefly before delivering his news.

“Master, Colonel Farrell has arrived,” he announced. Matthias nodded at him briefly in acknowledgement, before rising to his feet and fixed his appearance. Mark then stepped aside as he strode past him to greet his guest.

Mark followed him obediently through the hallway as he proceeded to continue with his news.

“Master, I also received word not too long ago from the Museum of Natural History.” he informed. At the news, Matthias abruptly stopped in his tracks and turned to his attendant, prompting him to continue. “They’d given word that the person who had carved the crystal ornament of a bird in their ceiling was some merchant named Kraken.”

Mark proceeded to inform him that aside from supplying the museum, Kraken was also the one responsible for supplying the Imperial family with their exquisite jewelry.

“Shall I send out word to him that you’d like to purchase an order?” Mark asked him. Matthias took no time to answer.

“Yes, send word I’d like to purchase a sculpture similar to the one in the museum.” he commanded and went on his way, before stopping once more, “Though with some changes.”

“What changes would that be, master?”

“I want him to make the wings yellow.” he ordered, and Mark jotted the information down before Matthias finally went on his way, stopping no more.

In the back of his mind, he recalled the way Leyla had looked up in amazement at the intricate ornament in the museum when they had visited it the first time. The passageway was filled with gaudy bird-like crystal ornaments, and she stood on her tippy toes to reach out to every single one of them…

She looked absolutely radiant at that moment when he held her in his arms. He wanted that feeling again.

She had been content the entire time they toured the museum, and she spent the rest of the day just writing, observing, and admiring every piece in the museum. Perhaps giving her the chance to study in Ratz now wouldn’t be such a bad idea.

The thought of giving her an ornament struck him when he passed by the Museum during his stay in Ratz. It was his sole reason why he sought out the sculptor, and instructed his attendant to order something just as spectacular.

Which was unlike him really.


He finally reached the door to the reception room when the thought of her attending the same college as Kyle struck him. The frustration came bubbling up like a volcano, before quickly dying down to a simmer when he remembered Leyla was already his.

Yes, she wouldn’t ever leave him for Kyle, not anytime soon.

And so, he entered the room in a considerably lighter mood and played flawlessly his role as the perfect, influential Duke Herhardt, schooling his features back into a neutral expression.



“Oh, do you remember this place, Leyla?” Claudine asked as she sat across from her new attendant, smiling brightly as she looked around, “This was exactly where we first met one another!” she recalled gleefully.

“I remember well, my Lady.” Leyla supplied, looking absolutely stiff in her seat as she looked around nervously.

How could she forget the place in her youth where the young Claudine had dragged her in and eventually abandoned her at?

She kept her gaze down, hoping to avoid any tension between them.

At the very least, Claudine hadn’t been lying when she said the work would be simple. Aside from a few random errands, the work she had to do was mostly minor compared to her work as a teacher. She was mostly just a glorified companion, someone Claudine could talk to whenever she grew bored or restless on her own.

Truly, it wasn’t anything different from how they interacted when they were still children.

“It feels as though it was just yesterday when we first met, but then I see you and I’m reminded of just how much time passed us by!” Claudine moaned with an air of regret. Leyla didn’t know how to contribute to the conversation.

Fortunately, it was when Claudine’s injured attendant rushed in, reminding her young mistress it was time for them to prepare for a tea party, as such a change of clothes were in order.

Leyla quietly shut her book, and obediently followed them both inside, and back to the guest bedroom where Claudine was staying. Already, her next set of wardrobe and accessories were laid out, all that needed to be done was to get them on Claudine.

Leyla also had the privilege to assist Claudine in this area, with the maid boasting that on the side she could do it with her eyes closed. Unfortunately, it was one of the tasks Leyla struggled to do. She doesn’t know what half of the garments were, while the other she couldn’t secure properly in place.


The maid kept scolding her whenever she made a mistake, resulting in Claudine laying a placating hand on her incensed maid, while giving Leyla a bright smile in compensation.

“I’m sure it’s all fine, Maria,” Claudine said, before turning to Leyla, “Go on, Leyla, you can do it.” she encouraged.

It seemed like Lady Brandt had no intention in calling for another maid to assist her after all. Leyla had to endure the difficulty of dressing her by herself. If it were any other maid, Claudine would have been fully dressed by now.

It took Leyla over an hour to finish, and yet she heard neither peep nor sound of a complaint from her temporary mistress. She tried her best really, but she just kept fumbling until it turned out to be an absolute disaster! She couldn’t even secure the corset properly!

Claudine glanced at her attire in the floor length mirror in her room, letting out an inaudible sigh at the sight of her. She then reached out, and took off the accessories Leyla draped around her, which included the hat, gloves, shawl, and even the necklace.

She certainly felt a lot cooler, and lighter than a while ago.

“Oh dear, it must have been difficult for you,” Claudine sighed, careful not to let out any hint of irritation or disappointment in her voice, “You definitely had a hard time just now.” she finished, giving Leyla a pitying smile.

Without the accessories on her now, Leyla could definitely look much better than before. She couldn’t help but stiffen up in embarrassment over her failure. With the way Claudine was looking at her, she couldn’t help but feel as though she was just a child once more.


Chapter 78.


Four People.


Night had fallen, and Leyla had finally gotten the chance to retire back to her lonesome. She sat in her bed, illuminated only by her sole lamp on the desk as she basked in the darkness of her room.

The night had gotten so late already, but she hardly felt the need to sleep. She tried to force herself to sleep at some point earlier, but all she achieved was more tossing and turning. It was in her restlessness she could find clarity in her mind.

Her windows immediately rattled by the strong gust of wind, snapping her alert as she whipped her head to stare in alarm at her windows, fearing the worst.

For a second she thought Phoebe had come by with a note from the duke, until she realized that couldn’t happen. The duke was away after all, it wouldn’t make sense for Phoebe to visit the mansion.

Relief quickly swelled in her chest, enabling her to get up and wrap a shawl around her thin arms. Her lips chattered against the cold, and she tried to imagine what Uncle Bill would see if he were to return at the moment.

She felt so lost right now. He’d only left not two days ago, and already she was feeling so lonely. She couldn’t imagine just how hard the next two weeks would be for her.

She walked closer to the window, re-checking the locks were secure before she found herself seated at the dining table, cradling a warm cup of tea in her palms.

“-it must be difficult for you.”

Claudine’s voice echoed in her head, rising above the mingling voices in her head. She could practically hear her ear ringing in the loudness of the silence around her. Leyla put the cup down on the table, having lost the appetite for the tea, the cold digging into her deeper.

She wanted to do something. She wanted to scream her heart out and probably kick some stones with her feet in frustration, break something even! Anything!

But when she was walking back to their cabin, with her head trailed on the ground beneath her feet in the light of the moon, she only found herself feeling so guilty and ashamed. It didn’t matter if Claudine was antagonizing her purposely or not, Leyla felt like she lost the right to be upset with her.



She was sleeping with her fiance after all.

And so she could only take solace on the fact that Matthias was away, and didn’t have the luxury of seeing her so submissive and obedient. If he did, it would have brought immense satisfaction for the man, and she swore off that.

She downed her cooling tea in one gulp, before refilling it with a still-warm tea from the pot. She removed her glasses, rubbing her eyes gently before pinching the bridge of her nose as she squeezed them shut. She let out a tired sigh, before rubbing her palm over her face and through her hair…

She had a vague sense of what she really was to Matthias.

In front of others, he’d maintain the facade of a perfect gentleman. He gave them the image of a perfect and respectable duke. But in the confines of his room, and in her company, only then did he feel confident enough to let her see the darker parts he held in him.

She doubted he’d ever let Claudine know about that, even if they were to wed.

A steely gaze went over her, as she quickly emptied her second cup. She put it down on the table, standing up abruptly to recheck the locks on the doors were secure this time. Leyla glanced out the window, watching the darkened world outside her home.

She really hated him.

Everything, all the emotions she kept in her all day long; her torture and torment in the Arvis mansion, the turmoil in her mind…

They were all because of him. And she’d hate him forever for that.

She might be a little unfair, after all, it wasn’t as if the duke was the only one to blame for the suffering she was put through. He didn’t make her tear Kyle’s heart mercilessly earlier today. She did that of her own volition, but that didn’t mean she didn’t want to blame that to the duke.

She went back to her room, doing one last sweep to secure the locks on both doors and windows, before she curled up in her bed in a fetal position. When dawn came, a thought entered her mind.

What if he were to come back earlier? That way, she could at least have an outlet for her frustration. Direct it to the man who’s responsible for her suffering. Yes, that would work indeed…

And just like that, Leyla wanted to see Matthias returning soon.




When Dr. Etman went to visit Norma, he brought Kyle along with him. At the sight of the doctor’s son, Catharina beamed, to which Kyle returned effortlessly with his own kind smile to the old Herhardt matriarch.

“Oh it’s so good to see you Kyle!” Norma greeted, “My, you’ve grown so much since the last time I saw you!” she praised, and Kyle let out a short laugh in embarrassment. She then turned to her doctor, “It was nice of you to bring him along, today.”

“Oh, it wasn’t much trouble really, my Lady.” Dr. Etman replied, “Besides, it was our pleasure to visit you, isn’t that right, son?”

“Yes it is.” Kyle quickly agreed, shooting them a convincing smile, which he hoped would placate the side-eye his father gave him. Norma seemed to have missed the tension between the father and son duo, and smiled brightly at the confirmation.

She had wanted to meet with Kyle soon when she heard he returned to Arvis. She really was fortunate that Dr. Etman suggested he’d bring Kyle with him by his next visit, which happened to be today.

She had gotten a slight cold not too long ago, but thankfully caused her no further health problems, which made her treatments short. The rest of their visit was spent with them catching up with one another, and regaling them of tales of their everyday life.

Kyle wasn’t really much in the mood to visit, but for Lady Catharina’s sake, he’d be amicable and pleasant. He owed her that much at least. The old Herhardt matriarch always adored him as a child, and he’d hate to disappoint her.

Still, his mind was filled with thoughts of Leyla. Just the mere thought of her threatened to break his calm composure as he struggled to keep the tears from forming in his eyes.

He knew she lied to him. He was sure of it. It was the only thing that made sense. He replayed her words over and over, how could he not? He remembered everything about her lately.

Her speech, the way she left, and her tears when she thought he wouldn’t catch up but did…

He was currently planning on an escape route from his father once their visit was over. He needed to see her, despite her telling him she didn’t want to ever again. He wanted to help her, and he needed to know why she felt the need to lie to him.

Fortunately, shortly after administering her medicine, Norma began to feel drowsy, an unfortunate side effect. And so his father decided it was best to give her rest, and they all exchanged goodbyes, with a promise to visit when she was better.

Kyle was quick to leave before his father after he bid Lady Catharina goodbye, but just as he began to snuck off, he was unexpectedly greeted by one of Arvis’ maids, who stood patiently outside the room, waiting for him and his father.

“Greetings Dr. Etman, and his son.”

The maid said, bowing in front of them, sparing him a glance before turning back to his father,

“I apologize for the abruptness, but Lady Brandt has invited you over for some tea. If you have time to spare.”

His father’s eyes widened in pleasant surprise, exchanging a small look with Kyle before nodding along with the maid.

“It would be no trouble to accompany Lady Brandt.” his father replied. She then began to lead them towards where Claudine was, eyeing him in an indecipherable way.

Kyle couldn’t help but think that even if his father were to decline the invitation, the maid won’t let them say no.



Earlier that day, Elysee had decided to go out to the city, which her entourage of ladies quickly agreed and accompanied her with. Leaving Claudine in Arvis, in the peaceful reception room when afternoon struck.

She did her embroidery in front of the fireplace. Sat opposite her was Leyla, reading a book as per usual.

Claudine knew that Dr. Etman came by to visit Lady Catharina today. She also knew he brought with him

Kyle. Perhaps their visit would be over soon.

Her eyes snuck a glance at the door to their reception area, before glancing back at her companion. She was too focused on her book. Claudine couldn’t help but look at Leyla like a mother would with her unsociable child.

She knew Matthias would be returning sometime tomorrow. Claudine wasn’t foolish enough to believe it was just because he finished quickly. He probably finished quickly because he missed his mistress too much.

She needed to tread carefully. She didn’t want to know what would happen if Matthias even thought she was mistreating his precious Leyla. Since it was the last day she could be alone with Leyla, she decided to give Leyla a little gift, of sorts.

Claudine’s lips curled up into a subtle smirk at the thought.

Yes, it was good to give Leyla some kind of gift for all the good work she did the past few days. She’d done exceptionally after all, aside from the slight mishap with changing her clothes, she did wonderfully as her aide.


But that didn’t mean she wasn’t still an orphan, despite her holding her head up high as though she wasn’t a low-born. Yes, even now, Claudine has yet to see her look even guilty or contrite for being Matthias’ mistress. Although she did remain ever modest and polite around her.

She wanted Leyla to squirm around her. Such audacity for the mistress to remain so calm around the fiance. She really was quite the shameless mistress. It was the best compliment Claudine could give her right now.

Perhaps if she continued to work well as her aide, Claudine might be convinced to give her the position full-time, even well into their wedding. She might even let Leyla take care of her child with Matthias when the time comes.

“You know, I can’t help but wish your marriage with Dr. Etman’s son had come true.” Claudine suddenly piped up, breaking Leyla’s concentration as she looked up in shock at her.

“P-pardon?” Leyla asked, her voice just above a whisper.

“Your marriage, with, hm, what was his name?” Claudine thought, “Kyle was it? I’m right, aren’t I?” she asked Leyla, who nodded shortly in confirmation.

“Yes, you and Kyle, I wish you did get married.” Claudine continued, “Just imagine it! You and him at the university in the capital, you two would have had the best life right now.” she finished brightly, looking determinedly at Leyla.

Leyla’s brows furrowed at the topic.

“My Lady-” but Claudine cut her off.

“Plus, both of you look so good together! You had been so happy with him. I never saw you like that around anyone else.”

“My Lady-”

“I can’t help but think Mrs. Etman had been too cruel to you.” Claudine continued on as though she didn’t hear Leyla. “I know she’s his mother, but what right did she have dictating her son’s marriage, am I right?”

This time, she looked at Leyla, allowing her the chance to reply. Leyla gulped under her stare, before she stared resolutely at her fingers, which unconsciously gripped tightly onto the book in her hands…

“There’s no use reminiscing the past, my Lady,” Leyla sighed, taking slow deep breaths, “Kyle and I… I don’t think we’d ever get back together again.”

“I know.” Claudine hummed, “I was just sharing my thoughts.” she replied back as she felt a sadistic sense of pleasure at seeing the turmoil in Leyla’s expression.


She knew that even if Kyle wanted Leyla back, which he probably did, Leyla wouldn’t. She was far too deep in the Duke’s clutches, she couldn’t find the will in her to leave him for anyone else, not while he still wanted her.

It was a sad fate for anyone who’s wings got broken, Claudine supposed. In the end, living your life makes you more miserable.

Deciding not to antagonize her further, she switched gears and gave Leyla another pitying look, sending her emphatic signs.

After all, why wouldn’t she feel sorry for her? Leyla became a reluctant mistress to a man that was ruining her life bit by bit.

Granting her the small opportunity to enjoy some time with Kyle over a cup of tea would be a great gift from Claudine for all her hard work.



There was a commotion amongst the servants as Hessen, head butler of Arvis Mansion, immediately called the servants to an assembly in front of the lobby hall. Hessen had been prepared to welcome his master tomorrow evening, but it was only a short while ago when he received word the Duke would be arriving today instead.

The servants stood in attention, as they quickly schooled themselves with respectable expressions as they welcomed back the Duke of Arvis. Hessen rushed to greet him as the chauffeur opened his master’s door.

“Welcome back master!” He greeted, breathing deeply as he bowed in front of the duke. Normally he was composed, but the unexpected change in schedules made him rush a bit in his haste to greet his master properly, along with the other servants in the mansion.

Matthias only nodded at him, giving a nod of acknowledgement at his servants before continuing inside the mansion, striding through the polished halls of his home. Hessen rushed after him, giving him news of the events that happened while he was away.

“And my mother?”

“Lady Elysee had gone to the city along with a few other ladies not too long ago, while Lady Catharina is resting in her quarters.” he dutifully supplied.

“And what of Lady Brandt?”

“She’s in the small lounge by the second floor, we just prepared some tea for her.”

Matthias hummed, swiftly turning on his heels to head up the mentioned area.


When Hessen heard Leyla would be serving under Lady Brandt, he’d been skeptical of it. Of course, even if he wanted to be against the idea, it wasn’t in his place to question his master or his betters on their decision.

He rushed after his master, wondering how to break the news to him that Leyla was around. He panicked further, when he realized they were nearing the lounge area, and he’d yet to give his master the news!

“Duke Herhardt, welcome back!” called out Dr. Etman, who just turned around one of the halls to head into the lounge. Matthias stopped in his tracks to greet the doctor properly, when he caught sight of Kyle behind the doctor.

It was only a split second, but Hessen had worked around Matthias long enough to have caught onto his subtle tics.

“Thank you, I wasn’t expecting you here.” Matthias politely greeted back, smiling appropriately.

“Ah, we were just about to leave after a visit with your grandmother, when Lady Brandt extended us an invitation for tea.” Dr. Etman jovially explained, smiling at the duke.

“Ah, then it’s fortunate we get to go there together.” Matthias smiled, gesturing for the doctor to go in first. Matthias quickly glanced at Kyle, who waited for the duke to enter first, before shortly following inside.

Hessen paled at the sight of the three men entering the area Lady Brandt and Leyla were in. He tried to stall for some more time, to better prepare his master, but Matthias resolutely ignored him as he pushed the door open…

Only for Dr. Etman and his son stiffened at the sight of the two women waiting for them inside. Matthias could only stand still beside them.

“Oh God…”

Hessen swallowed down his trepidation, and prayed for the rest of the tea time to go smoothly.


Chapter 79.


Maid.


The first thing Matthias saw when the door opened was Leyla. He zeroed in on her almost immediately, before he remembered his current company. He snuck a glance beside him, towards both Dr. Etman and Kyle, just enough to grasp the current situation he would be dealing with.

Claudine gasped at the sight of him, before presenting him with a bright smile.

“Duke Herhardt! You’re back earlier than we expected.” She greeted him politely after a few tense moments of silence. Matthias gave her a courteous smile back.

“I apologize for being unable to inform you of the change in schedule my Lady,” he began, “But I finished work earlier than I thought and figured I should get home. No point in delaying.”

He took a few, long strides, before stopping beside Claudine and kissed her hand. He then turned to look at Leyla, who had stumbled back instinctively under his gaze, almost hitting the window behind her.

“I didn’t realize you already had a guest.” he pointed out while staring softly at Leyla, who tried to remain inconspicuous within the shadows.

“Ah, she isn’t really here as a guest.”

Claudine admitted after debating in her head what was the best course of action here, and decided the truth was the least hassle to explain.

“My aide had unfortunately hurt her hand in an accident, so I asked if Leyla could replace her temporarily. Your mother agreed.” She added offhandedly, sparing Leyla a glance, before turning back to Matthias, “And she’d been a great help, I was so thankful I chose correctly.” Claudine finished explaining.

This was also the perfect opportunity for her to observe what Matthias would do with both his fiance and mistress in one room.

“Ah, so she’s your aide, is she?” Matthias hummed, straightening up beside his fiance in that same undecipherable expression as always. Claudine acted innocently, just continuing to hold onto his hands. Matthias then turned to the other two guests in the room.


“Then I guess only Dr. Etman and his son were your planned guests this afternoon.” he stated, and saw both men looked equally confused and bothered by the information. He then turned to look at Claudine, who only continued to beam brightly at him.

“Yes, I did invite them when I heard they were visiting today.” She beamed, before the smile dropped on her face, and looked worriedly at Leyla, “Oh but I completely forgot…” she trailed off, her eyes darting back and forth the past fiances’ in the room apologetically.

“Oh dear, I’m so sorry. I didn’t mean to make things so uncomfortable.” Claudine apologized quickly, before Dr. Etman cleared his throat and gave her half a polite smile, and half a grimace.

“There’s no need for you to apologize, Lady Brandt.” the doctor said, “It happens to the best of us.”

“Well, shall we proceed with tea then?” Matthias asked everyone in the room, acting indifferent to the tension around him. Claudine couldn’t help but eye him warily, wondering what he would do next.

“No, I’m sorry,” Kyle spoke up suddenly, with a hardened look on his face, “I’m afraid we have to go now, don’t we father?” he asked his father, but more like demanded them to leave by the tone in his voice. Dr. Etman fumbled over his reply, but hastily agreed.

“Ah, yes, of course!” he almost stuttered and bowed apologetically at the Duke and his Lady, “I just remembered we have another patient to attend to afterwards, we must make haste.” he quickly explained, shooting a nervous glance over Leyla’s unresponsive form.

He clearly pitied Leyla’s situation.

“Well, I’m sorry to hear our time together must be cut short, but we understand.” Matthias replied, nodding his head at them. “I’ll make sure to give you a formal invitation for tea next time.”

“Thank you Duke Herhardt,” Dr. Etman said, bowing to him, then to his lady, “Thank you once again, Lady Brandt.” he then turned on his heels, and grabbed onto his son to keep moving, but Kyle kept staring at Leyla with a fire in his eyes.

“Didn’t you hear Leyla? Let’s go.” Kyle called out, causing the tension around the room to rise once more. Everyone’s eyes were on him, but he pressed on, “You’re not a maid around here, Leyla. Why are you acting like one?”

Claudine’s eyes narrowed over at Kyle in a subtle manner, while Dr. Etman looked at his son as though he was crazy. Matthias’ attention though, was solely focused on his mistress who first had an odd look on her face, before it turned into something desperate…

His jaw tightened at the subtle change.

She looked like she was begging Kyle Etman. She looked as though it was Kyle, and not him who would be able to help her!


“You may go now, Dr. Etman.” Matthias interrupted, his cold voice cutting through the tension like a knife, “As head of Arvis, I will handle things from here.” he said, looking straight at the doctor with an icy look.



‘Control your son.’

It was what his look demanded, and immediately Dr. Etman forcibly ushered his son out of the reception area despite the wordless protests Kyle had against leaving without Leyla by his side.

Kyle caught Leyla’s pleading gaze, begging him to leave her alone. Kyle’s fists clenched beside him, but ultimately had to respect Leyla’s wishes no matter how much he wanted to disobey.

The door clicked to a close, just as the doctor and his son managed to leave successfully this time. Matthias then grabbed onto his cup of warm tea, and stirred its contents, watching the vortex swirl in his cup.

“I guess you’ll have to spend tea with just me, my Lady.” he stated, and invited his fiance back to tea.

When he turned to look at Claudine, she was visibly pale as she nervously looked at him.

Matthias decided to ignore her for now, his attention back to observing Leyla, who now held a grief-stricken expression as she continued to dutifully stand at the corner of the room to give them some kind of privacy.

And yet she must have felt his gaze on her, for her eyes shifted away and met his own. A viscous smirk paved its way on his lips as she looked at him.

‘He won’t be coming for you Leyla.’ he conveyed to her, and the fearful look in her eyes quickly changed into rage. His smirk widened at the sight of it.

Yes, that was a much better look on her.



“Your mother should be back soon enough with the other ladies,” Claudine informed him as they sipped on their tea, “She’d be happy to see you return sooner than expected.”

It had been silent as soon as the Etmans left them. She felt too much like an outsider between the Duke and his mistress. She couldn’t stand it anymore, and decided to break the deafness she was beginning to feel.

“Well, it seems to be getting closer to dinner, I should start preparing by now.” Claudine continued. Matthias kept silent, content in letting her talk as he calmly sipped on his tea, “Aren’t you going to prepare for dinner as well?” she prompted him to reply.


“I think I want to enjoy my tea a little longer.” He finally said, still not looking at her, “You’re free to do as you wish though, Lady Brandt.” he pointed out. Claudine pursed her lips as she stared at him a little bit more.

“Well then, if you’ll excuse me.” she sighed out, and stood up from her seat. There was no point in bothering the Duke more. Should she press the wrong buttons, he might do something to her, and the thought of it terrified her.

“Aren’t you taking your aide with you?” Matthias asked as soon as she passed him by to leave. Claudine paused, and looked back at him to see him staring at Leyla, who stood in the same spot she had been since tea time began.

She glanced at both of them for a while, pondering what to do, before waving her metaphorical white flag to the Duke.

“Not tonight.” she told him, “I think Leyla deserves a little reprieve from her temporary tasks.”

Earlier, Matthias had acted like the perfect fiance, defending her in front of their guests, while acting like he was unbothered with Leyla’s current status. He passed her little test that much at least, but she couldn’t help but feel more nervous pushing him further as of the moment.

“Good work today Leyla,” she turned to the poor woman this time, smiling brightly at her, “Consider yourself duty-free for the rest of tonight.” she praised before swiftly leaving them alone to meet up with her actual servant, who waited patiently for her outside the room.

Claudine nodded at the woman outside, who then walked in quietly, handing Leyla some money for her pay for the day. Leyla numbly accepted it, as both Lady Brandt and her aide left them by themselves, and the doors swung to a close behind their retreating backs.

Leyla stood rooted in place, her face devoid of her feelings. Matthias would have thought she was a statue if it weren’t for the way her hands shook in front of her. He regarded her thoughtfully for the moment.

Was it just him, or her pale complexion that made her lips so rosy today?

With a click of his tongue, he gracefully stood from his seat and began stalking towards her like a predator would his prey. He held onto his cup, his knuckles turning white with how strongly he was gripping it. He only stopped when he stood just an inch apart beside her, and stared out the window.

“You are to wait for me in the annex.” he ordered, glancing at her from his side with an icy stare, “Or don’t. It’s your choice in the end.” he whispered right next to her ear. He kept staring at her, and Leyla bowed her head further down to avoid his eyes.

The pouch of money in her hands crinkled as her hands continued to shake.


Finally he stepped away from her and set the cup down back on the table before swiftly leaving her behind the room alone with her thoughts. He quickly turned towards his study.

He sat down in front of his desk and drummed his fingers on the table top before he rang the bell in his study. Not a moment longer, Hessen came walking in, and bowing beside his table.

“How can I help you, master?” Hessen asked dutifully as he retained his bow.

“Summon Dr. Etman once more.” Matthias said as he began to arrange the documents in his desk back to their working order. Hessen looked up at him in confusion. “I’m afraid we still need his services after all. I want him to look after another patient here in Arvis.” he finished, leaving no room for any argument.

“I will do so at once, master.”

“Do send him my apologies for the inconvenience.” Matthias added as an afterthought, and Hessen bowed at him once more, before swiftly leaving his study to call for the doctor once more.

Deep down inside, Hessen couldn’t help but worry what had happened earlier, and what would happen later when the doctor arrived.



When Claudine was changed and dressed for dinner, she wasted no time in leaving her room and headed out once more to the room, where the ladies had just returned, and were accompanied by familiar gentlemen gathered around the area.

When she entered, eyes turned at her arrival and greeted her with warm smiles.

“Oh you look beautiful as always Lady Brandt.”

“Yes, Claudine’s always had a nice figure, and she’s quite tall as well.”

“Any dress would compliment her!”

“Hush you, don’t you see Marquis Lindman is here?”

The ladies chattered, and Claudine only gave them a pleasant smile before she locked eyes with Riette. He had been away for a couple of days since he had to attend a different gathering by the central city, and had just returned tonight. She couldn’t help but feel a little more at ease with him around.

Perhaps earlier’s incident wasn’t a big deal. She hadn’t seen hair nor hide of both Matthias and Leyla.

Perhaps they’re off frolicking under the sheets, and the entire mishap she made would be forgotten.

After all, if the past few days were of any indication, it meant Leyla knew her place was less than Claudine’s. While earlier’s performance made her see that in front of an audience, Matthias knew how to act accordingly and put her in priority compared to his mistress.

Yes, she would be fine. She had to believe that.

She mingled among them, the atmosphere becoming brighter as they chatted and laughed around with each other in what they’ve been up to in the city. Everything had been going well, at least until Matthias returned with Dr. Etman in tow.

The chatter died down, as they looked at the unexpected guest. Madam Norma was the first to recover.

“Oh, Dr. Etman, are you back so soon?” she asked him, looking confused. She had felt fine all day since he visited her after all.

“Oh, I’ve been summoned by the Duke. He told me there was a patient I needed to see urgently.”

“A patient?”

“Is someone sick?”

“Perhaps someone’s injured.”

Murmurs slowly filled the room, as the nobles looked around to see who needed the help. Riette glanced nervously towards Claudine, who had narrowed her gaze towards Matthias who looked right back at his fiance.

‘No.’

Claudine thought to herself and felt a bead of sweat roll down the nape of her neck.

‘He wouldn’t.’

Her hands twisted into her skirts, fisting her skirt into her clammy palms. She caught the smirk Matthias subtly sent her way and knew then and there he wouldn’t let her go so easily for the mishap earlier.

“Why, my Lady, don’t you remember?” Matthias asked innocently as he blinked at her. “You told me your maid had gotten into an accident and had been unable to do her duties, so I summoned the doctor to tend to her.”

“My maid?” Claudine asked softly in an incredulous manner, looking nervously at the eyes that turned towards her, “Oh, you mean Mary?”

“Yes.” Matthias quickly nodded, “If you would so please summon her here so that the good doctor could tend to her quickly.”

Every noble then began to look at the duke in awe at his thoughtfulness. Others couldn’t even believe he would go as far as to summon their family doctor just for a maid, that wasn’t even really part of their household, never mind the fact it was his fiance’s.

“Honestly Matthias, how could you summon our doctor for a maid’s wounds?” Elysee scoffed, and Matthias only smiled at his mother politely.


“It isn’t just any maid dear mother, but my Lady’s.” he calmly explained, “I would hate to see the rest of her stay be uncomfortable because of her maid being so injured to the point she can’t even use her hands. It worried me greatly, so I can’t imagine the burden she must be feeling right now.”

The other ladies cooed at how sweet he was being, Claudine could only breathe deeply as she smiled gratefully at the duke in a nervous manner.

“You are so kind, my Duke.” she replied, licking her lips, “But you didn’t have to trouble yourself over my concerns-”

“Nonsense,” Matthias interrupted her, “What’s your concern, is also my concern. After all, we are to be married soon enough.” he said, staring down at her in faux kindness. Waiting no further confirmation from her, Matthias turned to one of the servants in the room.

“Find Lady Brandt’s servant, and bring her here this instant!” he barked, and they swiftly left to do his bidding.


Chapter 80.


What You Want To Do.


As soon as the servants came back with Claudine’s in tow, Matthias wasted no time in making her unveil her wound. As soon as the doctor unwrapped her bandage, it revealed a large gash on her hand, but not deep enough to hinder her from doing her duties.

Elysee couldn’t help but scoff at the revelation. She sneered down at the maid, who squirmed underneath all their gazes.

“What a lazy brat, feigning illness over something so small!” she exclaimed, prompting the others to immediately agree in their assessment, even Madam Norma couldn’t hold back her disapproval at the lie.

Claudine on the other hand kept her lips shut as she stared at the duke.

“Please mother, we don’t know if it really is just skin deep.” Matthias pointed out to his incensed mother, “Doctor, if you please?”

“Ah, of course.” Dr. Etman cleared his throat and assessed the injury with an expert eye. “Well, it’s a large gash, I won’t deny, but the bones beneath seemed to be intact.” he told everyone, “Overall, I would say it’s just a minor cut.”

The maid suddenly burst into tears, unable to hold back her nervousness under their scrutiny. There wasn’t even an ounce of pity thrown her way.

“Oh, but isn’t that absurd?” Matthias hummed thoughtfully, finally looking towards his fiance, with that glint in his eye, “My lady specifically told me her maid had been injured and thus couldn’t do her job, hence employing a temporary replacement. Was she wrong?”

All eyes then shifted to Claudine, who inaudibly gulped. On the outside it looked like she was just as clueless as everyone, but anyone who would observe her closely could realize it wasn’t cluelessness, but nervousness instead.

“I, I didn’t know,” Claudine stammered, “I honestly believed she was unable to do her work.” she reasoned out, casting a nervous glance at her sobbing maid.


At this, Matthias drew closer to the maid and took her hand from the doctor’s, and caressed her gash just right beside it. “Well if that’s true then,” he eyed the maid coldly, “It must be the maid who lied to my Lady after all.” he pointed out, and there was an uproar amongst the nobles with them.

The maid just kept crying, and bowed her head deeply in apology, refusing to utter a single sound aside from an apology. Matthias couldn’t help but feel a tad bit impressed with his fiance.

Claudine von Brandt was a different breed of noble, he’d admit. She was intelligent as she was beautiful, and she knew how to use it to her advantage. A desirable trait for his future duchess. Which was why her maid was determined not to rat her mistress out.

“I, I can’t think of anything else but believe she did deceive me.” Claudine weakly replied, and Matthias hummed, turning the maids hands up calmly, making the sobbing girl look up at him in fright. He couldn’t help the satisfaction he felt at seeing her cry beneath him.

“How dare you deceive my Lady?” he questioned in a low voice, his icy glare directed towards her. But behind his harsh words, Claudine could hear a hint of amusement hidden so well if she wasn’t looking for it.

Immediately Claudine stood up and walked closer to them.

“Please my Duke, let me handle Mary. Forgive her indiscretion, just this once.” Claudine interrupted, gaining Matthias’ attention once more. The audience they had watched with bated breaths, wondering what was about to happen.

“In the meantime, accept my apology on her behalf.” Claudine declared, ignoring the way her mother reached out for her to stop her. The maid looked ready to faint any moment now by the intense stare down Matthias and Claudine had between them.

“It’s my job as her mistress to take care of her, she’s my responsibility.” Claudine persisted, “I must have been neglectful of her that she had no choice but to feign injury for time to rest.”

“And you would just forgive her like that?” Matthias asked, tilting his head in faux confusion at what she was asking of him, “Someone who deceived you? You’re too kind for your own good, my Lady.”

“I can’t help it.” Claudine shot back politely, “She’s been with me for a long time. How could I just ignore the years she served me well over a single mistake?”

Claudine had a feeling she would come to regret having said that, but as he was driving her into a corner, she didn’t have any other argument in her arsenal to plead for Mary’s mercy without admitting she lied and knew the extent of the injury.

“I’m not so sure I should let it slide.” Matthias admitted, frowning in thought, but Claudine persisted.

“You’d understand it most though, I’m sure my Duke,” she added, “After all, you did the same thing with the gardener not too long ago.”


Matthias’ gaze hardened for a while at the subtle jab she gave him over his decision to let the charges be dropped against Bill Remmer. He held his fiance’s gaze for a moment, before nodding in agreement.



She was confident, he’d give her that too. She wasn’t the kind to lose composure easily in public, even if it was up against someone who already knew what she did. And so he flashed her a pleased smile in front of everyone.

“Does this mean my Lady finally understands why I did what I did?” he asked, a smirk on his lips, knowing he’s once more driven her to a corner. Claudine took a deep breath before nodding at him with a soft smile.

“Of course,” she stated, her cheeks growing red, both in embarrassment and frustration, but for everyone watching, they’d simply assume it was because of the loving way he seemingly looked at her,

“I am still so amazed by your kindness and generosity. Which is what inspired me to forgive my servant.” she added. Matthias nodded along, and clasped his hands behind his back, before turning to the maid and back to Claudine.

“That is admirable of you, but I believe your maid still owes someone else an apology.” Matthias pointed out. “After all, we are not the only ones she’d inconvenienced.”

“Yes,” Claudine breathed subtly out of relief, “I’ll take Mary with me tomorrow and visit Leyla to deliver her an apology.”

“You’re going with her?” Matthias asked, quirking up a brow at her.

Claudine seemed to have forgotten a few lessons in protocol in her nervousness, for she completely forgot the implications of what she just said.

“Hm?” she asked cluelessly.

“That’s right Claudine, why must you go with Mary, it would look like you are the one apologizing instead!” her mother chastised her, before it finally dawned on Claudine what mistake she made.

“You’re right mother, I must have forgotten, I apologize once more.” she said, and looking back at Matthias. He noted how she was becoming more frazzled the longer they stayed on the topic. He deemed she had been put in the spot long enough and decided to end his little test.

“Indeed, let your servant apologize to Leyla alone tomorrow, on behalf of both you, and myself.” he finally said, placing his hand at the small of her back to escort her back to their seats.

Matthias appeared to be trying to be comforting, but having his hand behind her was like a weight on her shoulders, giving her more pressure and nervousness that chilled Claudine to the bone. How could she be so reckless, trying to take him on in a fight in front of an esteemed audience?!


However, she was also glad it was over now. Even more relieved that such a cold-hearted person did not regard her as highly as he did with Leyla.

“As you will, Duke Herhardt.” Claudine finally muttered, and walked ahead of him back to their seats.

Satisfied that Claudine was dealt with, Matthias turned back to the maid, who immediately bowed her head when he glanced back at her.

“See that you apologize to Miss Lewellin tomorrow.” he commanded, and glanced back at his pale fiance, “And remember the mercy your mistress had shown you today.”




When Matthias had gone over to the annex, his first observation was that it was dark. His breathing remained steady as he sighed into the night, scattering his white huffs of breath into the night.

He had thought to stop by the gardener’s cabin just to be sure, but chose instead to head directly to the annex. At first it was because she might have chosen not to come, but knowing her, she most probably decided to stay in the darkness.

Such stubbornness, he couldn’t help but click his tongue in irritation.

He pushed the entrance doors open, and locked it behind him as soon as he entered. The sound of the door’s locks bounced off the walls, echoing in the halls, before dying down and silence reigned once more.

He pressed on, headed up to his room, where it was just as dark as the night outside. Not even the lamp was turned on. His room was beyond freezing, the fireplace remaining unused.

Matthias frowned, wondering perhaps Leyla really didn’t come. He’d given her the choice not to after all. And so he walked out, to check the whole property just to make sure. Something in him was restless, and he found himself unable to ignore it as he looked all over for her presence.

He chanced another glance inside the room, pausing just outside the door to look. Everything was in tranquil state, and still he found no sight of her. His hands dug into his pockets, his right hand clutching into the box well hidden in his coat, as he could feel his lips dry in the chill air.

It was almost as if the annex was sucking in the coldness outside, accumulating inside bit by bit until it filled the annex entirely. He swiftly turned on his heels and went back to his room.

Despite having ordered her to come over, for once, he wished she’d find the gall to disobey him. Just as he thought she was indeed absent from the annex, he arrived in his room.


His eyes have long since adjusted in the dark. He began loosening up his clothes, and looked around when he frowned at the lump he found waiting for him on his wing chair. Matthias sighed in disappointment.

There, sitting in front of his unlit fireplace was the woman he’d just been searching for. In that position, she looked so peaceful, all curled up in herself as she slept. She was dressed warmly, but not enough to warm her in the freezing temperature.

Usually she would be defiant when they’d be alone together, now she looked a little bit docile.

She must have gotten used to him at some point, because it wasn’t long until her eyes fluttered open, to see a half-undressed Matthias looming over her. She blinked up at him blankly, before the anger, fear, disgust and resignation filled her eyes once more.

“Have you decided it was easier to freeze to death than starve?” he snapped at her in disappointment, looking down at her like she was an inconvenience. He abruptly turned around and moved to lit up the fireplace.

Hessen had already piled up some firewood in the room. It just needed to be lit.

“Or perhaps, and I’m giving you the benefit of the doubt here,” Matthias sighed as he straightened up from lighting the fire, “You did not know how to light a fire?”

He peered up at Leyla, who only remained unresponsive. Finally he straightened up, crossing his arms over his chest, waiting for her answer. Leyla finally gave in after a few more moments in silence.

“It would have been seen.” she weakly replied.

“What would have been seen?” Matthias prodded.

“The light, the smoke,” Leyla answered weakly, “Anyone would have seen it from the chimney.”

Currently, her face was shined upon by the light from the fireplace, giving Matthias a clearer view of her. He couldn’t tell by the yellow light, but she looked rather pale. It wouldn’t have been a stretch to think she could have frozen to death.

“After all, I wouldn’t dare light a fire without the owner’s permission.” Leyla clapped back at him, and Matthias sighed at the glare she shot his way.

“No one comes by the annex at night.” he informed her, “It’s just me. So there was no point for you to worry.”

“Still. I didn’t want to have others see it by chance.”

Leyla grasped onto her skirt, rubbing her palms on her knees to warm herself up some more, before uncrossing her legs to plant them back on the ground. Matthias watched as she rubbed her palms together, breathing warm breath over them, despite her gloves.

“Then why didn’t you stay in the cabin?” he shot back at her. Leyla shot him another glare.

“You ordered me to wait for you.” she hissed back, “I only did as you told me.”

“I also said it was your choice.” Matthias pointed out. When she refused to answer, he tilted his head at her, and reached out to caress her cheek, making her flinch away from him, “When did you become so obedient to my whims?”

Leyla bit her lip, and scooted away when he grazed his knuckles against her cheeks once more.

“If I didn’t come, you would have come after me in the cabin!” she hissed at him, “And I don’t want you stepping foot in my home!”

“Oho,” Matthias smirked at her, “Then perhaps I should come to you next time after all.” he grinned, before tossing a few more pieces of firewood into the fire. “I wonder how beautiful you’d be crying beneath me then.”

“I hate you! I hate you so much!” she exclaimed, standing up to get away from him, despite having no plans to run away from him. She just needed to put more distance between them.

Matthias clicked his tongue.

“Must you say the same thing every time Leyla?” he teased, “It’s getting cumbersome hearing the same insult over and over again. Be a little more creative!” He encouraged her.

“That’s great then because I have no plans in entertaining you!” she snapped back, her rage bringing life into her. Matthias seemed pleased with himself to know she won’t be freezing any time soon, not with the way she paced back and forth in her anger.

He only chuckled to himself, picking up his coat and tossing it over to the bench nearest his bed. He then walked over to Leyla, who had just taken a seat once more. When she noticed him coming closer, she began to rise from her seat when he boxed her in.

He briskly gathered her up in his arms, and repositioned her until she sat on his lap. She struggled against his hold, but he ignored it as he leaned back on the sofa, bringing her along with him. She eventually gave up, and sat limply atop him.

His arm snaked behind her waist, as the other grasped onto her hands and he began to rub circles against the small of her back. He gently tucked her head beneath his chin and sighed deeply as he began to relax…

“Please, finish it quickly today.” Leyla whispered to him, muffling her plea against his chest. Matthias’ loving caresses stilled in place.

“What do you mean?” he asked, a bitter tone seeping through his voice.


“What it is you wanted to do with me.” she raised her head to look at him pleadingly, looking so exhausted by everything. “After all, it doesn’t matter what I want. You’re going to make me do it anyway.” she laid out to him, before she lowered her gaze once more. “So I don’t care what it is anymore. Just do it quickly.”

Matthias remained unresponsive, which Leyla took to elaborate some more.

“I just want to go home and finally rest when all this is over.” she finished.


Chapter 81.

The Unchanging Heart.



Matthias felt himself grow enraged at her words. His hand came up behind her head, grasping her hair tight in his hand.

He wanted to make her afraid, to intimidate her once more to submission. He wanted her to look at him and know that he could destroy her beneath him without having to lift a finger.

He wanted to see her cry and beg for his mercy before he’d callously toss her aside like the trash his mother sees them as!

But when he imagined that all happening, he couldn’t help the sinking feeling in his gut. His grasp on her loosened up, losing his will to do those terrible things to her.

Instead, he pulled her closer, pulling her up flush against his warmth. He cradled her in a gentle way, and Leyla went along with no resistance. He knew she told him she wouldn’t disobey him any further, but something was unsettling by how easily she always complied with his wishes.


He then stood up from their seat, and carried her towards the bed, gently placing her down over the covers. He tucked a stray lock behind her ear, and kept her gaze on him as he took off her clothing one by one; her shawl, her coat, were the first to go.

Somewhere in losing her clothes, Leyla’s eyes wandered all around the room once more, refusing to keep eye contact with him. She resembled a doll, with her strings cut off. She knew by the way her sight blurred he’d taken off her glasses, then the chill bit her fingers as her gloves were taken off as well.

She gasped when he gently interlocked their bare hands together, making her look back at him in shock. He then gathered her in his arms, seeing the way the goosebumps ran up her arms once the coldness returned.

Leyla looked back at his deep blue eyes, and felt a different kind of warmth fill her as he stared at her with those tender eyes she’d seen him look with before. Her heart fluttered at the knowledge it was now directed at her, filling her with an odd sense of relief.

Matthias held themselves together, content at their current contact as he busied himself with keeping her warm. Leyla wanted to look away from him again, but found herself unable to. She was drawn to him. She’d always been drawn to him.

She could feel the blood rush to her cheeks the longer they kept eye contact, filling her pale face with a healthy complexion once more. Matthias found himself so captivated by her, he’d let go of her hand, making her gasp.

Whether in shock or relief, Leyla couldn’t know. He surged towards her, capturing her dried lips into his warm mouth, and began to kiss her without meaning to.

It just felt right to do so.

Leyla moaned at the feel of his lips against her, feeling his tongue prod at her lips to gain entrance. She gasped as she tried to pull away, only to let his tongue in, making her feel dizzy as the kiss gave her newer sensations.

“Ah..”

Her body quivered under his roaming touches. One of his hands was busy fondling her, rubbing friction against her skin in a bid to keep her warm, while the other fisted in her hair, tightening in a pleasurable way as she let out a wanton moan in response.

These feelings were making her uncomfortable, it was like she had to succumb into his ministrations. She squeezed her eyes shut, but it only heightened her sense of touch, and taste. She must remember why she’s even allowing herself to be taken like this so helplessly!

Yes, memories of the hurt she felt by the Duke, his blackmailing, and the immense betrayal she felt when he demanded her to do this was enough to save her from drowning in the tenderness he was showing her.


It was as though he was trying to suck the life out of her, with how long he kept making out with her. When he finally pulled away, Leyla could tell her lips were swollen from the kiss, but at least her body was no longer freezing, instead there was a heat pooling under her stomach. She looked up, half-ready to be disappointed.

“Are we done?” she asked him in a breathy whisper, they were both gasping for air, their chests heaving in tandem. Matthias just kept staring at her, “Does that mean I get to go home now?”

When he still remained silent, Leyla took it as a go-ahead, and began to leave the bed, when Matthias grabbed her by the arm, stopping her from leaving. He then snaked an arm around her waist, and pulled her flush until her naked back pressed against his chest. His warm breath grazed the back of her ear…

“Be more like your body Leyla,” he whispered against her ear, “It’s been so honest so far.” his husky voice encouraged, making her shudder against him. She could feel her cheeks flush once more at the intimacy of their position, feeling his index finger caress her cheeks.

She could feel herself getting wetter the more she spent in his arms.

Matthias appeared at ease with himself, confident in the way he’d molded her body to respond to him…

And she hated it. She hated how her body did respond to him whenever he’d touch her. How she’d lean into it and respond so readily to him.

“I-I can’t control how my body responds!” she protested, gasping when he rubbed up against her, “It’s similar to how you shiver when you’re cold or grimace in pain when you’re sick…… It will be the same no

matter who touches me. This is not what my heart wants.” she finished. Matthias only hummed, nosing against the nape of her neck…

“Is that really the truth? Or you’re just denying it?” he couldn’t help but ask her. His aloofness made Leyla more nervous in his hold…

“Believe me,” she hissed at him, the flickering flames of the fireplace catching her vision despite its blurriness as the fire reflected in her eyes, “I meant it with all my heart that I hate you!”

The memory of Claudine’s maid giving her money for her services, was burned painfully in her mind…

“And that will never change!” she declared, feeling the tears well up in her eyes, but she didn’t dare let them fall.

‘I can’t keep living like this!’ she screamed in her head as she desperately wished for time to fast forward where she was past all this!

The anger in her surged through the surface with her wish. All the pent up resentment and hatred she couldn’t express towards Claudine because of her guilt in her affair, reared its ugly head towards the Duke who was the main reason why her life’s been tumbling down the wrong road.


“Aren’t you prideful enough to not let a woman berate you like I do?!” She hissed at him, and Matthias nodded in agreement,

“You’re right.”

“Then just let me go and no woman ever will again!” she exclaimed. Matthias just clicked his tongue.

“I told you already Leyla,” he stood up, peering down at her with an intense gaze as he gathered her up in his arms until they’re pressed chest to chest with each other, ignoring the way she squirmed in his hold. “I also find your rebellious ways so endearing,” he teased.

He then laid her on the bed, glancing at her naked body in greedy lust as he hovered above her, trapping him within his arms. “You’re so captivating, it’s driving me crazy to be around you,” he whispered to her, his voice dropping into a low octave, sending shivers up her spine at how hot and bothered she currently felt.

She bit her lips, forcing herself to not make a sound. She just needed to endure it, it will be over soon enough, just like the previous times. And then she can go home again and forget.

And so she turned away from him, and caught sight of the wall paneling on the side instead. She kept her eyes trailed on it as she heard the ruffling of clothes, and felt Matthias’ warm body close to hers.

She squeezed her eyes shut whenever he’d brush up against her sensitive spots either intentionally or not.

In Matthias’ eyes, she was absolute perfection. The way her pale skin was in sharp contrast against his dark satin sheets, framing her so erotically as they rumpled beneath her nakedness. Her hair framing out of her head like a halo…

She was his own sculptured glass bird ornament, that hovered sensationally in his mind.

He remembered stopping by a jewelry shop on his way to the train station. He had custom ordered a piece earlier, and came to pick it up. It was the crystal bird ornament, fashioned into a jewelry piece made only for Leyla.

Just the sight of it was enough to send him back on a trip down memory lane, when Leyla had tried to reach up to touch the same ornament in the Natural History Museum. It was such a small thing, for Matthias it was trivial, but it was lodged into his memories.

Nothing significant happened there, so why was he able to remember her smile so clearly?

Matthias eyes went further south of Leyla’s body, wetting his fingertips with his saliva, before dipping two slender fingers into her moist folds between her legs. Leyla gasped out at the intrusion, arching her back beautifully, her legs unconsciously spreading further to accommodate his body between hers.

And yet Matthias’ expression remained cooled and unchanged, so different from how any other man would be when presented with a woman’s spread legs. His gaze kept watch of the way his fingers


disappeared knuckle deep inside of her, before trailing up to her slender stomach, her pert nipples, and up to her sweaty face…

Beads of sweat were forming on Leyla’s temples, as she stared at him in a dazed manner. Matthias leaned closer, pushing his fingers persistently back and forth, while his thumb rubbed up against her clit. Leyla released a sweet moan, rutting against his fingers in response…

“Look at how accommodating you’ve been to me lately, Leyla.” Matthias breathed into her ear, before he began to remove his clothes this time.

Leyla mewled as he rubbed circles against her, legs quivering when he curled the fingers in a come hither movement, scraping gently her inner walls. She couldn’t help but watch in captivation the way his shirt slid off to reveal his tanned skin, and sinewy form, bracing his broad shoulders over her as he swiftly removed his fingers to shuck off the rest of his clothes.

She gasped at the suddenness of his movements, letting out an instinctive whine when she was left with an emptiness. Leyla felt her heart thumping hard against her chest, watching him strip his underwear down, joining her in bareness.

A shiver ran up her body at the sight of his picturesque beauty, before she caught herself and looked away in shame. But Matthias was quick to return to her, situating himself back comfortably between her legs, hiking them up on his shoulders to get closer…

She could feel his blunt tip brush up against her opening, making heat pool into her gut once more,

And then he pushed…

Deeper, and deeper he went in,

Leyla could feel herself opening up, stretching herself to embrace his girth. The sound of their bodies rubbing together was coupled with the creaking of the bed. Their breaths mingled with each other’s and she mewled again when he brushed up against that sweet spot deep inside her until he was fully sheathed inside her…

“I guess there’s nothing else I can do to resist you too.” Matthias piped up, staring down at her as he braced his shoulders on either side of her head. “I quite like you being docile like this too.” he confessed, before swiftly pulling out and then thrusted in.

Leyla gasped, arching her back against the bed, pressing her chest up at his. Matthias kept up his slow paced thrusting, gradually increasing the speed with a gentle circling of his hips.

“Tell me, Leyla.”

He pleaded against her neck, as he dipped his head, suckling into her sensitive skin to leave a mark, the first of the many he planned to leave her with. He grunted when she felt him clamp down around him,


“Ugh, tell me the truth.” He hissed right at her ear, soaking it with saliva before pulling away, “If you hate me, really hate me as much as you claim… then why do you stare at me in such a way that tells me otherwise?!”

Leyla only moaned, shaking her head in denial, as her hands clambered to embrace him, pulling him closer to her as they continued to rut against each other…

“Tell me!”

She could hardly be bothered to answer him, her mind muddled with intense pleasure as she desperately tried to shake the feeling away, rendering her speechless. Any sound she could make could only be incoherent, even if he demanded her for an answer.

She bit down on her lip, and would have bitten it until it bled if he hadn’t taken her lips into his and locked themselves in a kiss as he hoisted her up until she sat firmly on top of him, bouncing her in his lap, hitting deeper inside her in the most heavenly feeling she ever felt!

She let out sobs when he pulled away from the kiss, leaving more marks on her skin as he busied himself with suckling on her collarbone. As their skins slapped against each other, Leyla couldn’t help but reminisce about the time she’d seen this man with a glimmer of hope around him…

It was back when she’d locked eyes with him as he entered the drawing room. Claudine had been with him, hanging off his arm as a noble lady should. She had been ashamed during that moment, but the sight of him gave her some hope everything would be alright soon…

Yes…hope…

And like a fool, she thought he would be that kind of man again.

Now he instilled in her no hope, just more shame in herself. But she can’t deny the intense pleasure he was indeed giving her.

His hips began stuttering, he dropped them back into the bed, her legs unconsciously tightening around his waist to aid his thrusting as they both chased their own pleasures.

Her hands tightened in their grip on his shoulders, nails digging into his skin in forming half crescent marks. It was like she was begging him to pleasure her further, to which he happily gave into.

‘How could I let this happen?’ she asked in despair to herself, before backtracking…

‘How could I have avoided this?’

“Ahh, ngh…” she moaned, turning her head away from him, when Matthias’ hand gently gripped her jaw, to make her look back at him. He grinded up against her, making her moan in ecstasy and shame at how wantonly she responded to him…


She looked so erotic, with a flushed face and tears by the corner of her eyes. The sounds she made were music to Matthias’ ears as he groaned at how she tightened up around him, engulfing him in her warmth he desperately craved…

He trailed his tongue up her cheeks to wipe the tears away, before diving his tongue deep into her mouth to get another taste of her. And then she came.

Matthias knew he wouldn’t be able to hold on any longer when she coated him with her juices, and pulled out, just in time to release himself in spurts of white. Leyla watched as his hands drowned in white, unable to hold back the sigh of pleasure from her lips.

It was like she was nailing down her own heart.

She was a nobody. She was supposed to be just nobody to him. She was an orphan, with no riches to her name, nor future prospects. And once he’d had his fill of her, she’d go back to being just that.

Nothing.

She could still remember that moment in the drawing room.

Claudine had thrown her arms around him so easily when he’d appeared for her, while she had been in her shabbiest clothes, and not in her best looks compared to the girl. And yet he saw her…

And she regretted acknowledging how her heart fluttered at that fact.

Untangled thoughts formed as she let a loud moan. Ecstasy and humiliation mixed with pain and pleasure in her thoughts and body. Although she tried a gallant effort to turn her head, Matthias refused to let her keep her last shred of pride.

He firmly grasped her chin and redirected her gaze toward him. Tears streamed down her flushed cheeks from her twisted, innocent eyes. She gasped and moaned, and the look on her face as she did so set his heart aflutter.

He’d known she’d begun to take over his thoughts for a while now. How could he not realize it when she was all he could think about when he’d been away from Arvis? She became a constant presence in his thoughts at all hours of the day and night. It was a strange sensation, something he’d never felt before, and he couldn’t place a finger on it.

It was what led him to ordering something so intricate, so expensive that he knew she would appreciate it over anything else he could give her. A feeling that resurfaced whenever he’d open up the box, and see that jewelry made only for her.

When he’d seen her, serving so lowly as Claudine’s maid, in his own mansion, something surged in him. A need to rectify a situation that does not even affect him because it was Leyla. And he’d never felt that way before.

‘Why?’

Why did he? It was a question he couldn’t ask anyone but himself, yet he was unable to answer.

He shook the thought away, opting to focus instead on the after care of their intercourse. He pulled Leyla’s limp, and oversensitive body closer, making her whimper as he brushed up against her. She was so exhausted by their coupling, she couldn’t even lift a finger against him.

All she wanted to do was to curl up beneath the covers, or go home and do that and cry. She had grown warm during their activity, and now with the sheen of sweat on her skin, she could clearly feel the cool air against her skin, cooling her body down.

Matthias pulled away from her, and headed to the showers, leaving her alone. She heard the faint sound of running water, and thought he was taking a shower when it shut down, and Matthias came back.

He sat down on the edge of the bed, closer to where she was. She wondered what he was planning to do now, and tried to open her eyes to glare at him. She saw him sitting beside her, with a basin filled with warm water, and some cloth in his hands.

He set them down on the bedside table, and reached out for her hand, pulling it closer towards him.

“N-no, I-” Leyla began to protest when he hushed her gently. Looking at her with an indecipherable expression.

“Stay still.” He commanded her, and Leyla watched as he dipped the cloth into the warm water, wringing out the excess water, and began wiping her down, gently pressing the warm cloth against her skin as he cleaned her body.

She grabbed his hand instinctively in panic, when he softly patted her head, whispering sweet nothings at her. Her grip on his wrist loosened up, allowing him to continue.

“Just lie still and be quiet Leyla,” he whispered softly, as he scrubbed away the drying fluids all over her body. “This will all be over soon.” he finished.

Gently, he wiped her down, her inner thighs, her stomach, her arms…

Even her neck and face got taken care of. Each brush against her skin was purposeful and gentle. He was diligent, and his touch didn’t stray, or made her feel like he was doing this as a precursor to another round of intercourse.

It was enough to make her heart skip a beat, before her eyes fluttered close, as his gentle strokes lulled her to sleep.

Lub-dub … lub-dub … lub-dub…

She faintly wondered if she dreamed that musical laugh of his as she drifted into a dreamless sleep.


Chapter 82.


Lie.



Once Matthias was content she was fully clean, he tossed the used cloth into the silver basin, before tucking himself behind Leyla, and hugged her back to his chest. It was crystal clear to him that he’d left marks against her porcelain skin. He opted out of covering them with a blanket, wanting to admire her body some more as the warmth from the fireplace adequately kept the biting cold away.

She was sleeping soundly in his arms, and he couldn’t help but admire the hickeys left on her body. They had been fading since, and he made sure to mark the same spots as before.

She shuddered when a strong gust of wind breezed past them, before snuggling closer into him, letting out a satisfied smile when he tightened his arms around her. Still, she remained asleep.

Matthias continued to pet her, rubbing some friction on her skin whenever she’d shiver, and smiled to himself when she’d calm down at his touch. It was nice seeing her so content with him for a change, even if she was asleep.

His hands drifted down, snaking past her waist and down between her legs.

Leyla frowned when he brushed up against her still sensitive nub, and her eyes fluttered open, looking over her shoulder to glare at him. “Stop!” she hissed, trying to twist away from him, causing Matthias to chuckle in amusement.

“I said stop! We’ve done enough already!”

She grabbed tightly onto his wandering wrist and pulled it away from her nether regions and glared back at him in defiance. Even now, he still confused her by the sudden changes in the way he’d treat her back and forth.

There had been previous times they had gone on for more than just one round, but Leyla loved to forget it, quickly washing the memories off her mind whenever she’d shower once she got home.

It wasn’t that having sex was painful for her, in fact it was the opposite that made her worry.

It was getting increasingly difficult to deny herself the pleasure she was feeling during the activities. And every time they’d do it, she found her body more and more into it.


Fortunately, Matthias did stop attempting to push his fingers into her, instead wrapped his arms around her waist, while casually tucking her head against the nape of his neck as he turned her body towards him.

They were both locked into an intense stare-off with one another, making her look so petite compared to him. She was looking up at him with wide eyes, as a blush rose on her cheeks by how close they were.

He was looking at her with those soft eyes once more. And it made her heart skip a reluctant beat.

His hands moved back to her waist, giving her a gentle squeeze. He hiked himself up, and looked down on her face, tracing her features with a finger, before pulling away when he saw it made her uncomfortable.

“Come with me to the capital.” he whispered softly to her, a twinkling look in his eyes as though he was begging her to say yes. His hand stroked at her gently as Leyla refused to believe it was anything but a demand from him.

“Why should I?” she asked rather harshly, narrowing her eyes at him in contempt. It must be increasingly difficult for him to keep his mistress in Arvis, especially with the wedding drawing closer.

He probably wanted to move her quickly to the capital too, which would be best to do while he’s not yet tied down to Claudine.

“I remember you told me once you wanted to go to college there.” he supplied helpfully, and Leyla couldn’t help but scoff at him.

“So what? You want to send me off to college?” she asked incredulously, and Matthias nodded without a second to hesitate.

“If you wished to, I would.”

“Ha, no thank you.” Leyla huffed at him angrily, “I don’t want to add up my debts to you, and make you use it against me further.” she reminded him, turning away from him successfully, pulling the covers around them to cover her body.

Despite her bravado, Leyla couldn’t help but shudder at the animosity he was emitting behind her.

It was like she just stabbed him, by the way she casually threw his good intentions into his face, and implied she was selling him her body. A tense smile came over Matthias’ lips as he stared icily at Leyla’s back.

She knew exactly where he would hurt, and how to make it hurt worse. Such a clever bird he has, but Matthias was not her master for nothing, and he’d make her see it! If she wanted to believe they were in a give-and-take transaction, then he’d make it so!


“You think our bedtime activities would be enough to pay for college education? With your pisspoor performance?” he spat back harshly, before grabbing her by the head of her hair and slowly pulled him back towards him, making her gasp as she grabbed onto his wrists, looking positively frightened…

“Don’t grow cocky of yourself Leyla, it doesn’t suit you.” he warned. Her eyes blinked back unshed tears and she gulped.

“Then why are you even offering?” she asked him in frustration, face flushing in embarrassment.

Matthias hummed as he thought deeply how to answer her.

Truth be told, he didn’t have any ulterior reason why he wanted to fund her education. He just thought she would appreciate the opportunity, and he had the means to make it true. He could have just as well given her a mansion of equal value, but she wouldn’t appreciate that as much as a chance to be educated in her dream school.

“Believe it or not, I wanted to give you something out of kindness for a change.” he told her plainly, looking at her with cold eyes when she barked out a laugh in disbelief, refusing to believe him.

Deeming she had enough of his farce, she moved to get out of bed when he held her back, keeping her in place.

Matthias couldn’t believe just how brazen she’d become. While she grated at his nerves with her persistent rebellion against him, he much preferred it to the puppet-like behavior she had when she had been serving as Claudine’s aide, or in her death-like state as she curled in on herself in a cold, and darkened room.

Yes, she does possess a bull-headed stubbornness, but he liked this better than her helpless demeanor.

But that was just amongst the many things he couldn’t even begin to comprehend whenever he was with her.

The whole matter with Claudine was unavoidable, he knew that. She was his fiance, she had every right to be irked, and he had every duty to put Claudine’s needs above Leyla’s…

But it was unbecoming of him to openly embarrass Claudine in front of their noble acquaintances, even if it had been in an underhanded manner. After all, no matter what she did to Leyla during those past few days was less worse than what he’d been doing to her for weeks!

But even his entire deal with Leyla wasn’t going as smoothly as he wished. And he didn’t know how to make it so.

So he just kissed her, then and there, despite the way Leyla tried to dodge his advances, he just took, and took until the lust returned to him because it was all that made sense to him right now.


Leyla felt that warmth pooling in her once more as he spread her legs around his waist. Instinctively she grabbed him around the neck as he adjusted them, and in one swift move, buried himself balls deep inside her, making her moan against his lips.

But instead of resisting him this time, Leyla allowed his slow and gentle thrusts to continue as he pulled away. He rested his forehead against hers, and they locked eyes on one another. She knew deep down, the Duke was ever doing things that would give him pleasure. This was no different.

But to send her to her dream college out of the kindness of his heart? Ha! The thought was ridiculous, it made her laugh.

“You’re lying…” she gasped out, when he hit into her deeply, moaning at the contact. “All you do is lie…” she protested, stifling back the escaping sounds of pleasure from her mouth.

Matthias’ hips stuttered in their movements, before resuming at a quicker pace as he held onto their eye contact, trying to rid her of that hateful gaze directed at him. Her hold on him tightened, as her anger was blanketed with a wave of increasing pleasure…

She threw her head back in an unstoppable mewl, her hips moving in tandem with his, before she looked back at him resolutely with her own icy stare…

“I know everything about you now Duke.” she gasped against him. She thought she saw a hint of hurt in him when she called him a liar, and she wanted to drive that nail further into him even as he had her caught up in pleasure.

“You’re a liar by heart.” she moaned, biting into his shoulder, before pulling away when he hit her in that sweet spot once more. “All of you is a lie…” she sighed, and began to lose herself in the pleasure.

Matthias smirked disdainfully over her shoulder, his thrusts quick and deep into her, before swallowing whatever words she had for him next with a hungry kiss.

Perhaps she was right. Maybe he was lying. Maybe his entire persona was just a lie. But he’d been living in the pretense of that lie too long now…

He didn’t even know where the real him lies, or if it was even there anymore.


The next day, Leyla woke up early in the morning, and washed her face. She stretched her limbs to get rid of the lingering soreness from last night’s events as she changed her clothes and got ready for the day.


Just as she was about to begin her chores, a knock came at her door, startling her. With a frown, she went to open the door, and was greeted by the sight of Claudine’s maid.

Leyla stood there in shock, unaware of what she should do, when the maid suddenly bowed down in front of her.

“I’d like to apologize, Miss Lewellin, for my indiscretions.” the maid began, before straightening up, to present her hand, which presented Leyla with a healing gash. “I lied to my mistress that I couldn’t work, and that led you to be inconvenienced because of me.” She explained, though there was a stiffness in her.

Even when she was a child, Leyla could tell there was something a little bit off about the maid, despite having done her no wrong and continuously being polite towards her.

She was a little perplexed by the apology she was receiving now, but she wasn’t entirely surprised by this turn of events. She suspected something along the lines of this, but even if she did turn out right, Leyla had no will in her to confront Claudine about it.

In her mind, she deserved that little bit of unkindness from Lady Brandt. And nothing would have changed if she insisted on them to check if the maid was really unable to do her job.

As children, Leyla grew to fear Claudine because she knew she was a countess’ daughter. Had she in any way disobeyed the girl, she feared the repercussions her Uncle Bill would take because of it.

But now she was in trouble instead, and it was a stronger fear to someone else.

And the whole thing about making her a temporary servant, well, it wasn’t worse than the fact she was sleeping behind her back with the woman’s fiance. Leyla felt like a thief in the night, stealing something that isn’t supposed to be hers. It didn’t matter that she was blackmailed into it.

She still did it of her own volition, and in her eyes, and the rest should they discover it, it is still, undeniably, an affair.

The rest of the maid’s apologies to her were very polite and courteous towards Leyla. But she couldn’t hide how stiff her movements were, as if she’d rather be serving her mistress than be apologizing to Leyla.

And as Leyla looked into her eyes, she saw something more.

When the maid was finished explaining, Leyla accepted the apology, and the maid went on their way. Leyla shut the door once she was back on the road, before it clicked in her mind what she saw in the maid.

A hint of anger and disdain…

She knew it because she’d lately seen it reflected in her eyes. But it wasn’t directed to the duke, no… this was directed towards her.


Lost in the thought, wondering what she could have done to offend the maid, she found herself sitting on top of her bed, when a sickening feeling came over her…

‘Don’t tell me….,’

Leyla gasped, bringing a hand up to her mouth,

‘Does Claudine know after all!?’ she thought in absolute panic.

Her stomach churned uncomfortably the more she mulled over the thought. Just then, something bright was reflected at her, and Leyla winced when the light hit her eyes. She turned to look, and saw it was the jewelry box the Duke had given to her last night right before she left the annex.

There it lay innocently on top of her bedside table.

“What’s this?”

Leyla remembered asking when he’d given it to her. She had turned it over in her hand inquiringly, refusing to open it.

He’d taken it out of his coat pocket when she started clothing back up. She was busy picking her clothes, and looked up in shock when he’d suddenly stood in front of her, with the box in an outstretched hand.

“Open it.”

He implored her, grabbing her hand to put the box gently in her palms, closing her fingers around it. She then reached out for her glasses, and wore it on her face to see it clearly.

She gasped in shock when she opened the lid, and revealed an intricately designed bird, with golden wings. It was a pendant, clipped to a chain that could be worn. It was laid artistically against the red velvet box, as though it was nesting in it, ready to take flight.

It oddly reminded her of those crystal birds she’d seen decorated over the arched aisle of the Museum back in Ratz. They were so beautiful to look at too!

She almost dropped the masterpiece when the implication came over her. She refused to believe he was giving this to her because of that day!

She looked up at him in disbelief, and saw the way he also regarded the intricate design in a fond manner, before they locked eyes. And not a second later, the emotion she read from him was gone, making her believe she just imagined it.

“Why are you giving me this?” she demanded from him, but it came out in a wobbly voice, just above a whisper.

Did he really remember that moment? Did he make it because of that? For her?!


“I know you like it.” he answered plainly to her, bringing her an odd sense of disappointment when he elaborated no further. Leyla only grew more confused, desperately stamping out the blooming hope and adoration in her chest.

He can’t do these things!

He can’t just expect her to swoon back into his arms, as though the past weeks were nothing! She won’t let him! She refused to let him!

Her breathing grew ragged, worrying Matthias who stepped closer to look at her, and see why she was reacting in such a way to his gift. She tried to look away from him, but he’d grasped her chin, and made her look up, searching her for an answer…

‘No!’ she had thought at the time, and swiftly shut the box to a close and handed it back out to him.

Matthias’ eyes narrowed at that action, but remained silent, not moving to take it back.

“I don’t like it anymore.” she had spat back at him, holding her chin up high as she glared up at him, “I don’t even need it. So just take it back.” she told him, “Throw it away if you must, cause I don’t want it.”

Memories of the cool crystals beneath her fingertips rushed to her mind. There were so many of them in that museum, and she had been so happy when she found that the Duke had lifted her up so she could reach out and enjoy them.

But that moment was meaningless in the face of recent tragedies. It was gone, and she could never go back to that foolish girl before.

Matthias had stared at the velvet box in silence for a long time before he finally turned away from her, before he turned back. There was a tension in his body that Leyla hadn’t noticed before.

“Then why don’t you throw it away yourself?” Matthias challenged, glaring right back at her in that indifferent stare. He then turned on his heels, and left her alone in his room with a loud bang, echoing throughout the empty halls of the annex.

And then they parted ways after that.

She didn’t know why she didn’t throw it away when she’d left the annex. By all rights, she should. But something in her wanted to keep it.

She couldn’t just let it go, that Leyla that had been so carefree before, she wanted her back. She wanted to be her once more…

“You’re going to be a pretty good adult.”

Uncle Bill had once told her, so confident in her future. She’d believed him when he told her that, but now it was like she was being choked up by her shame and disappointment in what she’d become.


Not wanting to look at it anymore, Leyla grabbed the box, and hid it deep under her bed. She may not be able to throw it away, but she can keep it out of sight, and out of mind until she would forget about it.

Chapter 83.


Without knowing that Love is Love.



Back in Arvis mansion, was Claudine. She was currently sitting in front of her vanity, her aide brushing up her beautiful locks, and making sure there were no tangles in them. Things were silent between them for a while, until Claudine broke it.

“I’m sorry you had to go through that, Mary.” Claudine began, and met her aide’s eyes in the mirror. Immediately, Mary gently put the brush down on the table, before kneeling beside her mistress and took her hands in hers.

“Oh please don’t say that my Lady,” she said to Claudine, looking up at her with tearful eyes, “It was my fault really, I should’ve behaved more properly, and have not troubled you so!” Claudine only smiled kindly at her.

“It wasn’t anyone’s fault but mine,” Claudine replied calmly, “And yet I let you take the blame, when it shouldn’t have been you who got in trouble.” she sighed, and then stood up gracefully.


She went in front of the floor-length mirror, Mary following her dutifully, as she assessed how she looked. She was preparing to greet the Crown Prince and his wife. She must look elegant in doing so, even if she was just one of the hostesses in the estate.

“Truly, I won’t forget what you did for me back there,” Claudine told her when she turned back around, “Thank you so much Mary, I mean it.” Mary’s eyes welled up with tears at how kind and beautiful her mistress was to her.

Mary had been one of House Brandt’s servants who’d been with them for many years. Though in all her years of servitude, this was really the first personal gratitude she received from her ward. It broke her heart to see her mistress so helpless back there.

Her Lady, Claudine Brandt, should have the right to hold her head up high, as she belonged among the proud noble family of a Count. Which was why she couldn’t hold back her thoughts on the matter…

“It’s all because of Leyla, isn’t it?” she asked her mistress, who blinked at her before shaking her head in finality.

“Don’t bother thinking about it Mary.” she dissuaded, because really, it wasn’t like it should matter much to her. Satisfied with her appearance, Claudine and her aide exited her chambers to walk around the mansion, inspecting some last minute preparations.

It would be a while before the royal couple would actually arrive, but Claudine couldn’t stay cooped up in her guest room as she waited for them. So she decided to go strolling along the still-renovating greenhouse, careful not to dirty her clothes among the dirt and debris.

The general sight was still the same, but at least the new repairs were beginning to take shape, as the framing of the wrecked parts were almost in completion. She turned towards the solarium afterwards, wanting to visit the place where the plants and birds that survived had been moved to.

The sight of the greenhouse only served to rile her up, her anger at the careless gardener returning, when a familiar voice caught her attention amidst all the noise around her. She turned around, and saw Riette, smiling expectantly at her…

“My Lady, it’s so good to see you!” he greeted her, lightly grabbing her hand, to press a kiss on her knuckles, “Are you feeling better today?” he asked her in genuine concern. They hadn’t seen each other in a while, and Claudine could only smile at him.

They both sat down at the table in front of the solarium, where the sweet scent of the flowers wafted over them, and the soft singing of birds replaced the incessant construction noises.

“I’m feeling much better, thank you for asking.” Claudine replied sweetly at him, he only beamed right back at her.


“It was my pleasure.” he then sat himself down from across her, and they began conversing. Each of them was regalling the other with tales of what they did when they were away, Riette more so than Claudine, when she steered the topic to something else.

“To be honest, I think the entire problem was because of Leyla.” she admitted to him, “The rest of it was simply a stupid idea.” Riette sighed, and looked around them, before leaning closer to her, and lowered his voice.

“I think you worry too much,” Riette tried comforting her, “Us men do crazy stuff when it comes to women, believe me, sooner or later his appetite will curb.” Claudine couldn’t help but laugh dryly.

“If he were like other men, I wouldn’t be this worried.” she pointed out, “But this is Matthias we’re talking about.”

At that, Riette couldn’t form any rebuttal, because it was true. Matthias wasn’t like any other man Riette knew or met before. His early arrival had been unexpected. And to the rest of their companions that day, Matthias had only acted like a true gentleman should with his fiance, and defended her honor successfully against the deceitful maid.

That brought a bitter taste to Riette.

“Have you ever seen him so attached to anyone before?” she asked him curiously. Riette sighed tiredly at the question.

“No,” he answered without hesitation, “I don’t even think he’s attached to his mother.” Riette pointed out. It was a bit of an exaggeration, Riette would admit to himself, but never out loud.

“I just can’t get my head around why he’s so invested with a servant girl.” she exclaimed, making Riette look at her tiredly.

“Technically speaking, Leyla isn’t a servant in Arvis.” he pointed out dryly, making Claudine roll her eyes at him.

“Details.” she scoffed, “It doesn’t matter what she is, my question remains the same.” She took a deep breath to calm herself down. “I should have realized sooner he’d lied back then, I can’t believe I’d been so blind.” she muttered softly, scolding her past self for her incompetence.

On that past summer morning, Claudine had seen Matthias walking alone, on that day someone had broken into the gardener’s cabin. She initially thought he’d be headed to the annex, which was along the way. She had been there earlier, cutting some roses for that flower arrangement she wanted in the garden, when she decided to follow him, curious as to what he was doing so early in the morning.

All she knew was that Matthias didn’t want anyone to visit him when he went by the annex, which only made her curiouser to what he really did back there. So with a basket full of roses, she followed him.


He moved quickly through the forest, and Claudine struggled to keep up with him, when she saw the most unexpected sight in front of her. Matthias had halted in his tracks, and so she followed his gaze, and found out why.

Walking towards him was an unfamiliar man. She’d never seen him before as any of Matthias’ associates, and quickly hid behind one of the trees. Something was telling her she should not have witnessed this.

It wasn’t out of character for Matthias to meet with random strangers, Claudine knew she couldn’t know everyone he made business with, but she could tell this was different. And then Matthias resumed walking, not even stopping again when the man passed him by.

She had stayed there for a while, confused as to what she just saw before she opted to return back to the mansion instead. It wasn’t long until they received word that Leyla’s money, which was for her tuition, had been stolen.

The officers had come by asking questions around the Duke’s residence, and Claudine found herself invested in the matter as well, when she saw them questioning Matthias. When they asked him if he’d seen any suspicious individual around the estimated time of the crime, Matthias denied having seen anyone.

She knew he’d seen that man, but she couldn’t piece together why he had lied. She opted back then it was best not to contradict him, but she did suspect it was because of Leyla. Which she now believed was the right and only assumption to what happened back then.

After all, the real culprit had been revealed as Mrs. Etman, who was against her son’s marriage with the poor girl from the very beginning. And she’s certain her fiance wants Leyla for himself.

Claudine had laughed mirthlessly to herself when she found out.

Her fiance, the Duke, was wasting his time devising elaborate schemes, just to keep a servant girl by his side? She shuddered at the thought. He even went as far as destroying one of Leyla’s best prospects.

She had thought Matthias von Herhardt was going to be different from the other men she had the displeasure of knowing. But alas, he’s just another one of those sleazy types, who thought they could get away with a mistress on the side. How dare he try and compare her to Leyla?

She felt absolutely mortified and humiliated when she realized he sought things she could not give from someone of a lower stature than her!

As though sensing her growing turmoil, Riette broke the silence between them, to get her to listen to him.

“Fret not Claudine,” Riette called out to her, pulling her from her thoughts as she looked back at him, “Even if he is attached to the girl, Matthias is practical. He knows she’s not fit for the role as his Duchess.”


“You really think so?” she asked him softly, the worry imminent in her eyes, and Riette reached out to clasped her hand comfortingly over the table.

“I know so.” Riette told her, “He’d be a fool to choose her over you as the Duchess.”

But Claudine still seemed convinced that something was bound to go wrong. And Riette couldn’t have her getting in trouble like she did just a short while back then.

“I get that you’re worried, but I advise you to let them be.” Riette pleaded with her. “Matthias doesn’t get love!” he pointed out, making Claudine frown at him.

“What do you mean by leaving them alone?”

“Look,” he sighed, “Sooner or later, his actions will make him lose her. So just let their affair exist as is, don’t bother trying to break them apart sooner.”

“Are you that confident he’s that unaware of his feelings for her?” she asked him sharply, and he nodded confidently.

“How could he? He’s never been in love before.” he rebutted, “All his life, he’s been given what he wants without really having to work for it, and then quickly discards it when it’s no longer his fancy.”

“I still don’t think he’s that unaware of his feelings.” Claudine scoffed, when Riette held onto her hands tighter.

“Claudine please, I tell you this with utter concern for you,” he held her gaze, hoping she will understand he’s only saying this for her own good, “Don’t try to provoke Matthias, it won’t end well.”

He wants to see his most beloved succeed in her life, even if it means she has to be his cousin’s wife, he’d make sure nothing would stand in her way.

He couldn’t help but laugh dryly at himself at how pathetic he was becoming. Nevertheless, he truly wanted her to be happy. And as she was determined it would be as the Duchess Herhardt, he’d be happy to spend time with her in whatever way she can spare for him.

Just like at this moment.

“Don’t do what you did to Leyla again,” he warned her, “That could only push Matthias to see what she truly means to him.” Claudine stared at him curiously, prompting him to elaborate, “A person’s heart is a fickle thing, my Lady,” he smiled ruefully towards her, “Once you realize you’re in love, you can’t stop loving them so easily.”

‘Just like I can’t stop loving you.’ he confessed to her in his mind.

Suddenly, there was a rush of commotion outside, making Riette pull his hand away from her. Not a minute later, Matthias strode in, all dressed in his best suit and nodded towards his cousin, before holding a hand out to Claudine.


“We must make haste, my Lady,” Matthias told her urgently, “The Crown Prince and his wife are about to arrive.”

Gone was that cold look he’d thrown at her when he cornered her in front of their noble acquaintances. He now wore a graceful smile and polite gestures for her instead, and Claudine couldn’t help but flutter her eyes beautifully up at him in response.

She took his gloved hand with a smile.

“Of course, my Duke.”

Matthias nodded to him briefly, and quickly, the pair walked out of the solarium, leaving Riette to smile bitterly to himself at their retreating backs.

What a pair they made.

He shook the unbidden thoughts of Claudine and his cousin together, opting to just get up and get ready for the royal couple’s arrival as well. He arrived shortly after the engaged couple, joining the line of nobles who were there to greet the prince as well.

Somewhere off to the side, Riette caught sight of Leyla, amongst the other commoners, who were out to greet the prince as well.

The royals’ car came to a stop right in front of the mansion, and flashes went flickering left and right as photographers fought to get a good angle in capturing the Crown Prince’s arrival.

Despite being a friend of the Duke’s, the visit was an official event, as the Crown Prince was officially touring the entire Empire. They had to follow some protocol to welcome him officially into Arvis.

Leyla had been to many of these official visits before, but never one as extravagant as this one. Case in fact, the larger crowds gathered around her, and the amazing reception prepared for them.

Though she was among many people, Leyla stood with the crowd in anxious tension. She anticipated she’d see the Duke of Arvis, along his arm would be Lady Brandt. And she did see them when they arrived. They were front and center of the Prince’s welcoming committee after all.

They looked graceful, and poised. All powerful and calm in front of the raging crowd. It was difficult for her to connect him with the passionate man she’d been with every night, as opposed to this dignified persona of his.

Tonight, he was a nobleman.

Something was stinging in her eyes the more she watched Matthias and Claudine standing there together, welcoming the Prince with happy smiles. They descended the steps, hand in hand as they exchanged pleasantries with the Crown Prince.


She could tell they were close, never mind she couldn’t hear what they were saying from where she stood. Even Lady Brandt seemed well acquainted with the Prince’s wife.

She glanced down on her uniform, adorned with the Herhardt’s insignia. She unclasped her hands in front of her, and tucked them behind her instead as she felt herself beginning to tremble.

She wasn’t holding onto anything, but they trembled as she felt the ghost of a feeling beneath her fingers. It was achingly similar to when she’d stroke them against those crystalline figures in the museum.

It also achingly reminded her of the coin purse’s heavy weight in her hand when Claudine had the maid pay her.

She kept her head bowed down low, staring intently on her shoes, as the Crown Prince and his entourage climbed up the steps. She sighed in relief when they passed her by, and finally looked up, before freezing in place…

Lady Claudine was looking right at her. She was smiling brightly in her direction, and Leyla’s hand tightened around her fingers as the ghost weight felt heavier and heavier in her hands.

She could even hear the loud way the coins jingled as she moved.

And so she stood there, amongst the crowd in the pale afternoon sun, casting long shadows over her frozen form.



Chapter 84.


My Little Bird.




Mrs. Grever’s house was located a little farther from the Capital city. During its rapid development, much of the neighborhood was turned into an idyllic rural setting, equipped with well-maintained roads for ease of transportation. Flanking the roads were rows of beautifully made houses, constructed with wooden frames and paneling.


Leyla decided that today was as good as a day to pay her a visit. She had bought a beautiful array of a bouquet to bring with her as a gift, along with a jar of jam that was made with the best summer fruits harvested in Arvis.

She drew closer to Mrs. Grever house as she commuted towards the center of the boulevard, where she could see the green-roofed house. She had her transport stop a few blocks away, before she gathered her gifts into her arms.

She then rang the doorbell as soon as she got in front of the door. She waited for a few moments, hearing muffled sounds of footsteps getting closer, before the door swung open to reveal Mrs. Grever. The older woman beamed at the sight of her, ecstatically inviting her inside.

“Oh Leyla! I’m so glad you finally arrived!” Mrs. Grever greeted, “When you told me you would be visiting, I couldn’t help but get up earlier than usual.” she immediately began telling Leyla, “I apologize in advance if I seem a little tired.”

Leyla only smiled at her pleasantly, before she looked around.

“Am I the last one here?” she couldn’t help but ask consciously, before looking down on her wrist-watch. She didn’t think she arrived too late, in fact, she was ten minutes earlier than the appointed time of their meeting. Mrs. Grever only waved her worries away.

“Oh, don’t worry, you’re not even late.” she told Leyla, and waved her over to follow her to the dining room, where everyone was gathered, “The others just got here a little too early, they’ve all been eager to hear about the Crown Prince’s arrival from you.”

Leyla blinked in surprise, before she saw her fellow young teachers gathered around the table, chatting amicably with one another. Upon her arrival, they all turned to look at her, before greeting her excitedly, immediately making space between them for her.

Even Mrs. Grever seemed to anticipate her tale about the Crown Prince’s arrival with his wife. Leyla couldn’t help but feel a little bit overwhelmed by the expectation. She wasn’t really paying attention to the prince and his family as much as she was looking at the Duke in anticipation.

When she asked them what they wanted to know about the Crown Prince’s arrival, they wasted no time bombarding her with questions, one after the next like excitable little children.

“Tell us about the Crown Prince! Did you really see him?!”

“Did you see his wife?”

“I heard they had twin babies! Were they there?!”

“Oh I wish I could have gone, you’re so lucky Miss Lewellin!”

“Yeah, I only saw the pictures in the newspaper, it must have been a sight to see in person!”


Leyla looked from one person to the next, before she laughed awkwardly, holding her hands up in a placating manner as she tried to get them to calm down a little bit.

“I’m not sure how much help I could be, I was some ways away from the entourage after all.” She then held up one of the newspapers lying on the table with the pictures of the Prince’s arrival, “The pictures here though seemed really detailed, I couldn’t even see this much from where I was standing.” she pointed out.

“Oh boo-hoo!” piped up one of the younger teachers, “What matters is you got to be there in person!” they squealed.

“Yeah!” The others agreed readily.

“Oh, aren’t the Duke and the Crown Prince best friends or something?” another piped up in the middle of the conversation.

Leyla’s stomach dropped at the mention of the Duke, and cold sweat began to escape her temples at the anticipation of where this conversation was going. Fortunately, Mrs. Grever had the foresight to give her a glass of water when she had sat down on the table.

She grabbed it nervously, staring at it resolutely while she took a sip of water. The other teachers seemed to be content letting her be for now, which she was thankful for. The conversation between the teachers flowed easily between the Crown Prince, the Duke and even Marquis Lindman.

“Well personally, I think the Duke’s the coolest between the three.” Mrs. Grever haughtily declared among the young teachers, “Don’t you agree so too, Leyla?”

“Huh?” Leyla blinked, finally back to the conversation, as she noticed the others were now quiet as they waited to hear her answer.

“I said the Duke’s the coolest among the three, don’t you agree too?” she prompted, looking expectantly at Leyla.

“Oh, now that I think about it, Leyla’s met them all in person now!”

“Hey, that’s right!”

“She could tell us better who’s cooler between the Crown Prince, Duke Herhardt and Marquis Lindman!”

Leyla looked like a deer caught in headlights. She looked back and forth at them with a nervous smile on her face as she struggled to formulate her words.

“I, I…” she began to stutter, when one of her fellow teachers answered on her behalf.

“I think Leyla’s opinion is a bit biased Mrs. Grever,” they pointed out, “There’s no question she’s going to choose Duke Herhardt, after all, he practically saved her uncle.”


She quickly nodded along to the teacher’s words. She knows they mean it well, and they were all just having pleasant fun, but at the mention of her uncle, the conversation shifted into praising the Duke’s action for dropping the charges.

Her heart sank the more she listened in on them.

‘A savior they say?’ she couldn’t help but think rather bitterly in her mind. ‘If only they know why he dropped them.’

The rest of the visit went by without a hitch, allowing Leyla to enjoy the company and food when the conversation about the Crown Prince and Arvis died down, and shifting to school and their student shenanigans.

They all parted ways with light hearts and a full stomach, bidding their host, Mrs. Grever goodbye, with a promise to return sometime soon.

Upon her way back home, Leyla decided to stop by at a grocery store along the way. Supplies for home were running short, she should stock up while she’s still outside.

As she passed through the entrance, she wasn’t surprised to see another one of those newspapers with the Crown Prince’s arrival as a headline displayed in the front rack. However, the picture on it made her heart flutter, along with an unfamiliar pang in her heart…

On the centerpiece of the headline, was an image of the Crown Prince and Duke Herhardt shaking hands, while smiling towards the cameras. Beside the prince was his wife…

And beside the Duke, was Lady Brandt.



In the few days that the Crown Prince and his wife were in Arvis, it was filled with a long life of parties and dinners to attend. Fortunately, the Prince had stated he wouldn’t attend more gatherings until the dinner event to be held in the Herhardt Family’s mansion.

This allowed the busy atmosphere to die down in Arvis, giving the servants some room to breathe, as well as their hosts. Come luncheon time, the Crown Prince was accompanied by both Matthias and Riette.

The Crown Prince regalled them with the current events around the parts of the continent he recently toured. Riette had been lying languidly across the sofa, while the other two sat on wing chairs. As he listened attentively, he couldn’t help but interrupt the Prince politely.

“Forgive my interruption, your highness,” Riette began and the Prince nodded for him to continue, “I can’t help but realize that most of the noble families in the continent are bound by blood.”

“Yes, that is true.” the Prince nodded.


“Well then, shouldn’t the discord between their families be easily resolved, taking that fact into consideration?” Riette asked in all seriousness, despite the ease of his current position. The prince could only smile, albeit a little sadly at his opinion.

“You would think that would be the case, but the opposite is true in this case,” the Prince explained, “In most of history, it’s the arguments between families that end up having brutal aftermaths.” he sighed resignedly, before looking over at the Duke.

Matthias had been content to sit out of the conversation. He just remained sitting on his wing chair, as he stared intently into the flames cackling in the fireplace. The melody of the waltz danced around them in soft volumes. His feet tapping along with the beat, head swinging along as he relaxed.

But the Crown Prince had a keen eye, and he’s been observing the Duke for some time now. He knew the more quiet the Duke got, the more his mind was being troubled.

“And what of your thoughts Captain Herhardt?” the Prince called out, making Matthias snap his eyes over to his two companions.

“You’ve been on the frontlines before, what do you think about the looming threat of a war in the continent? Are we able to win it this time around as well?” Riette asked, finally sitting up, genuinely curious about his cousin’s thoughts on the matter.

Matthias breathed in deeply, running simulations in his head as he also straightened up in his seat. His finger drummed on the arm rests, staring into the flames with a frown, before he turned back to his two companions.

“I don’t think things will be as easy as the previous ones this time around.” Matthias admitted calmly.

“The tensions between Berg and Lovita are simple, and we do stand a good chance of winning,” Matthias began to elaborate, “But the scale of a war between the two won’t be kept small.”

The Crown Prince hummed in dry agreement, having already known about that, the royal family’s war council already making the same predictions.

“I thought as much.” the Crown Prince sighed, as a sullen air settled around the three of them.

Riette hadn’t been wrong when he pointed out all the nobles had some blood relations with each other.

If you’d trace them far back enough, you can tell which side they’re connected to.

But the fighting between the powerful families in the continent was growing day by day. Each one has garnered multitudes of connections through the generations. They’ve cultivated these connections, and treaties have interlocked with each other.

It was just one mess growing bigger the more it spread down the line, affecting many more families and businesses within the empire. Soon enough, the war between two regions would become a war for the whole continent.


“Well, look on the bright side, Your Highness,” Riette interjected when he noticed the gloomy atmosphere, “This threat has been going on since my father’s time. Still there’s been no actual war happening. I’m sure we’ll breeze past through this until we’re all old and gray with nothing ever really happening.” Riette joked about, before he stopped and sighed.

“Although in the event it does happen, we’ll be there in the middle of it, aiming to return as war heroes!” Riette proudly declared, making the Prince chuckle good-naturedly at his attempts to lighten the mood.

“By the way Riette,” the Prince began as he regarded the Marquis with a thoughtful look, “You’re looking a little too serious there yourself. Where did our Riette go?” he exchanged looks with Matthias who only shrugged back at him, “You’re making me all nervous with being all proper!” the Prince teased.

Riette gasped in an exaggerated manner, before mockingly swooning on the couch as he shook his head, while he lay back down on the sofa.

“I wouldn’t dare to show my disgracefulness in front of such an esteemed figure!” Riette gasped out loudly, making the Prince bark out in laughter at Riette’s dramatics. And just like that, the air was lifted around them as the Prince was thrown back in pleasant nostalgia.

Even when they were children, things were always like this. And though many years have passed, and they spent time less and less with each other as their responsibilities grew, the Prince was glad that they could still behave like this around each other as though they were kids once more.

Matthias had smiled and responded accordingly with the conversation, before leaving them both to their own devices as he decided it was more interesting to look out the window. He had noticed Leyla had gone out in the late morning, and was eager to catch sight of her return.

She had been dressed beautifully today, that was enough to make him forget about their last conversation. That one had been grating across his thoughts painfully and insistently since she left him.

‘So she didn’t like the gift, huh?’ Matthias thought, as a tension settled in his jaw. She wasn’t happy with the gift he presented her with.

If it was true that being useful and pleasurable in company was the true worth of a mistress, well, Leyla’s been the farthest example of that by far. He could dig deeper into his thoughts as to why he’s so reluctant to let her go, but it doesn’t seem worth it to him.

All he knew, and was comfortable to understand, was that he just wanted to keep her beside him for as long as possible. Even if it meant enduring the endless hate she spewed at him. He’d keep her by his side until his dying breath.

She was his alone, and his to use. No one else’s. His little canary.

A devious smirk gave way to his lips as he took a careful sip of the lukewarm tea.


He could still feel the ghost of her locks running across his palms; still see the silhouette of her quivering form due to his ministrations; hear the echoes of her voice as she gasped and moaned because of him…

The more he got to know the inside and out of Leyla Lewellin, the prettier she got in his eyes.

Especially if she was in tears. Which reminded him, it had been a while since he last made her cry for him.

Just the thought was enough to make him grip his cup tightly, as the urge to seek her out and see her tears grew inside him. Matthias couldn’t understand his obsession with her. It was like he was going crazy without her, and he had no will to stop it from happening.

Their first night together had been pure bliss for him. All of his senses drowning in her essences, embracing him in a way he always sought for, yet so much better!

His thoughts and feelings drowned in her, and he happily let it overtake him if it meant he’d get to have her for himself. At that moment, she was all he could process, as though she was the only thing in the world he needed to be alive…

To feel alive.

In his research in taking care of a bird, he’d stumbled upon the knowledge of covering the bird’s eyes, and cutting off their feathers from their wings. The bird would tremble in your palm as you prevented them from seeing you trim their wings…

And when it’s all over, they would flap to fly, but found they could no longer go that far away from you.

Matthias had perfected it on his little canary bird. He’d dutifully covered the little canary’s eyes with a soft piece of handkerchief, as he trimmed the feathers. He’d watch as they fluttered to the ground with satisfaction before blowing it a kiss and removing the blinds as he showered it with clear affection, before letting it rest inside its cage.

Lately he found the strange urge overcoming him. When his canary nestled lovingly in his palm, he wanted nothing more than to close his fingers around its trusting form…

And then squeeze it. But then he’d catch himself, and focused on the beautiful songs his canary would chirp for him, and the urge would go away.

The same urge kept coming whenever he’d hug Leyla. But unlike his canary, who’d sing to ease him, she endlessly refused him. She kept struggling to escape him, and that just made him want to see her cry, and stop time just so he could cherish those tears flowing out of her…

The only ones she seemed to freely give him.

But he desired to have her, take all of her and keep her for himself. If he could, he would have swallowed her all up in one go during their sexual intercourses.

“Matthias?”

Matthias was brought back to the present at the sound of his name. He looked to the sides, and saw his companions looking at him inquiringly as they both stood beside him. Only then did he notice the gathered servants in front of the open door.

It seemed he got a little too distracted by Leyla after all. He didn’t like being caught unaware like this.

He put the cup down gently, before standing up, brushing off their inquiring gazes at him as though it was nothing.

Finally, it was dinner in the Arvis Mansion, and the servants began to escort them towards the dining room, while Matthias waited in the back to lock his study.

Just before he’d close the door behind him, a stray thought wandered into his mind.

‘Had Leyla come back?’ he couldn’t help but wonder, feeling a strange worry come over him at the thought she hadn’t returned yet. Which didn’t make sense to him. After all, where else could she return to but here?

He swiftly shut and locked the door before he decided to go back to his room to prepare for dinner.

As he walked through the long hallways, with the fading sun casting orange hues in the walls, he can’t help but think about her again. A cold dread settling in his gut at the thought of her not coming back…

‘What if she decides it’s not worth it coming back?’

Reaching his room with his attendant, Matthias wasted no time changing as he mulled over that thought.

Leyla couldn’t dare leaving Bill Remmer on his own. She looked up to him her whole life, she couldn’t just up and leave him behind.

‘But if it meant she could leave me, then… could she?’ Matthias wondered instead.

Would she really leave? Because of him?

His movements halted just as he was about to secure his cuffs. The cold feeling grew inside him. He could tell it was anger, or nervousness. He’d felt those before, and this wasn’t it.

“Master?” his attendant called out worriedly when he noticed Matthias’ movements paused. Immediately, his master’s movements resumed, quickly finishing securing the cuff links and turned around, to have his coat buttoned up.

Once Matthias had buttoned up the coat around him, the attendant busied themselves with brushing some stray dust and flint all over Matthias as his master stood still in front of his floor-length mirror.


Matthias was thinking about the first time he tried trimming his canary’s feathers. The little bird struggled incessantly in his grasp, making him cut more than he should, causing blood to ooze out its wings.

He’d been worried at first, but was relieved to find his canary alive by the next day. He liked knowing it couldn’t fly away from him. Adored the pitiful sight of its struggles in fact. It wasn’t until it fluttered nervously towards him, and chirped beautifully for him that he got the sense the bird loved him.

It’s feathers would grow back, but even if he were to accidentally cut more than he should, the bird loved him. It regarded him as their home. It wouldn’t want to leave him.

Though he can help but think it would be better if the bird couldn’t fly permanently too. He wouldn’t need to put it in a cage, he’d just let it wander free forever in his sights. They’d be freer that way too.

“You’re all set, master.” The attendant called out to him once more, bowing his head dutifully at Matthias.

Matthias took one last glance of his appearance in the mirror’s frame, before nodding to the attendant in satisfaction. He casted another glance outside his bedroom window, looking over the fading shadows of the trees that stretched across the road the further the sun set in the skies…

Leyla was still nowhere to be seen.


Chapter 85.



Crack.



Mark Evers was Duke Herhardt’s current attendant. As he followed after his master, he couldn’t help but feel a little perplexed by his recent actions.

He’d been working in the Arvis Mansion for many years now. He’s filled up every position, from a lowly servant, to an apprentice to the head butler, Hessen, down to the Duke’s attendant. He’d been them all. He’d witnessed many things about them too, but not this.

This wasn’t the Duke he was accustomed to.

He’d noticed it for a while now, how unfocused his master had been, even in the presence of the Royal couple. It wasn’t like him. The Duke had always been attentive, even though he pretended not to be interested. So when he spaced out back there, Mark could tell something was amiss for his Master.

Suddenly, Matthias stopped, startling Mark by his sudden change.

His master was turned towards the window, his gaze resolutely looking out the window with an intense look in his eyes. Mark couldn’t help but follow his gaze.

And there, he spotted her just as she was passing through the garden, basking in the fading light of the sun as the skies gradually darkened, was Leyla. She was headed for the forest path, located just behind the mansion as she carried a large bag in her arms.

Mark opted to wait for his master patiently, instead of breaking his reverie for them to get to the dining room promptly. Leyla must have gone grocery shopping, and was now just returning. Though her load looked rather heavy. It mustn’t be, for she was walking at a leisurely pace, neither in a hurry nor struggling.

‘She’s back,’ Matthias thought with a certain relief, ‘Leyla’s returned.’ Matthias remained looking at her beautiful figure, enamored by the sway of her french braid with every step she took further into the forest.

It didn’t escape Mark’s notice how the stiffness in his master’s form slowly eased out of his shoulders the longer he stared at the unsuspecting girl. She didn’t even bother looking towards the mansion.


Matthias gaze trailed over her body, taking in every detail. Like the way her coat and skirt fluttered with the winter breeze, revealing some of her porcelain leg’s fair skin. He watched as she paused for a while, shaking something off of her before continuing on her path.

Belatedly, he remembered it was supposed to be colder than usual today, and he couldn’t help but frown at her carelessness. She must have been commuting too, because she wasn’t pedaling her way back home, which meant she walked all the way from the entrance of the estate.

‘What a foolish woman, trying to brave the cold with such a heavy load on her shoulders.’ Matthias mentally berated her. Deciding he’s had enough, he resumed his pace, and continued on his way to the dining area.

But even though he walked away, his mind stayed resolutely on the retreating woman.

Even the sight of her was enough to call attention to those unfamiliar sensations he’d been feeling around her lately.

“There you are, my Duke!” Claudine greeted him brightly as she came forward to welcome him into the lounge area, where their other guests were currently assembled at. Matthias politely smiled back at her, offering her his arm before she snaked her own over his forearm.

His arrival drew the attention of the crowd as they all welcomed him back.

“You were taking too long, so I decided I should go look for you.” Claudine informed him, “I got worried something happened, it isn’t like you to be late to these events.” she pointed out. Matthias absentmindedly patted her gloved hands.

“I apologize, my Lady, for worrying you.” he said, looking down at her indifferently, “I took longer than expected to be prepared for dinner.”

Claudine regarded him carefully for a moment, before giving him a small smile.

“Well, I’m glad to know you’re alright, after all.” she then turned back to their guests, pulling away from him. She conversed with each and every one of their guests naturally with ease. Matthias observed her in a pensive manner.

She was going to be the perfect Duchess. A fact he was glad for, and couldn’t deny. Still, his thoughts kept returning to Leyla. His eyes kept trailing to Claudine, following her movements in the room as she drew closer to his mother, and grandmother, who were close to the Crown Prince and his wife.

The light from the fireplace casted a faint orange glow all over the lounge’s occupants.

Marriage was just another business transaction in their circle. The more powerful or influential the family, the better. This was true for him as it was with anyone in his shoes and Claudine was the best candidate he was presented with.


A marriage to her would just cement the Herhardts more into their place of power. But was that all marriage was?

He wasn’t one to question his decisions, so why was he starting now?

There was a flickering of light from the room’s chandelier, before it brightened up the room indefinitely. Matthias, along with the other guests, squinted at the sudden brightness. Seconds later, Hessen came into the room, announcing that dinner had been served.

One by one, their guests made their way to the dining room, leaving Matthias as the last one to leave.

There in the middle of the lounge, he could see clearly the portraits of his predecessors, as though they were staring at him.

As though they sensed how he was wavering.

“My duke?” Claudine called out, who looked back at him, and Matthias wasted no time in catching up with the rest of his guests, escorting his fiance down the stairs and through the long halls leading up to the dining room.

It was fortunate that Matthias had enough foresight to have the generator as one of the first to be repaired. It made the chandelier in their dining room look more majestic, showing off it’s exquisite shine as it basked their guests in a bright white glow.

On the long table were rows of their best silverware and cutlery. In the middle of the table was lined ornate candelabras, along with a few cut orchids in vases and some sculpted desk ornaments.

All this served as reminders for Matthias that he was a powerful person. He’s the Duke of Arvis, and is well-respected, and highly regarded in both society and among royalty. He had all this in his possession…

And yet his mistress walked in freezing temperatures on uneven ground. He could almost imagine her back in her cabin, sitting alone in front of a shabby table, with a poor excuse of a fireplace illuminating her.

“Duke Herhardt.” Claudine’s voice called out for him, taking him out of his reverie, and looked over to her. She wordlessly gestured over to the seat in front of him.

It was odd. He’d known her since they were children, yet all of a sudden, it was like he was in a room filled with strangers.

“Matthias?” Claudine called him softly once more, looking up at him in a confused manner. He acknowledged her once more, before finally taking his own seat, along with a few others.

Dinner was just beginning.



The royal couple stayed in Arvis for a total of five days before they finally moved on.

On their last day, all of Arvis’ employees lined up in front of the mansion as they all bid the royal couple and their entourage goodbye. Leyla had been part of the group, and stood with the same crowd she was with on the day of their arrival.

The security made things such a hassle to move along, but there was also a sense of dismay in the air once they realized their guests would be leaving.

In all that time the Crown Prince and his wife were in Arvis, Leyla had not been visited by the Duke, at all. It was almost like he even forgot about her. He sent her no note, not even from Phoebe. There was also no summon for her.

She just got to live her recent days worry and stress free from the Duke. The past few days made her feel like she did before this whole affair started, back when she was just Leyla, her uncle’s ward. The days were peaceful for a change.

And she loved it.

She couldn’t help the hope blooming in her chest. Perhaps these few days were enough to make the Duke rethink about keeping her as his mistress. Maybe he’s finally grown tired of her! After all, his obsession with her made absolutely no sense!

Maybe he was just taken with her because he finally found something he couldn’t have for himself, and now he finally did, he’d gotten bored once more.

She couldn’t help the smile on her face, believing this would be the day she’d be free of him at long last! He was a prideful man after all. He couldn’t bear to stay with her ungrateful disposition and terrible bedside manner towards him for too long.

In her relief at the prospect at the end being within reach, she failed to look away, just as the Duke turned his eyes towards her direction. She knew he was looking at her, and he knew she saw him back.

There was that odd sensation running over her body once more, finally making her lower her gaze from him in trepidation. After a few more seconds, she looked back up to him, and saw he was no longer looking at her.

Instead, he was busy exchanging farewell with the Prince, with Lady Brandt by his side. Another familiar feeling welled up in Leyla, but she couldn’t put her finger in it.

Soon the procession of the Prince’s farewell ceremony ended, and they all left Arvis. Leyla watched on the sidelines as Matthias offered Claudine his arm, and began escorting her inside, with their own entourage following them in suit.


The rest of the employees sighed in relief now that their important guest was gone, and things could return back to normal. Leyla remained rooted in place, as the buzz around her grew louder when they all began chatting amongst their respective groups.

Somewhere behind her, Leyla could vaguely hear a couple maids gossiping with each other in whispers.

“I just think they should have stuck with the schedule.”

“I know, they shouldn’t have to push back the wedding.”

“Lady Brandt is practically the Duchess already, isn’t she?”

Leyla felt uncomfortable with their conversation, feeling her heart beating fast at the new information. She silently stepped away from them, and returned back to her own cabin. It didn’t matter what news about the Duke’s wedding was.

She fully believed that their time together was running out, and that almost made her skip in her steps for joy! Soon, she can finally work on convincing her uncle to leave Arvis, and she could forget this whole kerfuffle had ever happened!

Yes, they would move to the farthest place from Arvis, one where no one knows her, or has even heard of Arvis. Maybe she won’t get to go back to the way things were entirely, and maybe she’ll have to work twice as hard to get their new life in order, but no hardship could hold a candle to the suffering she was now facing.

With her world starting to fall in place, Leyla wasted no time in diligently doing her chores, humming happily as she scrubbed the stain out of their laundry, brushed their floors clean. She even baked herself some jam cookies! She hadn’t felt that urge in a long time now.

As soon as they finished, she took them out to cool on the rack as she grabbed her book, and poured herself some tea to enjoy the cookies with. She sat leisurely for the first time since the accident at the green house, and read her book as she gobbled up the cookies with no problem.

She paused reading after a while, deciding to pen some of her friends who had recently sent her letters. When she just finished sealing the last of her letters, a knock sounded in front of her door, followed soon by a familiar voice.

“Leyla! Are you in there?”

It was her friendly, yet equally nosy neighbor, Mrs. Mona. Leyla went out to greet her with a beaming smile.

“Ah, Mrs. Mona!” Leyla greeted before gasping at the large basket her neighbor was holding, “What a feast you got there!” she exclaimed, and Mrs. Mona smiled sheepishly.

“Oh, I was a bit worried about you dear,” Mrs. Mona sighed and went in as soon as Leyla stepped aside, “After all, you’re a grown woman now, you should be eating a lot more by now.” she then breathed in,


sniffing the faint smell of cookies in the air, “Ah, but I see I shouldn’t have been too worried.” she smiled at Leyla, who only laughed good naturedly.

“Well, I did learn from the best.” Leyla praised at Mrs. Mona, who preened at the implication. Leyla led her to their kitchen, and began preparing her some tea.

Mrs. Mona did take it upon herself to teach Leyla how to cook when she had been younger. She taught her what to do around the kitchen, following her instructions as best as she could until she became a very skilled housekeeper.

It felt as though the warmth was returning in their small cabin, and Leyla couldn’t be happier.

They sat across from each other, sharing stories as they chatted back and forth between tea and their sweets. Mrs. Mona was doing the most of the talking, while Leyla took her sweet time listening and enjoying the food.

Mrs. Mona moaned as she took another bite from Leyla’s baked cookies.

“These ones really came out delicious, dear.” She praised, “Any man who marries you would be very lucky!” she added as an afterthought, before pursing her lips as she looked back over at Leyla, “Speaking of, about Kyle-”

Leyla quickly cut her off.

“Oh, that’s because you taught me so well yourself, so really this is all you!” Leyla exclaimed, grabbing a snack from the basket, “Perhaps you can come over next time when I’m baking cakes, and then you can tell me if they’re of any good!”

Mrs. Mona eyed her carefully, knowing full well Kyle was still a sore topic on the girl. And she looked so happy today, she didn’t have the heart to be the reason it disappeared, not when she was looking so relaxed the last couple of days.

“Well then, you’ll have to let me know when you decide to bake them so I can make sure to stop by.” Mrs. Mona conceded, taking another bite of the cookie, moaning at the deliciousness.

Everyone was curious and worried at the slow progress of Kyle and Leyla’s reconciliation, but perhaps that was a worry for another day instead, Mrs. Mona decided.

So she proceeded to complain to Leyla about the intricate and picky dishes the aristocrats had her cooking in the mansion. They were very picky and snobbish. The kitchen staff never had to worry about so much before, but alas, they had to. They were hosting very important people after all, and nothing but the best should be served!

Still, that didn’t mean she couldn’t bemoan the stress they had put on her.


“Pity that the Brandt girl decided to stay behind,” Mrs. Mona grumbled, “I thought she’d be leaving by now, along with all the guests.” she huffed in a pout. “In all honesty, I don’t know why she insists on staying in Arvis, when the master isn’t even around to entertain her.”

“Oh?” Leyla piped up at the mention of Matthias, “The Duke is not in Arvis now? What for?” she asked curiously and Mrs. Mona nodded.

“Yes, I think it was something about a business, I wasn’t too privy with the information.” Mrs. Mona was quick to answer, “But he left for the city, just after the Crown Prince and his entourage did. He won’t be back for a few days, I’m afraid.” She informed.

Leyla tried to subtly breathe a sigh of relief at the knowledge.

The Duke would be gone for a few more days! Oh this was just the best piece of news she received in forever!

“Unfortunately, the Duchesses Norma and Elysee insist on Lady Brandt remaining in the pretense of discussing wedding arrangements.” Mrs. Mona scoffed, “In all honesty I’m sick and tired of having that snobbish lady around! She’s the pickiest eater I’ve ever met! Doesn’t she know how to just eat what’s being served? Honestly.”



They continued to chat, until Mrs. Mona noticed how late it was getting. They bid each other goodbye, and finally, Leyla was back alone in her cabin. But unlike the aftermath of Mrs. Mona’s visits, Leyla remained in a good mood, and easily finished the cookies left of the place.

Each crunch had crumbs breaking off the cookie, and Leyla just dusted them off from her clothes, deciding she’d sweep them clean later. Today was a good day, and would continue to remain good in the following days after all.

‘Thank god!’ Leyla sighed in relief as she resumed humming to herself in unabashed bliss.

-----

Continue in Part 2!!
